M, the thirteenth letter of the English alphabet, is a vocal consonant, and from the manner of its formation, is called the labio-nasal consonant. See Guide to Pronunciation, // 178-180, 242.
As a numeral, M stands for one thousand, both in English and Latin.
A quadrat, the face or top of which is a perfect square; also, the size of such a square in any given size of type, used as the unit of measurement for that type: 500 m's of pica would be a piece of matter whose length and breadth in pica m's multiplied together produce that number.
A brand or stigma, having the shape of an M, formerly impressed on one convicted of manslaughter and admitted to the benefit of clergy.
A child's word for mother.
In Oriental countries, a respectful form of address given to a woman; mother.
But; -- used in cautionary phrases; as, "Vivace, ma non troppo presto" (i. e., lively, but not too quick).
The common European gull (Larus canus); -- called also mar. See New, a gull.
Made.
The sparrow hawk.
The kestrel.
Madam; my lady; -- a colloquial contraction of madam often used in direct address, and sometimes as an appellation.
A large, pearly, spiral, marine shell (Turbo margaritaceus), from the Pacific Islands. It is used as an ornament.
An East Indian coin, of about one tenth of the weight of a rupee.
Dejected; sorrowful; downcast.
A slattern.
The name of a female fairy, esp. the queen of the fairies; and hence, sometimes, any fairy.
To wrap up.
A spirituous liquor or drink distilled from potatoes; -- used in the Barbadoes.
A kind of persimmon tree (Diospyros discolor) from the Philippine Islands, now introduced into the East and West Indies. It bears an edible fruit as large as a quince.
A prefix, in names of Scotch origin, signifying son.
Any one of several species of lemurs, as the ruffed lemur (Lemur macaco), and the ring-tailed lemur (L. catta).
A genus of monkeys, found in Asia and the East Indies. They have short tails and prominent eyebrows.
The process or act of macadamizing.
of Macadamize
of Macadamize
To cover, as a road, or street, with small, broken stones, so as to form a smooth, hard, convex surface.
A macadamized road.
A macaw.
Any one of several species of short-tailed monkeys of the genus Macacus; as, M. maurus, the moor macaque of the East Indies.
A gum of a crimson color, obtained from a tree (Macaranga Indica) that grows in the East Indies. It is used in taking impressions of coins, medallions, etc., and sometimes as a medicine.
To congratulate.
of Macaroni
of Macaroni
Long slender tubes made of a paste chiefly of wheat flour, and used as an article of food; Italian or Genoese paste.
A medley; something droll or extravagant.
A sort of droll or fool.
A finical person; a fop; -- applied especially to English fops of about 1775.
The designation of a body of Maryland soldiers in the Revolutionary War, distinguished by a rich uniform.
Alt. of Macaronic
Pertaining to, or like, macaroni (originally a dish of mixed food); hence, mixed; confused; jumbled.
Of or pertaining to the burlesque composition called macaronic; as, macaronic poetry.
A heap of thing confusedly mixed together; a jumble.
A kind of burlesque composition, in which the vernacular words of one or more modern languages are intermixed with genuine Latin words, and with hybrid formed by adding Latin terminations to other roots.
A small cake, composed chiefly of the white of eggs, almonds, and sugar.
A finical fellow, or macaroni.
A fire-backed pheasant. See Fireback.
A kind of oil formerly used in dressing the hair; -- so called because originally obtained from Macassar, a district of the Island of Celebes. Also, an imitation of the same, of perfumed castor oil and olive oil.
Any one of several species of small lemurs, as Lemur murinus, which resembles a rat in size.
A small Brazilian monkey (Callithrix torquatus), -- called also collared teetee.
Any parrot of the genus Sittace, or Macrocercus. About eighteen species are known, all of them American. They are large and have a very long tail, a strong hooked bill, and a naked space around the eyes. The voice is harsh, and the colors are brilliant and strongly contrasted.
Of or pertaining to Judas Maccabeus or to the Maccabees; as, the Maccabean princes; Maccabean times.
The name given later times to the Asmonaeans, a family of Jewish patriots, who headed a religious revolt in the reign of Antiochus IV., 168-161 B. C., which led to a period of freedom for Israel.
The name of two ancient historical books, which give accounts of Jewish affairs in or about the time of the Maccabean princes, and which are received as canonical books in the Roman Catholic Church, but are included in the Apocrypha by Protestants. Also applied to three books, two of which are found in some MSS. of the Septuagint.
Alt. of Maccoboy
A kind of snuff.
A gambling game in vogue in the eighteenth century.
A money of account in China equal to one tenth of a tael; also, a weight of 57.98 grains.
A kind of spice; the aril which partly covers nutmegs. See Nutmeg.
A heavy staff or club of metal; a spiked club; -- used as weapon in war before the general use of firearms, especially in the Middle Ages, for breaking metal armor.
A staff borne by, or carried before, a magistrate as an ensign of his authority.
An officer who carries a mace as an emblem of authority.
A knobbed mallet used by curriers in dressing leather to make it supple.
A rod for playing billiards, having one end suited to resting on the table and pushed with one hand.
Belonging, or relating, to Macedonia.
A native or inhabitant of Macedonia.
One of a certain religious sect, followers of Macedonius, Bishop of Constantinople, in the fourth century, who held that the Holy Ghost was a creature, like the angels, and a servant of the Father and the Son.
The doctrines of Macedonius.
A mace bearer; an officer of a court.
of Macerate
of Macerate
To make lean; to cause to waste away.
To subdue the appetites of by poor and scanty diet; to mortify.
To soften by steeping in a liquid, with or without heat; to wear away or separate the parts of by steeping; as, to macerate animal or vegetable fiber.
One who, or that which, macerates; an apparatus for converting paper or fibrous matter into pulp.
The act or process of macerating.
Alt. of Machairodus
A genus of extinct mammals allied to the cats, and having in the upper jaw canine teeth of remarkable size and strength; -- hence called saber-toothed tigers.
A large heavy knife resembling a broadsword, often two or three feet in length, -- used by the inhabitants of Spanish America as a hatchet to cut their way through thickets, and for various other purposes.
Of or pertaining to Machiavel, or to his supposed principles; politically cunning; characterized by duplicity or bad faith; crafty.
One who adopts the principles of Machiavel; a cunning and unprincipled politician.
Alt. of Machiavelianism
The supposed principles of Machiavel, or practice in conformity to them; political artifice, intended to favor arbitrary power.
Having machicolations.
An opening between the corbels which support a projecting parapet, or in the floor of a gallery or the roof of a portal, shooting or dropping missiles upen assailants attacking the base of the walls. Also, the construction of such defenses, in general, when of this character. See Illusts. of Battlement and Castle.
The act of discharging missiles or pouring burning or melted substances upon assailants through such apertures.
Same as Machicolation.
Of or pertaining to machines.
of Machinate
of Machinate
To plan; to contrive; esp., to form a scheme with the purpose of doing harm; to contrive artfully; to plot.
To contrive, as a plot; to plot; as, to machinate evil.
The act of machinating.
That which is devised; a device; a hostile or treacherous scheme; an artful design or plot.
One who machinates, or forms a scheme with evil designs; a plotter or artful schemer.
In general, any combination of bodies so connected that their relative motions are constrained, and by means of which force and motion may be transmitted and modified, as a screw and its nut, or a lever arranged to turn about a fulcrum or a pulley about its pivot, etc.; especially, a construction, more or less complex, consisting of a combination of moving parts, or simple mechanical elements, as wheels, levers, cams, etc., with their supports and connecting framework, calculated to constitute a prime mover, or to receive force and motion from a prime mover or from another machine, and transmit, modify, and apply them to the production of some desired mechanical effect or work, as weaving by a loom, or the excitation of electricity by an electrical machine.
Any mechanical contrivance, as the wooden horse with which the Greeks entered Troy; a coach; a bicycle.
A person who acts mechanically or at will of another.
A combination of persons acting together for a common purpose, with the agencies which they use; as, the social machine.
A political organization arranged and controlled by one or more leaders for selfish, private or partisan ends.
Supernatural agency in a poem, or a superhuman being introduced to perform some exploit.
of Machine
of Machine
To subject to the action of machinery; to effect by aid of machinery; to print with a printing machine.
One who or operates a machine; a machinist.
Machines, in general, or collectively.
The working parts of a machine, engine, or instrument; as, the machinery of a watch.
The supernatural means by which the action of a poetic or fictitious work is carried on and brought to a catastrophe; in an extended sense, the contrivances by which the crises and conclusion of a fictitious narrative, in prose or verse, are effected.
The means and appliances by which anything is kept in action or a desired result is obtained; a complex system of parts adapted to a purpose.
Of or pertaining to the machinery of a poem; acting or used as a machine.
A constrictor of machines and engines; one versed in the principles of machines.
One skilled in the use of machine tools.
A person employed to shift scenery in a theater.
The striped mullet of California (Mugil cephalus, / Mexicanus).
Leanness.
Lean; thin.
Same as Mackintosh.
A pimp; also, a bawd.
Any species of the genus Scomber, and of several related genera. They are finely formed and very active oceanic fishes. Most of them are highly prized for food.
Alt. of Mackinaw
A thick blanket formerly in common use in the western part of the United States.
A waterproof outer garment; -- so called from the name of the inventor.
Same Macule.
To blur, or be blurred, in printing, as if there were a double impression.
Chiastolite; -- so called from the tessellated appearance of a cross section. See Chiastolite.
A crystal having a similar tessellated appearance.
A twin crystal.
Marked like macle (chiastolite).
Having a twin structure. See Twin, a.
See Mascled.
A genus of spiral gastropod shells, often of large size, characteristic of the lower Silurian rocks.
See Morintannic.
A coarse lace made of twine, used especially in decorating furniture.
Alt. of Macrencephalous
Having a large brain.
A combining form signifying long, large, great; as macrodiagonal, macrospore.
Long-lived.
The art of prolonging life.
Having a large head.
Having the cotyledons of a dicotyledonous embryo confluent, and forming a large mass compared with the rest of the body.
The science which treats of the chemical properties, actions or relations of substances in quantity; -- distinguished from micro-chemistry.
A division of birds including the swifts and humming birds. So called from the length of the distal part of the wing.
The great world; that part of the universe which is exterior to man; -- contrasted with microcosm, or man. See Microcosm.
Of or pertaining to the macrocosm.
An immensely long blackish seaweed of the Pacific (Macrocystis pyrifera), having numerous almond-shaped air vessels.
One of a group of wading birds (Macrodactyli) having very long toes.
Alt. of Macrodactylous
Having long toes.
The longer of two diagonals, as of a rhombic prism. See Crystallization.
A dome parallel to the longer lateral axis of an orthorhombic crystal. See Dome, n., 4.
Having large teeth.
A macrodont animal.
See Megafarad.
Enlargement or hypertrophy of the tongue.
Long-jawed.
Long and tedious talk without much substance; superfluity of words.
An instrument for determining the size or distance of inaccessible objects by means of two reflectors on a common sextant.
A short, straight, horizontal mark [-], placed over vowels to denote that they are to be pronounced with a long sound; as, a, in dame; /, in s/am, etc.
Having long or large petals.
Having long or large leaves.
One of the two planes of an orthorhombic crystal which are parallel to the vertical and longer lateral (macrodiagonal) axes.
Any one of a group of maioid crabs remarkable for the length of their legs; -- called also spider crab.
Having long or large feet, or a long stem.
A macropod.
Having long legs or feet.
A prism of an orthorhombic crystal between the macropinacoid and the unit prism; the corresponding pyramids are called macropyramids.
A division of birds; the Longipennes.
Having long wings.
genus of marsupials including the common kangaroo.
See Macroprism.
Alt. of Macroscopical
Visible to the unassisted eye; -- as opposed to microscopic.
A sporangium or conceptacle containing only large spores; -- opposed to microsporangium. Both are found in the genera Selaginella, Isoctes, and Marsilia, plants remotely allied to ferns.
One of the specially large spores of certain flowerless plants, as Selaginella, etc.
Of or pertaining to macrospores.
Same as Macron.
Large-eared.
Alt. of Macroural
Same as Macrura, Macrural, etc.
A large motile spore having four vibratile cilia; -- found in certain green algae.
A subdivision of decapod Crustacea, having the abdomen largely developed. It includes the lobster, prawn, shrimp, and many similar forms.  Cf. Decapoda.
Same as Macrurous.
One of the Macrura.
Like or pertaining to the Macrura.
Of or pertaining to the Macrura; having a long tail.
The act of killing a victim for sacrifice.
Any marine bivalve shell of the genus Mactra, and allied genera. Many species are known. Some of them are used as food, as Mactra stultorum, of Europe. See Surf clam, under Surf.
of Macula
A spot, as on the skin, or on the surface of the sun or of some other luminous orb.
A rather large spot or blotch of color.
To spot; to stain; to blur.
Marked with spots or maculae; blotched; hence, defiled; impure; as, most maculate thoughts.
Having spots or blotches; maculate.
The act of spotting; a spot; a blemish.
Causing a spot or stain.
Blotting paper.
A spot.
A blur, or an appearance of a double impression, as when the paper slips a little; a mackle.
To blur; especially (Print.), to blur or double an impression from type. See Mackle.
Of or pertaining to spots upon a surface; spotted; maculate.
p. p. of Made.
Disordered in intellect; crazy; insane.
Excited beyond self-control or the restraint of reason; inflamed by violent or uncontrollable desire, passion, or appetite; as, to be mad with terror, lust, or hatred; mad against political reform.
Proceeding from, or indicating, madness; expressing distraction; prompted by infatuation, fury, or extreme rashness.
Extravagant; immoderate.
Furious with rage, terror, or disease; -- said of the lower animals; as, a mad bull; esp., having hydrophobia; rabid; as, a mad dog.
Angry; out of patience; vexed; as, to get mad at a person.
Having impaired polarity; -- applied to a compass needle.
of Mad
of Mad
To make mad or furious; to madden.
To be mad; to go mad; to rave. See Madding.
An earthworm.
of Madam
of Madam
A gentlewoman; -- an appellation or courteous form of address given to a lady, especially an elderly or a married lady; -- much used in the address, at the beginning of a letter, to a woman. The corresponding word in addressing a man is Sir.
of Madame
My lady; -- a French title formerly given to ladies of quality; now, in France, given to all married women.
See Eggplant.
Hot-headed; rash.
A rash or hot-headed person.
Disordered in mind; hot-headed.
Inclined to wild sports; delighting in rash, absurd, or dangerous amusements.
Wild; reckless.
A person of wild behavior; an excitable, rash, violent person.
of Madden
of Madden
To make mad; to drive to madness; to craze; to excite violently with passion; to make very angry; to enrage.
To become mad; to act as if mad.
A plant of the Rubia (R. tinctorum). The root is much used in dyeing red, and formerly was used in medicine. It is cultivated in France and Holland. See Rubiaceous.
A name proposed for any plant of the same natural order (Rubiaceae) as the madder.
Affected with madness; raging; furious.
Somewhat mad.
See Mad, n.
imp. & p. p. of Make.
Artificially produced; pieced together; formed by filling in; as, made ground; a made mast, in distinction from one consisting of a single spar.
Alt. of Madecassee
A native or inhabitant of Madagascar, or Madecassee; the language of the natives of Madagascar. See Malagasy.
Of or pertaining to Madagascar or its inhabitants.
Alt. of Madefication
The act of madefying, or making wet; the state of that which is made wet.
of Madefy
of Madefy
To make wet or moist.
See Madecassee.
A rich wine made on the Island of Madeira.
of Mademoiselle
A French title of courtesy given to a girl or an unmarried lady, equivalent to the English Miss.
A marine food fish (Sciaena chrysura), of the Southern United States; -- called also yellowtail, and silver perch.
The barn owl.
The magpie.
Wild; crack-brained.
A house where insane persons are confined; an insane asylum; a bedlam.
A genus of composite plants, of which one species (Madia sativa) is cultivated for the oil yielded from its seeds by pressure. This oil is sometimes used instead of olive oil for the table.
Wet; moist; as, a madid eye.
An instrument to extract hairs.
An intoxicating confection from the hemp plant; -- used by the Turks and Hindoos.
In a mad manner; without reason or understanding; wildly.
of Madman
A man who is mad; lunatic; a crazy person.
The masterwort (Peucedanum Ostruthium).
The condition of being mad; insanity; lunacy.
Frenzy; ungovernable rage; extreme folly.
My lady; -- a term of address in Italian formerly used as the equivalent of Madame, but for which Signora is now substituted. Sometimes introduced into English.
A picture of the Virgin Mary (usually with the babe).
A small Abyssinian antelope (Neotragus Saltiana), about the size of a hare.
A large fish pound used for the capture of the tunny in the Mediterranean; also applied to the seines used for the same purpose.
Mother-of-pearl.
A genus of reef corals abundant in tropical seas. It includes than one hundred and fifty species, most of which are elegantly branched.
An extensive division of Anthozoa, including most of the species that produce stony corals. See Illust. of Anthozoa.
Any coral of the genus Madrepora; formerly, often applied to any stony coral.
Alt. of Madreporic
Resembling, or pertaining to, the genus Madrepora.
Resembling a madreporian coral in form or structure.
A fossil coral.
The madreporic plate of echinoderms.
A thick plank, used for several mechanical purposes
A plank to receive the mouth of a petard, with which it is applied to anything intended to be broken down.
A plank or beam used for supporting the earth in mines or fortifications.
A little amorous poem, sometimes called a pastoral poem, containing some tender and delicate, though simple, thought.
An unaccompanied polyphonic song, in four, five, or more parts, set to secular words, but full of counterpoint and imitation, and adhering to the old church modes. Unlike the freer glee, it is best sung with several voices on a part. See Glee.
A madrigalist.
A composer of madrigals.
Of or pertaining to Madrid in Spain, or to its inhabitants.
A native or inhabitant of Madrid.
An animal (usually an old mare), wearing a bell and acting as the leader of a troop of pack mules.
<P><B>Madro–a</B> (<I>n.A small evergreen tree or shrub (Arbutus Menziesii), of California, having a smooth bark, thick shining leaves, and edible red berries, which are often called madro–a apples.
A genus of cruciferous plants (Alyssum) with white or yellow flowers and rounded pods. A. maritimum is the commonly cultivated sweet alyssum, a fragrant white-flowered annual.
Alt. of Magbote
Compensation for the injury done by slaying a kinsman.
A celebrated whirlpool on the coast of Norway.
Also Fig. ; as, a maelstrom of vice.
A Bacchante; a priestess or votary of Bacchus.
A frantic or frenzied woman.
Majestic or majestically; -- a direction to perform a passage or piece of music in a dignified manner.
The Mosasaurus Hofmanni. See Mosasaurus.
A master in any art, especially in music; a composer.
To stammer.
A stammerer.
A receptacle in which anything is stored, especially military stores, as ammunition, arms, provisions, etc.
The building or room in which the supply of powder is kept in a fortification or a ship.
A chamber in a gun for holding a number of cartridges to be fed automatically to the piece.
A pamphlet published periodically containing miscellaneous papers or compositions.
of Magazine
of Magazine
To store in, or as in, a magazine; to store up for use.
One who edits or writes for a magazine.
The act of editing, or writing for, a magazine.
One who edits or writes for a magazine.
See Maegbote.
Designating an orange-red dyestuff obtained from naphthylamine, and called magdala red, naphthalene red, etc.
A reformed prostitute.
A medicine in the form of a roll, a esp. a roll of plaster.
A city of Saxony.
A magician.
Of or pertaining to, or named from, Magellan, the navigator.
An aniline dye obtained as an amorphous substance having a green bronze surface color, which dissolves to a shade of red; also, the color; -- so called from Magenta, in Italy, in allusion to the battle fought there about the time the dye was discovered. Called also fuchsine, roseine, etc.
Worn; fretted; as, a magged brace.
Greater, in respect to scales, intervals, etc., when used in opposition to minor; major.
The footless larva of any fly. See Larval.
A whim; an odd fancy.
State of being maggoty.
Full of whims or fancies; maggoty.
A magpie.
Infested with maggots.
Full of whims; capricious.
A name for daisies and camomiles of several kinds.
A caste of priests, philosophers, and magicians, among the ancient Persians; hence, any holy men or sages of the East.
Of or pertaining to the Magi.
One of the Magi, or priests of the Zoroastrian religion in Persia; an adherent of the Zoroastrian religion.
A comprehensive name for all of the pretended arts which claim to produce effects by the assistance of supernatural beings, or departed spirits, or by a mastery of secret forces in nature attained by a study of occult science, including enchantment, conjuration, witchcraft, sorcery, necromancy, incantation, etc.
Alt. of Magical
Pertaining to the hidden wisdom supposed to be possessed by the Magi; relating to the occult powers of nature, and the producing of effects by their agency.
Performed by, or proceeding from, occult and superhuman agencies; done by, or seemingly done by, enchantment or sorcery. Hence: Seemingly requiring more than human power; imposing or startling in performance; producing effects which seem supernatural or very extraordinary; having extraordinary properties; as, a magic lantern; a magic square or circle.
In a magical manner; by magic, or as if by magic.
One skilled in magic; one who practices the black art; an enchanter; a necromancer; a sorcerer or sorceress; a conjurer.
Alt. of Magilph
See Megilp.
Master; sir; -- a title of the Middle Ages, given to a person in authority, or to one having a license from a university to teach philosophy and the liberal arts.
Of or pertaining to a master or magistrate, or one in authority; having the manner of a magister; official; commanding; authoritative. Hence: Overbearing; dictatorial; dogmatic.
Pertaining to, produced by, or of the nature of, magistery. See Magistery, 2.
Magisterialness; authoritativeness.
In a magisterial manner.
The quality or state of being magisterial.
Mastery; powerful medical influence; renowned efficacy; a sovereign remedy.
A magisterial injunction.
A precipitate; a fine substance deposited by precipitation; -- applied in old chemistry to certain white precipitates from metallic solutions; as, magistery of bismuth.
of Magistracy
The office or dignity of a magistrate.
The collective body of magistrates.
Pertaining to a master; magisterial; authoritative; dogmatic.
Commanded or prescribed by a magister, esp. by a doctor; hence, effectual; sovereign; as, a magistral sirup.
Formulated extemporaneously, or for a special case; -- opposed to officinal, and said of prescriptions and medicines.
A sovereign medicine or remedy.
A magistral line.
Powdered copper pyrites used in the amalgamation of ores of silver, as at the Spanish mines of Mexico and South America.
of Magistrality
Magisterialness; arbitrary dogmatism.
In a magistral manner.
A person clothed with power as a public civil officer; a public civil officer invested with the executive government, or some branch of it.
Alt. of Magistratical
Of, pertaining to, or proceeding from, a magistrate; having the authority of a magistrate.
Magistracy.
Any crude mixture of mineral or organic matters in the state of a thin paste.
A thick residuum obtained from certain substances after the fluid parts are expressed from them; the grounds which remain after treating a substance with any menstruum, as water or alcohol.
A salve or confection of thick consistency.
The molten matter within the earth, the source of the material of lava flows, dikes of eruptive rocks, etc.
The glassy base of an eruptive rock.
The amorphous or homogenous matrix or ground mass, as distinguished from well-defined crystals; as, the magma of porphyry.
The great Charter, so called, obtained by the English barons from King John, A. D. 1215. This name is also given to the charter granted to the people of England in the ninth year of Henry III., and confirmed by Edward I.
Hence, a fundamental constitution which guaranties rights and privileges.
A great act or event; a great attainment.
The quality of being magnanimous; greatness of mind; elevation or dignity of soul; that quality or combination of qualities, in character, which enables one to encounter danger and trouble with tranquility and firmness, to disdain injustice, meanness and revenge, and to act and sacrifice for noble objects.
Great of mind; elevated in soul or in sentiment; raised above what is low, mean, or ungenerous; of lofty and courageous spirit; as, a magnanimous character; a magnanimous conqueror.
Dictated by or exhibiting nobleness of soul; honorable; noble; not selfish.
In a magnanimous manner; with greatness of mind.
A black pigment which dries rapidly when mixed with oil, and is of intense body.
A person of rank; a noble or grandee; a person of influence or distinction in any sphere.
One of the nobility, or certain high officers of state belonging to the noble estate in the national representation of Hungary, and formerly of Poland.
Magnet.
A light earthy white substance, consisting of magnesium oxide, and obtained by heating magnesium hydrate or carbonate, or by burning magnesium. It has a slightly alkaline reaction, and is used in medicine as a mild antacid laxative. See Magnesium.
Pertaining to, characterized by, or containing, magnesia or magnesium.
Pertaining to, or containing, magnesium; as, magnesic oxide.
Native magnesium carbonate occurring in white compact or granular masses, and also in rhombohedral crystals.
A light silver-white metallic element, malleable and ductile, quite permanent in dry air but tarnishing in moist air. It burns, forming (the oxide) magnesia, with the production of a blinding light (the so-called magnesium light) which is used in signaling, in pyrotechny, or in photography where a strong actinic illuminant is required. Its compounds occur abundantly, as in dolomite, talc, meerschaum, etc. Symbol Mg. Atomic weight, 24.4. Specific gravity, 1.75.
The loadstone; a species of iron ore (the ferrosoferric or magnetic ore, Fe3O4) which has the property of attracting iron and some of its ores, and, when freely suspended, of pointing to the poles; -- called also natural magnet.
A bar or mass of steel or iron to which the peculiar properties of the loadstone have been imparted; -- called, in distinction from the loadstone, an artificial magnet.
Alt. of Magnetical
Pertaining to the magnet; possessing the properties of the magnet, or corresponding properties; as, a magnetic bar of iron; a magnetic needle.
Of or pertaining to, or characterized by, the earth's magnetism; as, the magnetic north; the magnetic meridian.
Capable of becoming a magnet; susceptible to magnetism; as, the magnetic metals.
Endowed with extraordinary personal power to excite the feelings and to win the affections; attractive; inducing attachment.
Having, susceptible to, or induced by, animal magnetism, so called; as, a magnetic sleep. See Magnetism.
A magnet.
Any metal, as iron, nickel, cobalt, etc., which may receive, by any means, the properties of the loadstone, and which then, when suspended, fixes itself in the direction of a magnetic meridian.
By or as by, magnetism.
Quality of being magnetic.
One versed in the science of magnetism; a magnetist.
Magneticalness.
The science of magnetism.
Producing or conducting magnetism.
The property, quality, or state, of being magnetic; the manifestation of the force in nature which is seen in a magnet.
The science which treats of magnetic phenomena.
Power of attraction; power to excite the feelings and to gain the affections.
One versed in magnetism.
An oxide of iron (Fe3O4) occurring in isometric crystals, also massive, of a black color and metallic luster. It is readily attracted by a magnet and sometimes possesses polarity, being then called loadstone. It is an important iron ore. Called also magnetic iron.
Capable of magnetized.
The act of magnetizing, or the state of being magnetized.
of Magnetize
of Magnetize
To communicate magnetic properties to; as, to magnetize a needle.
To attract as a magnet attracts, or like a magnet; to move; to influence.
To bring under the influence of animal magnetism.
A person subjected to the influence of animal magnetism.
One who, or that which, imparts magnetism.
A prefix meaning pertaining to, produced by, or in some way connected with, magnetism.
Alt. of Magneto-electrical
Pertaining to, or characterized by, electricity by the action of magnets; as, magneto-electric induction.
Electricity evolved by the action of magnets.
That branch of science which treats of the development of electricity by the action of magnets; -- the counterpart of electro-magnetism.
An automatic instrument for registering, by photography or otherwise, the states and variations of any of the terrestrial magnetic elements.
An instrument for measuring the intensity of magnetic forces; also, less frequently, an instrument for determining any of the terrestrial magnetic elements, as the dip and declination.
Pertaining to, or employed in, the measurement of magnetic forces; obtained by means of a magnetometer; as, magnetometric instruments; magnetometric measurements.
A voltaic series of two or more large plates, producing a great quantity of electricity of low tension, and hence adapted to the exhibition of electro-magnetic phenomena.
The treatment of disease by the application of magnets to the surface of the body.
Such as can be magnified, or extolled.
Alt. of Magnifical
Grand; splendid; illustrious; magnificent.
The song of the Virgin Mary, Luke i. 46; -- so called because it commences with this word in the Vulgate.
To magnify or extol.
The act of magnifying; enlargement; exaggeration.
The act of doing what magnificent; the state or quality of being magnificent.
Doing grand things; admirable in action; displaying great power or opulence, especially in building, way of living, and munificence.
Grand in appearance; exhibiting grandeur or splendor; splendid' pompous.
In a Magnificent manner.
of Magnifico
A grandee or nobleman of Venice; -- so called in courtesy.
A rector of a German university.
One who, or that which, magnifies.
of Magnify
of Magnify
To make great, or greater; to increase the dimensions of; to amplify; to enlarge, either in fact or in appearance; as, the microscope magnifies the object by a thousand diameters.
To increase the importance of; to augment the esteem or respect in which one is held.
To praise highly; to land; to extol.
To exaggerate; as, to magnify a loss or a difficulty.
To have the power of causing objects to appear larger than they really are; to increase the apparent dimensions of objects; as, some lenses magnify but little.
To have effect; to be of importance or significance.
The quality of being magniloquent; pompous discourse; grandiloquence.
Speaking pompously; using swelling discourse; bombastic; tumid in style; grandiloquent.
Magniloquent.
Extent of dimensions; size; -- applied to things that have length, breath, and thickness.
That which has one or more of the three dimensions, length, breadth, and thickness.
Anything of which greater or less can be predicated, as time, weight, force, and the like.
Greatness; grandeur.
Greatness, in reference to influence or effect; importance; as, an affair of magnitude.
A genus of American and Asiatic trees, with aromatic bark and large sweet-scented whitish or reddish flowers.
Pertaining to a natural order (Magnoliaceae) of trees of which the magnolia, the tulip tree, and the star anise are examples.
A large wine bottle.
A bone of the carpus at the base of the third metacarpal bone.
The Barbary ape.
A magpie.
Any one of numerous species of the genus Pica and related genera, allied to the jays, but having a long graduated tail.
A South American stork (Euxenara maguari), having a forked tail.
The century plant, a species of Agave (A. Americana). See Agave.
One of the dominant people of Hungary, allied to the Finns; a Hungarian.
The language of the Magyars.
A kind of baboon; the wanderoo.
Alt. of Mahabharatam
A celebrated epic poem of the Hindoos. It is of great length, and is chiefly devoted to the history of a civil war between two dynasties of ancient India.
A cherry tree (Prunus Mahaleb) of Southern Europe. The wood is prized by cabinetmakers, the twigs are used for pipe stems, the flowers and leaves yield a perfume, and from the fruit a violet dye and a fermented liquor (like kirschwasser) are prepared.
A sovereign prince in India; -- a title given also to other persons of high rank.
An African antelope (Hippotragus Bakeri). Its face is striped with black and white.
A muslin wrapper for the head and the lower part of the face, worn by Turkish and Armenian women when they go abroad.
Among Mohammedans, the last imam or leader of the faithful. The Sunni, the largest sect of the Mohammedans, believe that he is yet to appear.
See Maul-stick.
A name given to several malvaceous trees (species of Hibiscus, Ochroma, etc.), and to their strong fibrous inner bark, which is used for strings and cordage.
A large tree of the genus Swietenia (S. Mahogoni), found in tropical America.
The wood of the Swietenia Mahogoni. It is of a reddish brown color, beautifully veined, very hard, and susceptible of a fine polish. It is used in the manufacture of furniture.
A table made of mahogany wood.
A South African lemur (Galago maholi), having very large ears.
Alt. of Mahometan
See Mohammedan.
See Mohammedanism.
of Mahometanize
of Mahometanize
To convert to the religion of Mohammed; to Mohammedanize.
See Mohammedanism.
A Mohammedan.
Mohammedanism.
A large Turkish ship.
The Oregon grape, a species of barberry (Berberis Aquifolium), often cultivated for its hollylike foliage.
An annual cruciferous plant with reddish purple or white flowers (Malcolmia maritima). It is called in England Virginia stock, but the plant comes from the Mediterranean.
The African white two-horned rhinoceros (Atelodus simus).
One of the dark race inhabiting principally the islands of Eastern Polynesia. Also used adjectively.
A contemptuous name for Mohammed; hence, an evil spirit; a devil.
The keeper and driver of an elephant.
A device for saving power in stopping and starting a railroad car, by means of a heavy fly wheel.
The language of the Mahrattas; the language spoken in the Deccan and Concan.
One of a numerous people inhabiting the southwestern part of India. Also, the language of the Mahrattas; Mahrati. It is closely allied to Sanskrit.
Of or pertaining to the Mahrattas.
Alt. of Mahumetanism
See Mohammedan, Mohammedanism.
An East Indian sapotaceous tree (Bassia latifolia, and also B. butyracea), whose timber is used for wagon wheels, and the flowers for food and in preparing an intoxicating drink. It is one of the butter trees. The oil, known as mahwa and yallah, is obtained from the kernels of the fruit.
A genus of spider crabs, including the common European species (Maia squinado).
A beautiful American bombycid moth (Eucronia maia).
Any spider crab of the genus Maia, or family Maiadae.
An unmarried woman; usually, a young unmarried woman; esp., a girl; a virgin; a maiden.
A man who has not had sexual intercourse.
A female servant.
The female of a ray or skate, esp. of the gray skate (Raia batis), and of the thornback (R. clavata).
An unmarried woman; a girl or woman who has not experienced sexual intercourse; a virgin; a maid.
A female servant.
An instrument resembling the guillotine, formerly used in Scotland for beheading criminals.
A machine for washing linen.
Of or pertaining to a maiden, or to maidens; suitable to, or characteristic of, a virgin; as, maiden innocence.
Never having been married; not having had sexual intercourse; virgin; -- said usually of the woman, but sometimes of the man; as, a maiden aunt.
Fresh; innocent; unpolluted; pure; hitherto unused.
Used of a fortress, signifying that it has never been captured, or violated.
To act coyly like a maiden; -- with it as an indefinite object.
A fern of the genus Adiantum (A. pedatum), having very slender graceful stalks. It is common in the United States, and is sometimes used in medicine. The name is also applied to other species of the same genus, as to the Venus-hair.
The state of being a maiden; maidenhood; virginity.
The state of being unused or uncontaminated; freshness; purity.
The hymen, or virginal membrane.
The state of being a maid or a virgin; virginity.
Newness; freshness; uncontaminated state.
Like a maiden; modest; coy.
The quality of being maidenly; the behavior that becomes a maid; modesty; gentleness.
Like a maid; suiting a maid; maiden-like; gentle, modest, reserved.
In a maidenlike manner.
Maidenhood.
Maidenhood.
The lady of the May games; one of the characters in a morris dance; a May queen. Afterward, a grotesque character personated in sports and buffoonery by a man in woman's clothes.
A kind of dance.
Pale, like a sick girl.
A female servant.
The yellow bedstraw (Galium verum).
Alt. of Maieutical
Serving to assist childbirth.
Fig. : Aiding, or tending to, the definition and interpretation of thoughts or language.
The art of giving birth (i. e., clearness and conviction) to ideas, which are conceived as struggling for birth.
The meagre.
Belonging to a fast day or fast; as, a maigre day.
See Maim, and Mayhem.
A South American carnivore of the genus Conepatus, allied to the skunk, but larger, and having a longer snout. The tail is not bushy.
A South American wild dog (Canis cancrivorus); the crab-eating dog.
A spot.
A small piece of money; especially, an English silver half-penny of the time of Henry V.
Rent; tribute.
A flexible fabric made of metal rings interlinked. It was used especially for defensive armor.
Hence generally, armor, or any defensive covering.
A contrivance of interlinked rings, for rubbing off the loose hemp on lines and white cordage.
Any hard protective covering of an animal, as the scales and plates of reptiles, shell of a lobster, etc.
To arm with mail.
To pinion.
A bag; a wallet.
The bag or bags with the letters, papers, papers, or other matter contained therein, conveyed under public authority from one post office to another; the whole system of appliances used by government in the conveyance and delivery of mail matter.
That which comes in the mail; letters, etc., received through the post office.
A trunk, box, or bag, in which clothing, etc., may be carried.
of Mail
of Mail
To deliver into the custody of the postoffice officials, or place in a government letter box, for transmission by mail; to post; as, to mail a letter.
Admissible lawfully into the mail.
Protected by a coat of mail; clad in armor.
Protected by an external coat, or covering, of scales or plates.
Spotted; speckled.
A farm.
A chiton.
of Maim
of Maim
To deprive of the use of a limb, so as to render a person on fighting less able either to defend himself or to annoy his adversary.
To mutilate; to cripple; to injure; to disable; to impair.
The privation of the use of a limb or member of the body, by which one is rendered less able to defend himself or to annoy his adversary.
The privation of any necessary part; a crippling; mutilation; injury; deprivation of something essential. See Mayhem.
In a maimed manner.
State of being maimed.
A hand or match at dice.
A stake played for at dice.
The largest throw in a match at dice; a throw at dice within given limits, as in the game of hazard.
A match at cockfighting.
A main-hamper.
Strength; force; might; violent effort.
The chief or principal part; the main or most important thing.
The great sea, as distinguished from an arm, bay, etc. ; the high sea; the ocean.
The continent, as distinguished from an island; the mainland.
principal duct or pipe, as distinguished from lesser ones; esp. (Engin.), a principal pipe leading to or from a reservoir; as, a fire main.
Very or extremely strong.
Vast; huge.
Unqualified; absolute; entire; sheer.
Principal; chief; first in size, rank, importance, etc.
Important; necessary.
Very; extremely; as, main heavy.
One of the New England States.
The dagger held in the left hand, while the rapier is held in the right; -- used to parry thrusts of the adversary's rapier.
A hamper to be carried in the hand; a hand basket used in carrying grapes to the press.
The continent; the principal land; -- opposed to island, or peninsula.
Very strongly; mightily; to a great degree.
Principally; chiefly.
The principal mast in a ship or other vessel.
A thing stolen found on the person of the thief.
Capable of being admitted to give surety by mainpernors; able to be mainprised.
A surety, under the old writ of mainprise, for a prisoner's appearance in court at a day.
A kingbolt.
A writ directed to the sheriff, commanding him to take sureties, called mainpernors, for the prisoner's appearance, and to let him go at large. This writ is now obsolete.
Deliverance of a prisoner on security for his appearance at a day.
of Mainprise
of Mainprise
To suffer to go at large, on his finding sureties, or mainpernors, for his appearance at a day; -- said of a prisoner.
The farm attached to a mansion house.
The principal sail in a ship or other vessel.
One of the ropes by which the mainsail is hauled aft and trimmed.
The principal or most important spring in a piece of mechanism, especially the moving spring of a watch or clock or the spring in a gunlock which impels the hammer. Hence: The chief or most powerful motive; the efficient cause of action.
The stay extending from the foot of the foremast to the maintop.
Main support; principal dependence.
To swear falsely.
of Maintain
of Maintain
To hold or keep in any particular state or condition; to support; to sustain; to uphold; to keep up; not to suffer to fail or decline; as, to maintain a certain degree of heat in a furnace; to maintain a fence or a railroad; to maintain the digestive process or powers of the stomach; to maintain the fertility of soil; to maintain present reputation.
To keep possession of; to hold and defend; not to surrender or relinquish.
To continue; not to suffer to cease or fail.
To bear the expense of; to support; to keep up; to supply with what is needed.
To affirm; to support or defend by argument.
That maybe maintained.
One who maintains.
One who, not being interested, maintains a cause depending between others, by furnishing money, etc., to either party.
The act of maintaining; sustenance; support; defense; vindication.
That which maintains or supports; means of sustenance; supply of necessaries and conveniences.
An officious or unlawful intermeddling in a cause depending between others, by assisting either party with money or means to carry it on. See Champerty.
The platform about the head of the mainmast in square-rigged vessels.
The yard on which the mainsail is extended, supported by the mainmast.
Of or pertaining to the genus Maia, or family Maiadeae.
Master.
Principal; chief.
Alt. of Maistry
Alt. of Maistry
Mastery; superiority; art. See Mastery.
Mistress.
Same as Maghet.
A large species of American grass of the genus Zea (Z. Mays), widely cultivated as a forage and food plant; Indian corn. Also, its seed, growing on cobs, and used as food for men animals.
Alt. of Majestatal
Majestic.
Possessing or exhibiting majesty; of august dignity, stateliness, or imposing grandeur; lofty; noble; grand.
Majestic.
The quality or state of being majestic.
of Majesty
The dignity and authority of sovereign power; quality or state which inspires awe or reverence; grandeur; exalted dignity, whether proceeding from rank, character, or bearing; imposing loftiness; stateliness; -- usually applied to the rank and dignity of sovereigns.
Hence, used with the possessive pronoun, the title of an emperor, king or queen; -- in this sense taking a plural; as, their majesties attended the concert.
Dignity; elevation of manner or style.
A kind of pottery, with opaque glazing and showy, which reached its greatest perfection in Italy in the 16th century.
Greater in number, quantity, or extent; as, the major part of the assembly; the major part of the revenue; the major part of the territory.
Of greater dignity; more important.
Of full legal age.
Greater by a semitone, either in interval or in difference of pitch from another tone.
An officer next in rank above a captain and next below a lieutenant colonel; the lowest field officer.
A person of full age.
That premise which contains the major term. It its the first proposition of a regular syllogism; as: No unholy person is qualified for happiness in heaven [the major]. Every man in his natural state is unholy [minor]. Therefore, no man in his natural state is qualified for happiness in heaven [conclusion or inference].
A mayor.
The right of succession to property according to age; -- so termed in some of the countries of continental Europe.
Property, landed or funded, so attached to a title of honor as to descend with it.
The office or rank of a major.
To augment; to increase.
Increase; enlargement.
Of or pertaining to Majorca.
A native or inhabitant of Majorca.
A man who has authority to act, within certain limits, as master of the house; a steward; also, a chief minister or officer.
An officer of the army holding a rank next above that of brigadier general and next below that of lieutenant general, and who usually commands a division or a corps.
of Majority
The quality or condition of being major or greater; superiority.
The military rank of a major.
The condition of being of full age, or authorized by law to manage one's own affairs.
The greater number; more than half; as, a majority of mankind; a majority of the votes cast.
Ancestors; ancestry.
The amount or number by which one aggregate exceeds all other aggregates with which it is contrasted; especially, the number by which the votes for a successful candidate exceed those for all other candidates; as, he is elected by a majority of five hundred votes. See Plurality.
The office of major.
See Madjoun.
Capital letters, as found in manuscripts of the sixth century and earlier.
A capital letter; especially, one used in ancient manuscripts. See Majusculae.
Capable of being made.
See Macaroon, 2.
A companion; a mate; often, a husband or a wife.
of Make
of Make
To cause to exist; to bring into being; to form; to produce; to frame; to fashion; to create.
To form of materials; to cause to exist in a certain form; to construct; to fabricate.
To produce, as something artificial, unnatural, or false; -- often with up; as, to make up a story.
To bring about; to bring forward; to be the cause or agent of; to effect, do, perform, or execute; -- often used with a noun to form a phrase equivalent to the simple verb that corresponds to such noun; as, to make complaint, for to complain; to make record of, for to record; to make abode, for to abide, etc.
To execute with the requisite formalities; as, to make a bill, note, will, deed, etc.
To gain, as the result of one's efforts; to get, as profit; to make acquisition of; to have accrue or happen to one; as, to make a large profit; to make an error; to make a loss; to make money.
To find, as the result of calculation or computation; to ascertain by enumeration; to find the number or amount of, by reckoning, weighing, measurement, and the like; as, he made the distance of; to travel over; as, the ship makes ten knots an hour; he made the distance in one day.
To put a desired or desirable condition; to cause to thrive.
To cause to be or become; to put into a given state verb, or adjective; to constitute; as, to make known; to make public; to make fast.
To cause to appear to be; to constitute subjectively; to esteem, suppose, or represent.
To require; to constrain; to compel; to force; to cause; to occasion; -- followed by a noun or pronoun and infinitive.
To become; to be, or to be capable of being, changed or fashioned into; to do the part or office of; to furnish the material for; as, he will make a good musician; sweet cider makes sour vinegar; wool makes warm clothing.
To compose, as parts, ingredients, or materials; to constitute; to form; to amount to.
To be engaged or concerned in.
To reach; to attain; to arrive at or in sight of.
To act in a certain manner; to have to do; to manage; to interfere; to be active; -- often in the phrase to meddle or make.
To proceed; to tend; to move; to go; as, he made toward home; the tiger made at the sportsmen.
To tend; to contribute; to have effect; -- with for or against; as, it makes for his advantage.
To increase; to augment; to accrue.
To compose verses; to write poetry; to versify.
Structure, texture, constitution of parts; construction; shape; form.
One who excites contentions and quarrels.
A feigning to believe; make believe.
A feigning to believe, as in the play of children; a mere pretense; a fiction; an invention.
Feigned; insincere.
Made.
An object of ridicule; a butt.
Matchless.
Without a mate.
A peacemaker.
One who makes, forms, or molds; a manufacturer; specifically, the Creator.
The person who makes a promissory note.
One who writes verses; a poet.
That with which one makes shift; a temporary expedient.
The way in which the parts of anything are put together; often, the way in which an actor is dressed, painted, etc., in personating a character.
That which is thrown into a scale to make weight; something of little account added to supply a deficiency or fill a gap.
A lemur. See Lemur.
The act of one who makes; workmanship; fabrication; construction; as, this is cloth of your own making; the making of peace or war was in his power.
Composition, or structure.
a poem.
That which establishes or places in a desirable state or condition; the material of which something may be made; as, early misfortune was the making of him.
External appearance; from.
A tool somewhat like a chisel with a groove in it, used by calkers of ships to finish the seams after the oakum has been driven in.
The act of bringing spirits to a certain degree of strength, called proof.
The act of becoming reconciled or friendly.
A prefix in composition denoting ill,or evil, F. male, adv., fr. malus, bad, ill. In some words it has the form male-, as in malediction, malevolent. See Malice.
Evils; wrongs; offenses against right and law.
A region in the western part of the Peninsula of India, between the mountains and the sea.
See Melocoton.
A town and district upon the seacoast of the Malay Peninsula.
Native hydrous carbonate of copper, usually occurring in green mammillary masses with concentric fibrous structure.
Softening; relaxing.
The act of making soft or supple.
A genus of nemertean worms, parasitic in the gill cavity of clams and other bivalves. They have a large posterior sucker, like that of a leech. See Illust. of Bdellomorpha.
One of a tribe of beetles (Malacodermata), with a soft and flexible body, as the fireflies.
A variety of pyroxene.
One versed in the science of malacology.
The science which relates to the structure and habits of mollusks.
A class of air-breathing Arthropoda; -- called also Protracheata, and Onychophora.
One of the Malacopterygii.
An order of fishes in which the fin rays, except the anterior ray of the pectoral and dorsal fins, are closely jointed, and not spiny. It includes the carp, pike, salmon, shad, etc. Called also Malacopteri.
Belonging to the Malacopterygii.
A peculiar disease of the bones, in consequence of which they become softened and capable of being bent without breaking.
Having soft jaws without teeth, as certain fishes.
A subclass of Crustacea, including Arthrostraca and Thoracostraca, or all those higher than the Entomostraca.
One of the Malacostraca.
That branch of zoological science which relates to the crustaceans; -- called also carcinology.
Belonging to the Malacostraca.
See Melocoton.
An extensive group of Invertebrata, including the Mollusca, Brachiopoda, and Bryozoa. Called also Malacozoaria.
Of or pertaining to the Malacozoa.
Bad address; an awkward, tactless, or offensive way of accosting one or talking with one.
A bad adjustment.
Bad administration; bad management of any business, especially of public affairs.
Of a quality opposed to adroitness; clumsy; awkward; unskillful.
of Malady
Any disease of the human body; a distemper, disorder, or indisposition, proceeding from impaired, defective, or morbid organic functions; especially, a lingering or deep-seated disorder.
A moral or mental defect or disorder.
A city and a province of Spain, on the Mediterranean.  Hence, Malaga grapes, Malaga raisins, Malaga wines.
Same as Malagasy.
A native or natives of Madagascar; also (sing.), the language.
An indefinite feeling of uneasiness, or of being sick or ill at ease.
A salt of malamic acid.
A yellowish aromatic bark, used in medicine and perfumery, said to be from the South American shrub Croton Malambo.
A white crystalline substance forming the ethyl salt of malamic acid.
Of or pertaining an acid intermediate between malic acid and malamide, and known only by its salts.
The acid amide derived from malic acid, as a white crystalline substance metameric with asparagine.
A scurfy eruption in the bend of the knee of the fore leg of a horse. See Sallenders.
Bold; forward; impudent; saucy; pert.
A malapert person.
A grotesque misuse of a word; a word so used.
Unseasonable or unseasonably; unsuitable or unsuitably.
A genus of African siluroid fishes, including the electric catfishes. See Electric cat, under Electric.
Of or pertaining to the region of the cheek bone, or to the malar bone; jugal.
The cheek bone, which forms a part of the lower edge of the orbit.
Air infected with some noxious substance capable of engendering disease; esp., an unhealthy exhalation from certain soils, as marshy or wet lands, producing fevers; miasma.
A morbid condition produced by exhalations from decaying vegetable matter in contact with moisture, giving rise to fever and ague and many other symptoms characterized by their tendency to recur at definite and usually uniform intervals.
Alt. of Malarious
Alt. of Malarious
Of or pertaining, to or infected by, malaria.
The fresh-water drumfish (Haploidonotus grunniens).
Imperfect digestion of the several leading constituents of the food.
An imperfect elaboration by the tissues of the materials brought to them by the blood.
A salt of malic acid.
Alt. of Malaxate
To soften by kneading or stirring with some thinner substance.
The act of softening by mixing with a thinner substance; the formation of ingredients into a mass for pills or plasters.
One who, or that which, malaxates; esp., a machine for grinding, kneading, or stirring into a pasty or doughy mass.
One of a race of a brown or copper complexion in the Malay Peninsula and the western islands of the Indian Archipelago.
Alt. of Malayan
Of or pertaining to the Malays or their country.
The Malay language.
The name given to one the cultivated Dravidian languages, closely related to the Tamil.
A West African arboreal monkey (Cercopithecus cynosurus).
Imperfect, disproportionate, or abnormal formation; ill form; disproportion of parts.
discontented; uneasy; dissatisfied; especially, dissatisfied with the government.
One who discontented; especially, a discontented subject of a government; one who express his discontent by words or overt acts.
Malcontent.
Any species of marine annelids of the genus Maldane, or family Maldanidae. They have a slender, round body, and make tubes in the sand or mud.
See Mal-.
Evil; wicked; bad.
Same as Mail, a bag.
Of or pertaining to the sex that begets or procreates young, or (in a wider sense) to the sex that produces spermatozoa, by which the ova are fertilized; not female; as, male organs.
Capable of producing fertilization, but not of bearing fruit; -- said of stamens and antheridia, and of the plants, or parts of plants, which bear them.
Suitable to the male sex; characteristic or suggestive of a male; masculine; as, male courage.
Consisting of males; as, a male choir.
Adapted for entering another corresponding piece (the female piece) which is hollow and which it fits; as, a male gauge, for gauging the size or shape of a hole; a male screw, etc.
An animal of the male sex.
A plant bearing only staminate flowers.
Maladministration.
A salt of maleic acid.
The philosophical system of Malebranche, an eminent French metaphysician. The fundamental doctrine of his system is that the mind can not have knowledge of anything external to itself except in its relation to God.
Malconformation.
Malcontent.
Evil speaking.
Speaking reproachfully; slanderous.
Accursed; abominable.
A proclaiming of evil against some one; a cursing; imprecation; a curse or execration; -- opposed to benediction.
A crime; an offense; an evil deed.
An evil doer; one who commits a crime; one subject to public prosecution and punishment; a criminal.
One who does wrong by injuring another, although not a criminal.
A female malefactor.
See Malfeasance.
Doing mischief; causing harm or evil; nefarious; hurtful.
An evil deed; artifice; enchantment.
Evil doing, esp. to others.
Doing evil to others; harmful; mischievous.
Injurious.
To bewitch; to harm.
A bewitching.
The doing of evil, harm, or mischief.
Doing evil, harm, or mischief.
See Malformation.
Pertaining to, or designating, an acid of the ethylene series, metameric with fumaric acid and obtained by heating malic acid.
Evil machination; guile; deceit.
A bird of Celebes (megacephalon maleo), allied to the brush turkey. It makes mounds in which to lay its eggs.
See Malodor.
See Malpractice.
Having the spirit of a male; vigorous; courageous.
A little bag or budget.
See Maltreat.
The quality or state of being malevolent; evil disposition toward another; inclination to injure others; ill will. See Synonym of Malice.
Wishing evil; disposed to injure others; rejoicing in another's misfortune.
In a malevolent manner.
Malevolent.
Bad execution.
A hypothetical radical derived from maleic acid.
The doing of an act which a person ought not to do; evil conduct; an illegal deed.
Ill formation; irregular or anomalous formation; abnormal or wrong conformation or structure.
Not graceful; displeasing.
See Mauger.
Pertaining to, or obtained from, apples; as, malic acid.
Enmity of heart; malevolence; ill will; a spirit delighting in harm or misfortune to another; a disposition to injure another; a malignant design of evil.
Any wicked or mischievous intention of the mind; a depraved inclination to mischief; an intention to vex, annoy, or injure another person, or to do a wrongful act without just cause or cause or excuse; a wanton disregard of the rights or safety of others; willfulness.
To regard with extreme ill will.
Mischief.
Indulging or exercising malice; harboring ill will or enmity.
Proceeding from hatred or ill will; dictated by malice; as, a malicious report; malicious mischief.
With wicked or mischievous intentions or motives; wrongful and done intentionally without just cause or excuse; as, a malicious act.
Having an evil disposition toward others; harboring violent enmity; malevolent; malicious; spiteful; -- opposed to benign.
Unfavorable; unpropitious; pernicious; tending to injure; as, a malign aspect of planets.
Malignant; as, a malign ulcer.
of Malign
of Malign
To treat with malice; to show hatred toward; to abuse; to wrong; to injure.
To speak great evil of; to traduce; to defame; to slander; to vilify; to asperse.
To entertain malice.
Alt. of Malignancy
The state or quality of being malignant; extreme malevolence; bitter enmity; malice; as, malignancy of heart.
Unfavorableness; evil nature.
Virulence; tendency to a fatal issue; as, the malignancy of an ulcer or of a fever.
The state of being a malignant.
Disposed to do harm, inflict suffering, or cause distress; actuated by extreme malevolence or enmity; virulently inimical; bent on evil; malicious.
Characterized or caused by evil intentions; pernicious.
Tending to produce death; threatening a fatal issue; virulent; as, malignant diphtheria.
A man of extrems enmity or evil intentions.
One of the adherents of Charles L. or Charles LL.; -- so called by the opposite party.
In a malignant manner.
One who maligns.
of Malignify
of Malignify
To make malign or malignant.
The state or quality of being malignant; disposition to do evil; virulent enmity; malignancy; malice; spite.
Virulence; deadly quality.
Extreme evilness of nature or influence; perniciousness; heinousness; as, the malignity of fraud.
In a malign manner; with malignity.
of Malinger
of Malinger
To act the part of a malingerer; to feign illness or inability.
In the army, a soldier who feigns himself sick, or who induces or protracts an illness, in order to avoid doing his duty; hence, in general, one who shirks his duty by pretending illness or inability.
The spirit or practices of a malingerer; malingering.
Malediction; curse; execration.
Originally, a kitchenmaid; a slattern.
A mop made of clouts, used by the kitchen servant.
A scarecrow.
A mop or sponge attached to a jointed staff for swabbing out a cannon.
A large heavy wooden beetle; a mallet for driving anything with force; a maul.
A heavy blow.
An old game played with malls or mallets and balls. See Pall-mall.
A place where the game of mall was played. Hence: A public walk; a level shaded walk.
of Mall
of Mall
To beat with a mall; to beat with something heavy; to bruise; to maul.
Formerly, among Teutonic nations, a meeting of the notables of a state for the transaction of public business, such meeting being a modification of the ancient popular assembly.
A court of justice.
A place where justice is administered.
A place where public meetings are held.
A drake; the male of Anas boschas.
A large wild duck (Anas boschas) inhabiting both America and Europe. The domestic duck has descended from this species. Called also greenhead.
The quality or state of being malleable; -- opposed to friability and brittleness.
Capable of being extended or shaped by beating with a hammer, or by the pressure of rollers; -- applied to metals.
To make malleable.
Quality of being malleable.
Pertaining to the malleus.
of Malleate
of Malleate
To hammer; to beat into a plate or leaf.
The act or process of beating into a plate, sheet, or leaf, as a metal; extension by beating.
Same as Malicho.
The leipoa. See Leipoa.
Alt. of Mallemoke
See Mollemoke.
Same as Malanders.
Of or pertaining to the malleolus; in the region of the malleoli of the ankle joint.
of Malleolus
A projection at the distal end of each bone of the leg at the ankle joint. The malleolus of the tibia is the internal projection, that of the fibula the external.
" A layer, " a shoot partly buried in the ground, and there cut halfway through.
A small maul with a short handle, -- used esp. for driving a tool, as a chisel or the like; also, a light beetle with a long handle, -- used in playing croquet.
of Malleus
The outermost of the three small auditory bones, ossicles; the hammer. It is attached to the tympanic membrane by a long process, the handle or manubrium. See Illust. of Far.
One of the hard lateral pieces of the mastax of Rotifera. See Mastax.
A genus of bivalve shells; the hammer shell.
An extensive group of insects which are parasitic on birds and mammals, and feed on the feathers and hair; -- called also bird lice. See Bird louse, under Bird.
A genus of small Arctic fishes. One American species, the capelin (Mallotus villosus), is extensively used as bait for cod.
Alt. of Mallows
A genus of plants (Malva) having mucilaginous qualities. See Malvaceous.
Any plant of the order Malvaceae.
Alt. of Malmbrick
A kind of brick of a light brown or yellowish color, made of sand, clay, and chalk.
A spotted trout (Salvelinus malma), inhabiting Northern America, west of the Rocky Mountains; -- called also Dolly Varden trout, bull trout, red-spotted trout, and golet.
The tarsius, or spectral lemur.
A kind of sweet wine from Crete, the Canary Islands, etc.
Faulty or imperfect nutrition.
Erroneous observation.
An Offensive to the sense of smell; ill-smelling.
At salt of malonic acid.
Pertaining to, or designating, an acid produced artifically as a white crystalline substance, CH2.(CO2H)2, and so called because obtained by the oxidation of malic acid.
A hydrocarbon radical, CH2.(CO)2, from malonic acid.
A genus of tropical American shrubs with opposite leaves and small white or reddish flowers. The drupes of Malpighia urens are eaten under the name of Barbadoes cherries.
Of, pertaining to, or resembling, a natural order of tropical trees and shrubs (Malpighiaceae), some of them climbing plants, and their stems forming many of the curious lianes of South American forests.
Of, pertaining to, or discovered by, Marcello Malpighi, an Italian anatomist of the 17th century.
A wrong position.
Evil practice; illegal or immoral conduct; practice contrary to established rules; specifically, the treatment of a case by a surgeon or physician in a manner which is contrary to accepted rules and productive of unfavorable results.
Barley or other grain, steeped in water and dried in a kiln, thus forcing germination until the saccharine principle has been evolved. It is used in brewing and in the distillation of whisky.
Relating to, containing, or made with, malt.
of Malt
of Malt
To make into malt; as, to malt barley.
To become malt; also, to make grain into malt.
Ill will; malice.
Of or pertaining to Malta or to its inhabitants.
A native or inhabitant of Malta; the people of Malta.
A variety of bitumen, viscid and tenacious, like pitch, unctuous to the touch, and exhaling a bituminous odor.
Mortar.
Of or pertaining to the political economist, the Rev. T. R. Malthus, or conforming to his views; as, Malthusian theories.
A follower of Malthus.
The system of Malthusian doctrines relating to population.
Alt. of Maltine
The fermentative principle of malt; malt diastase; also, a name given to various medicinal preparations made from or containing malt.
The process of making, or of becoming malt.
of Maltman
A man whose occupation is to make malt.
Of, pertaining to, or derived from, maltose; specif., designating an acid called also gluconic or dextronic acid. See Gluconic.
A crystalline sugar formed from starch by the action of distance of malt, and the amylolytic ferment of saliva and pancreatic juice. It resembles dextrose, but rotates the plane of polarized light further to the right and possesses a lower cupric oxide reducing power.
of Maltreat
of Maltreat
To treat ill; to abuse; to treat roughly.
Ill treatment; ill usage; abuse.
A maltman.
A tippler.
Consisting, or like, malt.
of Malum
An evil. See Mala.
Pertaining to, or resembling, a natural order of plants (Malvaceae), of which the mallow is the type. The cotton plant, hollyhock, and abutilon are of this order, and the baobab and the silk-cotton trees are now referred to it.
Evil conduct; fraudulent practices; misbehavior, corruption, or extortion in office.
Malmsey wine. See Malmsey.
Mamma.
See Mamma.
Same as Mameluke.
A rounded hillock; a rounded elevation or protuberance.
A child born of a white father and Indian mother.
One of a body of mounted soldiers recruited from slaves converted to Mohammedanism, who, during several centuries, had more or less control of the government of Egypt, until exterminated or dispersed by Mehemet Ali in 1811.
See Mammillated.
Mother; -- word of tenderness and familiarity.
of Mamma
A glandular organ for secreting milk, characteristic of all mammals, but usually rudimentary in the male; a mammary gland; a breast; under; bag.
of Mammal
One of the Mammalia.
The highest class of Vertebrata. The young are nourished for a time by milk, or an analogous fluid, secreted by the mammary glands of the mother.
Of or pertaining to the Mammalia or mammals.
Containing mammalian remains; -- said of certain strata.
Of or pertaining to mammalogy.
One versed in mammalogy.
The science which relates to mammals or the Mammalia. See Mammalia.
Of or pertaining to the mammae or breasts; as, the mammary arteries and veins.
A fruit tree of tropical America, belonging to the genus Mammea (M. Americana); also, its fruit. The latter is large, covered with a thick, tough ring, and contains a bright yellow pulp of a pleasant taste and fragrant scent. It is often called mammee apple.
To hesitate; to mutter doubtfully.
An idol; a puppet; a doll.
See Mawmetry.
A mammal. See Mammalia.
Having breasts; of, pertaining to, or derived from, the Mammalia.
Having the form of a mamma (breast) or mammae.
of Mammilla
The nipple.
Of or pertaining to the mammilla, or nipple, or to the breast; resembling a mammilla; mammilloid.
Composed of convex convex concretions, somewhat resembling the breasts in form; studded with small mammiform protuberances.
Alt. of Mammillated
Having small nipples, or small protuberances like nipples or mammae.
Bounded like a nipple; -- said of the apex of some shells.
Having the form of a mammilla.
Like a mammilla or nipple; mammilliform.
A shapeless piece; a fragment.
To tear to pieces.
Coarse plain India muslins.
Mastology. See Mammalogy.
Riches; wealth; the god of riches; riches, personified.
Actuated or prompted by a devotion to money getting or the service of Mammon.
Devotion to the pursuit of wealth; worldliness.
A mammonite.
One devoted to the acquisition of wealth or the service of Mammon.
The process of making mammonish; the state of being under the influence of mammonism.
To make mammonish.
Having the form of the breast; breast-shaped.
An extinct, hairy, maned elephant (Elephas primigenius), of enormous size, remains of which are found in the northern parts of both continents. The last of the race, in Europe, were coeval with prehistoric man.
Resembling the mammoth in size; very large; gigantic; as, a mammoth ox.
A child brought up by its grandmother; a spoiled child.
of Mammy
A child's name for mamma, mother.
A person born of relations between whom marriage was forbidden by the Mosaic law; a bastard.
of Man
A human being; -- opposed tobeast.
Especially: An adult male person; a grown-up male person, as distinguished from a woman or a child.
The human race; mankind.
The male portion of the human race.
One possessing in a high degree the distinctive qualities of manhood; one having manly excellence of any kind.
An adult male servant; also, a vassal; a subject.
A term of familiar address often implying on the part of the speaker some degree of authority, impatience, or haste; as, Come, man, we 've no time to lose!
A married man; a husband; -- correlative to wife.
One, or any one, indefinitely; -- a modified survival of the Saxon use of man, or mon, as an indefinite pronoun.
One of the piece with which certain games, as chess or draughts, are played.
of Man
of Man
To supply with men; to furnish with a sufficient force or complement of men, as for management, service, defense, or the like; to guard; as, to man a ship, boat, or fort.
To furnish with strength for action; to prepare for efficiency; to fortify.
To tame, as a hawk.
To furnish with a servants.
To wait on as a manservant.
Marriageable.
Same as Menace.
A handcuff; a shackle for the hand or wrist; -- usually in the plural.
of Manacle
of Manacle
To put handcuffs or other fastening upon, for confining the hands; to shackle; to confine; to restrain from the use of the limbs or natural powers.
The handling or government of anything, but esp. of a horse; management; administration. See Manege.
of Manage
of Manage
To have under control and direction; to conduct; to guide; to administer; to treat; to handle.
Hence: Esp., to guide by careful or delicate treatment; to wield with address; to make subservient by artful conduct; to bring around cunningly to one's plans.
To train in the manege, as a horse; to exercise in graceful or artful action.
To treat with care; to husband.
To bring about; to contrive.
To direct affairs; to carry on business or affairs; to administer.
The state or quality of being manageable; manageableness.
Such as can be managed or used; suffering control; governable; tractable; subservient; as, a manageable horse.
Unmanageable.
The act or art of managing; the manner of treating, directing, carrying on, or using, for a purpose; conduct; administration; guidance; control; as, the management of a family or of a farm; the management of state affairs.
Business dealing; negotiation; arrangement.
Judicious use of means to accomplish an end; conduct directed by art or address; skillful treatment; cunning practice; -- often in a bad sense.
The collective body of those who manage or direct any enterprise or interest; the board of managers.
One who manages; a conductor or director; as, the manager of a theater.
A person who conducts business or household affairs with economy and frugality; a good economist.
A contriver; an intriguer.
Of or pertaining to management or a manager; as, managerial qualities.
The office or position of a manager.
Management; manner of using; conduct; direction.
Husbandry; economy; frugality.
Any one of numerous small birds belonging to Pipra, Manacus, and other genera of the family Pipridae. They are mostly natives of Central and South America. some are bright-colored, and others have the wings and tail curiously ornamented. The name is sometimes applied to related birds of other families.
A dwarf. See Manikin.
Any species of Trichechus, a genus of sirenians; -- called alsosea cow.
The act of issuing or flowing out.
A sum paid to a lord as a pecuniary compensation for killing his man (that is, his vassal, servant, or tenant).
See Mancus.
A sleeve.
Fine white bread; a loaf of fine bread.
A euphorbiaceous tree (Hippomane Mancinella) of tropical America, having a poisonous and blistering milky juice, and poisonous acrid fruit somewhat resembling an apple.
Of or pertaining to Manchuria or its inhabitants.
A native or inhabitant of Manchuria; also, the language spoken by the Manchus.
To enslave; to bind; to restrict.
Slavery; involuntary servitude.
A steward; a purveyor, particularly of a college or Inn of Court.
See Sassy bark.
An old Anglo Saxon coin both of gold and silver, and of variously estimated values. The silver mancus was equal to about one shilling of modern English money.
A combining form denoting divination; as, aleuromancy, chiromancy, necromancy, etc.
A demand.
A writ issued by a superior court and directed to some inferior tribunal, or to some corporation or person exercising authority, commanding the performance of some specified duty.
A Chinese public officer or nobleman; a civil or military official in China and Annam.
A small orange, with easily separable rind. It is thought to be of Chinese origin, and is counted a distinct species (Citrus nobilis)mandarin orange; tangerine --.
The collective body of officials or persons of rank in China.
Appropriate or peculiar to a mandarin.
The process of giving an orange color to goods formed of animal tissue, as silk or wool, not by coloring matter, but by producing a certain change in the fiber by the action of dilute nitric acid.
A government mandarins; character or spirit of the mandarins.
One to whom a command or charge is given; hence, specifically, a person to whom the pope has, by his prerogative, given a mandate or order for his benefice.
One who undertakes to discharge a specific business commission; a mandatory.
An official or authoritative command; an order or injunction; a commission; a judicial precept.
A rescript of the pope, commanding an ordinary collator to put the person therein named in possession of the first vacant benefice in his collation.
A contract by which one employs another to manage any business for him. By the Roman law, it must have been gratuitous.
A director; one who gives a mandate or order.
The person who employs another to perform a mandate.
Containing a command; preceptive; directory.
Same as Mandatary.
A salt of mandelic acid.
Pertaining to an acid first obtained from benzoic aldehyde (oil of better almonds), as a white crystalline substance; -- called also phenyl glycolic acid.
See Maunder.
A mandrel.
The bone, or principal bone, of the lower jaw; the inferior maxilla; -- also applied to either the upper or the lower jaw in the beak of birds.
The anterior pair of mouth organs of insects, crustaceaus, and related animals, whether adapted for biting or not. See Illust. of Diptera.
Of or pertaining to a mandible; like a mandible.
The principal mandibular bone; the mandible.
Alt. of Mandibulated
Provided with mandibles adapted for biting, as many insects.
An insect having mandibles.
Having the form of a mandible; -- said especially of the maxillae of an insect when hard and adapted for biting.
Pertaining both to the mandibular and the hyoid arch, or situated between them.
A loose outer garment worn the 16th and 17th centuries.
See Mandil.
; sing. Mandingo. (Ethnol.) An extensive and powerful tribe of West African negroes.
Alt. of Mandioca
See Manioc.
Amygdaloid.
Commandment.
Alt. of Mandoline
A small and beautifully shaped instrument resembling the lute.
A kind of four-stringed lute.
A genus of plants; the mandrake. See Mandrake, 1.
One who habitually intoxicates himself with a narcotic obtained from mandrake.
A low plant (Mandragora officinarum) of the Nightshade family, having a fleshy root, often forked, and supposed to resemble a man. It was therefore supposed to have animal life, and to cry out when pulled up. All parts of the plant are strongly narcotic. It is found in the Mediterranean region.
The May apple (Podophyllum peltatum). See May apple under May, and Podophyllum.
A bar of metal inserted in the work to shape it, or to hold it, as in a lathe, during the process of manufacture; an arbor.
The live spindle of a turning lathe; the revolving arbor of a circular saw. It is usually driven by a pulley.
a large West African baboon (Cynocephalus, / Papio, mormon). The adult male has, on the sides of the nose, large, naked, grooved swellings, conspicuously striped with blue and red.
Such as can be chewed; fit to be eaten.
of Manducate
of Manducate
To masticate; to chew; to eat.
The act of chewing.
Pertaining to, or employed in, chewing.
A grotesque mask, representing a person chewing or grimacing, worn in processions and by comic actors on the stage.
The long and heavy hair growing on the upper side of, or about, the neck of some quadrupedal animals, as the horse, the lion, etc. See Illust. of Horse.
One who, or that which, has an appetite for human flesh; specifically, one of certain large sharks (esp. Carcharodon Rondeleti); also, a lion or a tiger which has acquired the habit of feeding upon human flesh.
Having a mane.
Art of horsemanship, or of training horses.
A school for teaching horsemanship, and for training horses.
A Hebrew weight for gold or silver, being one hundred shekels of gold and sixty shekels of silver.
Having no mane.
An artist's model of wood or other material.
See Manorial.
The benevolent spirits of the dead, especially of dead ancestors, regarded as family deities and protectors.
A covering placed over the upper part of a horse's head.
Alt. of Manoeuvre
Management; dexterous movement; specif., a military or naval evolution, movement, or change of position.
Management with address or artful design; adroit proceeding; stratagem.
of Manoeuvre
of Manoeuvre
of Manoeuvre
of Manoeuvre
Alt. of Manoeuvre
To perform a movement or movements in military or naval tactics; to make changes in position with reference to getting advantage in attack or defense.
To manage with address or art; to scheme.
Alt. of Manoeuvre
To change the positions of, as of troops of ships.
Alt. of Manoeuvrer
One who maneuvers.
Showing manliness, or manly spirit; hence, brave, courageous, resolute, noble.
Any one of several African monkeys of the genus Cercocebus, as the sooty mangabey (C. fuliginosus), which is sooty black.
See Mangonel.
A salt of manganic acid.
A manganate.
An element obtained by reduction of its oxide, as a hard, grayish white metal, fusible with difficulty, but easily oxidized. Its ores occur abundantly in nature as the minerals pyrolusite, manganite, etc. Symbol Mn. Atomic weight 54.8.
Manganic.
Manganic.
Manganous.
Manganese.
Manganous.
Of, pertaining to resembling, or containing, manganese; specif., designating compounds in which manganese has a higher valence as contrasted with manganous compounds.  Cf. Manganous.
Containing manganese.
One of the oxides of manganese; -- called also gray manganese ore. It occurs in brilliant steel-gray or iron-black crystals, also massive.
A compound of manganese dioxide with a metallic oxide; so called as though derived from the hypothetical manganous acid.
Manganese.
Of, pertaining to, designating, those compounds of manganese in which the element has a lower valence as contrasted with manganic compounds; as, manganous oxide.
A mixture of wheat and rye, or other species of grain.
The scab or itch in cattle, dogs, and other beasts.
A kind of large field beet (B. macrorhiza), used as food for cattle, -- by some considered a mere variety of the ordinary beet. See Beet.
A trough or open box in which fodder is placed for horses or cattle to eat.
The fore part of the deck, having a bulkhead athwart ships high enough to prevent water which enters the hawse holes from running over it.
In a mangy manner; scabbily.
The condition or quality of being mangy.
of Mangle
of Mangle
To cut or bruise with repeated blows or strokes, making a ragged or torn wound, or covering with wounds; to tear in cutting; to cut in a bungling manner; to lacerate; to mutilate.
To mutilate or injure, in making, doing, or pertaining; as, to mangle a piece of music or a recitation.
A machine for smoothing linen or cotton cloth, as sheets, tablecloths, napkins, and clothing, by roller pressure.
To smooth with a mangle, as damp linen or cloth.
One who mangles or tears in cutting; one who mutilates any work in doing it.
One who smooths with a mangle.
of Mango
The fruit of the mango tree. It is rather larger than an apple, and of an ovoid shape. Some varieties are fleshy and luscious, and others tough and tasting of turpentine. The green fruit is pickled for market.
A green muskmelon stuffed and pickled.
See Mangel-wurzel.
A military engine formerly used for throwing stones and javelins.
The art of mangonizing, or setting off to advantage.
One who mangonizes.
A slave dealer; also, a strumpet.
To furbish up for sale; to set off to advantage.
Alt. of Mangostan
A tree of the East Indies of the genus Garcinia (G. Mangostana). The tree grows to the height of eighteen feet, and bears fruit also called mangosteen, of the size of a small apple, the pulp of which is very delicious food.
The name of one or two trees of the genus Rhizophora (R. Mangle, and R. mucronata, the last doubtfully distinct) inhabiting muddy shores of tropical regions, where they spread by emitting aerial roots, which fasten in the saline mire and eventually become new stems. The seeds also send down a strong root while yet attached to the parent plant.
The mango fish.
The kusimanse.
Infected with the mange; scabby.
See Menhaden.
Manhood.
A hole through which a man may descend or creep into a drain, sewer, steam boiler, parts of machinery, etc., for cleaning or repairing.
The state of being man as a human being, or man as distinguished from a child or a woman.
Manly quality; courage; bravery; resolution.
Violent derangement of mind; madness; insanity.  Cf. Delirium.
Excessive or unreasonable desire; insane passion affecting one or many people; as, the tulip mania.
Manageable.
Raving with madness; raging with disordered intellect; affected with mania; mad.
A raving lunatic; a madman.
Affected with, or characterized by, madness; maniac.
Covered with hairs or pubescence so platted together and interwoven as to form a mass easily removed.
Alt. of Manichee
Alt. of Manichee
A believer in the doctrines of Manes, a Persian of the third century A. D., who taught a dualism in which Light is regarded as the source of Good, and Darkness as the source of Evil.
Alt. of Manichean
Of or pertaining to the Manichaeans.
Alt. of Manicheism
The doctrines taught, or system of principles maintained, by the Manichaeans.
Manichaean.
Alt. of Manichordon
The clavichord or clarichord; -- called also dumb spinet.
A person who makes a business of taking care of people's hands, especially their nails.
Any species of the genus Manis, or family Manidae.
Mania; insanity.
Evident to the senses, esp. to the sight; apparent; distinctly perceived; hence, obvious to the understanding; apparent to the mind; easily apprehensible; plain; not obscure or hidden.
Detected; convicted; -- with of.
of Manifest
A public declaration; an open statement; a manifesto. See Manifesto.
A list or invoice of a ship's cargo, containing a description by marks, numbers, etc., of each package of goods, to be exhibited at the customhouse.
of Manifest
of Manifest
To show plainly; to make to appear distinctly, -- usually to the mind; to put beyond question or doubt; to display; to exhibit.
To exhibit the manifests or prepared invoices of; to declare at the customhouse.
Such as can be manifested.
The act of manifesting or disclosing, or the state of being manifested; discovery to the eye or to the understanding; also, that which manifests; exhibition; display; revelation; as, the manifestation of God's power in creation.
Manifestable.
In a manifest manner.
The quality or state of being manifest; obviousness.
of Manifesto
A public declaration, usually of a prince, sovereign, or other person claiming large powers, showing his intentions, or proclaiming his opinions and motives in reference to some act done or contemplated by him; as, a manifesto declaring the purpose of a prince to begin war, and explaining his motives.
Various in kind or quality; many in number; numerous; multiplied; complicated.
Exhibited at divers times or in various ways; -- used to qualify nouns in the singular number.
A copy of a writing made by the manifold process.
A cylindrical pipe fitting, having a number of lateral outlets, for connecting one pipe with several others.
The third stomach of a ruminant animal.
of Manifold
of Manifold
To take copies of by the process of manifold writing; as, to manifold a letter.
Having many folds, layers, or plates; as, a manifolded shield.
In a manifold manner.
Multiplicity.
A generalized concept of magnitude.
Shaped like the hand.
Either one of two handles on the back of a piece of ordnance.
Alt. of Manihot
See Manioc.
A little man; a dwarf; a pygmy; a manakin.
A model of the human body, made of papier-mache or other material, commonly in detachable pieces, for exhibiting the different parts and organs, their relative position, etc.
Alt. of Manilla
Of or pertaining to Manila or Manilla, the capital of the Philippine Islands; made in, or exported from, that city.
See Manilla, 1.
A ring worn upon the arm or leg as an ornament, especially among the tribes of Africa.
A piece of copper of the shape of a horseshoe, used as money by certain tribes of the west coast of Africa.
Same as Manila.
See 1st Manilla, 1.
The tropical plants (Manihot utilissima, and M. Aipi), from which cassava and tapioca are prepared; also, cassava.
A handful.
A division of the Roman army numbering sixty men exclusive of officers, any small body of soldiers; a company.
Originally, a napkin; later, an ornamental band or scarf worn upon the left arm as a part of the vestments of a priest in the Roman Catholic Church. It is sometimes worn in the English Church service.
Of or pertaining to the maniple, or company.
Manipulatory; as, manipular operations.
of Manipulate
of Manipulate
To treat, work, or operate with the hands, especially when knowledge and dexterity are required; to manage in hand work; to handle; as, to manipulate scientific apparatus.
To control the action of, by management; as, to manipulate a convention of delegates; to manipulate the stock market; also, to manage artfully or fraudulently; as, to manipulate accounts, or election returns.
To use the hands in dexterous operations; to do hand work; specifically, to manage the apparatus or instruments used in scientific work, or in artistic or mechanical processes; also, specifically, to use the hand in mesmeric operations.
The act or process of manipulating, or the state of being manipulated; the act of handling work by hand; use of the hands, in an artistic or skillful manner, in science or art.
The use of the hands in mesmeric operations.
Artful management; as, the manipulation of political bodies; sometimes, a management or treatment for purposes of deception or fraud.
Of or pertaining to manipulation; performed by manipulation.
One who manipulates.
Of or pertaining to manipulation.
A genus of edentates, covered with large, hard, triangular scales, with sharp edges that overlap each other like tiles on a roof. They inhabit the warmest parts of Asia and Africa, and feed on ants. Called also Scaly anteater. See Pangolin.
Alt. of Manitu
Alt. of Manitu
A name given by tribes of American Indians to a great spirit, whether good or evil, or to any object of worship.
The anterior segment of the thorax in insects. See Insect.
The human race; man, taken collectively.
Men, as distinguished from women; the male portion of human race.
Human feelings; humanity.
Manlike; not womanly; masculine; bold; cruel.
Of or pertaining to the language or people of the of Man.
The language spoken in the Isle of Man. See Manx.
Destitute of men.
Unmanly; inhuman.
Inhumanly.
Like man, or like a man, in form or nature; having the qualities of a man, esp. the nobler qualities; manly.
The quality or state of being manly.
A little man.
Having qualities becoming to a man; not childish or womanish; manlike, esp. brave, courageous, resolute, noble.
In a manly manner; with the courage and fortitude of a manly man; as, to act manly.
The food supplied to the Israelites in their journey through the wilderness of Arabia; hence, divinely supplied food.
A name given to lichens of the genus Lecanora, sometimes blown into heaps in the deserts of Arabia and Africa, and gathered and used as food.
A sweetish exudation in the form of pale yellow friable flakes, coming from several trees and shrubs and used in medicine as a gentle laxative, as the secretion of Fraxinus Ornus, and F. rotundifolia, the manna ashes of Southern Europe.
The portions of hard wheat kernels not ground into flour by the millstones: a kind of semolina prepared in Russia and used for puddings, soups, etc. -- called also manna groats.
The husked grains of manna grass.
Mode of action; way of performing or effecting anything; method; style; form; fashion.
Characteristic mode of acting, conducting, carrying one's self, or the like; bearing; habitual style.
Customary method of acting; habit.
Carriage; behavior; deportment; also, becoming behavior; well-bred carriage and address.
The style of writing or thought of an author; characteristic peculiarity of an artist.
Certain degree or measure; as, it is in a manner done already.
Sort; kind; style; -- in this application sometimes having the sense of a plural, sorts or kinds.
Having a certain way, esp. a polite way, of carrying and conducting one's self.
Affected with mannerism; marked by excess of some characteristic peculiarity.
Adherence to a peculiar style or manner; a characteristic mode of action, bearing, or treatment, carried to excess, especially in literature or art.
One addicted to mannerism; a person who, in action, bearing, or treatment, carries characteristic peculiarities to excess. See citation under Mannerism.
The quality or state of being mannerly; civility; complaisance.
Showing good manners; civil; respectful; complaisant.
With good manners.
A kind of brass made in imitation of gold. It contains eighty per cent of copper and twenty of zinc.
A white amorphous or crystalline substance, obtained by dehydration of mannite, and distinct from, but convertible into, mannitan.
Resembling a human being in form or nature; human.
Resembling, suitable to, or characteristic of, a man, manlike, masculine.
Fond of men; -- said of a woman.
A white amorphous or crystalline substance obtained by the partial dehydration of mannite.
A salt of mannitic acid.
A white crystalline substance of a sweet taste obtained from a so-called manna, the dried sap of the flowering ash (Fraxinus ornus); -- called also mannitol, and hydroxy hexane.  Cf. Dulcite.
A sweet white efflorescence from dried fronds of kelp, especially from those of the Laminaria saccharina, or devil's apron.
Of, pertaining to, resembling, or derived from, mannite.
The technical name of mannite. See Mannite.
A variety of sugar obtained by the partial oxidation of mannite, and closely resembling levulose.
See Maneuver.
of Manofwar
A government vessel employed for the purposes of war, esp. one of large size; a ship of war.
An instrument for measuring the tension or elastic force of gases, steam, etc., constructed usually on the principle of allowing the gas to exert its elastic force in raising a column of mercury in an open tube, or in compressing a portion of air or other gas in a closed tube with mercury or other liquid intervening, or in bending a metallic or other spring so as to set in motion an index; a pressure gauge. See Pressure, and Illust. of Air pump.
Alt. of Manometrical
Of or pertaining to the manometer; made by the manometer.
The land belonging to a lord or nobleman, or so much land as a lord or great personage kept in his own hands, for the use and subsistence of his family.
A tract of land occupied by tenants who pay a free-farm rent to the proprietor, sometimes in kind, and sometimes by performing certain stipulated services.
Of or pertaining to a manor.
Same as Manometer.
The science of the determination of the density of vapors and gases.
A contrivance or maneuvering to catch game illegally.
A killer of men; a manslayer.
Alt. of Manrent
Homage or service rendered to a superior, as to a lord; vassalage.
One of the side ropes to the gangway of a ship.
A hipped curb roof; that is, a roof having on all sides two slopes, the lower one being steeper than the upper one.
A dwelling house, generally with land attached.
The parsonage; a clergyman's house.
A male servant.
A dwelling place, -- whether a part or whole of a house or other shelter.
The house of the lord of a manor; a manor house; hence: Any house of considerable size or pretension.
A twelfth part of the heavens; a house. See 1st House, 8.
The place in the heavens occupied each day by the moon in its monthly revolution.
To dwell; to reside.
Resident; residentiary; as, mansionary canons.
The state of dwelling or residing; occupancy as a dwelling place.
The slaying of a human being; destruction of men.
The unlawful killing of a man, either in negligenc/ or incidentally to the commission of some unlawful act, but without specific malice, or upon a sudden excitement of anger.
One who kills a human being; one who commits manslaughter.
A person who steals or kidnaps a human being or beings.
The act or business of stealing or kidnaping human beings, especially with a view to e/slave them.
Tame; gentle; kind.
Tameness; gentleness; mildness.
To swear falsely. Same as Mainswear.
See Coleoptera and Sea devil.
Same as Manchu.
of Manteau
of Manteau
A woman's cloak or mantle.
A gown worn by women.
The finish around a fireplace, covering the chimney-breast in front and sometimes on both sides; especially, a shelf above the fireplace, and its supports.
A short cloak formerly worn by knights.
A short cloak or mantle worn by women.
A musket-proof shield of rope, wood, or metal, which is sometimes used for the protection of sappers or riflemen while attacking a fortress, or of gunners at embrasures; -- now commonly written mantlet.
Same as Mantel.
The shelf of a mantel.
The lintel of a fireplace when of wood, as frequently in early houses.
Of or pertaining to divination, or to the condition of one inspired, or supposed to be inspired, by a deity; prophetic.
A lady's light cloak of cape of silk, velvet, lace, or the like.
A kind of veil, covering the head and falling down upon the shoulders; -- worn in Spain, Mexico, etc.
Any one of numerous species of voracious orthopterous insects of the genus Mantis, and allied genera. They are remarkable for their slender grotesque forms, and for holding their stout anterior legs in a manner suggesting hands folded in prayer. The common American species is M. Carolina.
Any neuropterous insect of the genus Mantispa, and allied genera. The larvae feed on plant lice. Also used adjectively. See Illust. under Neuroptera.
The decimal part of a logarithm, as distinguished from the integral part, or characteristic.
A loose garment to be worn over other garments; an enveloping robe; a cloak. Hence, figuratively, a covering or concealing envelope.
Same as Mantling.
The external fold, or folds, of the soft, exterior membrane of the body of a mollusk. It usually forms a cavity inclosing the gills. See Illusts. of Buccinum, and Byssus.
Any free, outer membrane.
The back of a bird together with the folded wings.
A mantel. See Mantel.
The outer wall and casing of a blast furnace, above the hearth.
A penstock for a water wheel.
of Mantle
of Mantle
To cover or envelop, as with a mantle; to cloak; to hide; to disguise.
To unfold and spread out the wings, like a mantle; -- said of hawks. Also used figuratively.
To spread out; -- said of wings.
To spread over the surface as a covering; to overspread; as, the scum mantled on the pool.
To gather, assume, or take on, a covering, as froth, scum, etc.
See Mantelet.
The representation of a mantle, or the drapery behind and around a coat of arms: -- called also lambrequin.
See Manteau.
One who is skilled in mantology; a diviner.
The act or art of divination.
A prayer; an invocation; a religious formula; a charm.
A trap for catching trespassers.
A dangerous place, as an open hatch, into which one may fall.
A superior kind of rich silk formerly exported from Mantua in Italy.
A woman's cloak or mantle; also, a woman's gown.
One who makes dresses, cloaks, etc., for women; a dressmaker.
Of or pertaining to Mantua.
A native or inhabitant of Mantua.
One of a series of progenitors of human beings, and authors of human wisdom.
Of or pertaining to the hand; done or made by the hand; as, manual labor; the king's sign manual.
A small book, such as may be carried in the hand, or conveniently handled; a handbook; specifically, the service book of the Roman Catholic Church.
A keyboard of an organ or harmonium for the fingers, as distinguished from the pedals; a clavier, or set of keys.
A prescribed exercise in the systematic handing of a weapon; as, the manual of arms; the manual of the sword; the manual of the piece (cannon, mortar, etc.).
One who works with the hands; an artificer.
By hand.
Manual.
An artificer.
Belonging to spoils; taken in war.
Of or pertaining to a manubrium; shaped like a manubrium; handlelike.
of Manubrium
of Manubrium
A handlelike process or part; esp., the anterior segment of the sternum, or presternum, and the handlelike process of the malleus.
The proboscis of a jellyfish; -- called also hypostoma. See Illust. of Hydromedusa.
Any bird of the genus Manucodia, of Australia and New Guinea. They are related to the bird of paradise.
One who leads by the hand; a manuductor.
Guidance by the hand.
A conductor; an officer in the ancient church who gave the signal for the choir to sing, and who beat time with the hand, and regulated the music.
of Manufactory
Manufacture.
A building or place where anything is manufactured; a factory.
Pertaining to manufacturing.
Of or pertaining to manufactures.
The operation of making wares or any products by hand, by machinery, or by other agency.
Anything made from raw materials by the hand, by machinery, or by art, as cloths, iron utensils, shoes, machinery, saddlery, etc.
of Manufacture
of Manufacture
To make (wares or other products) by hand, by machinery, or by other agency; as, to manufacture cloth, nails, glass, etc.
To work, as raw or partly wrought materials, into suitable forms for use; as, to manufacture wool, cotton, silk, or iron.
To be employed in manufacturing something.
One who manufactures.
Employed, or chiefly employed, in manufacture; as, a manufacturing community; a manufacturing town.
Pertaining to manufacture; as, manufacturing projects.
A wild cat (Felis manul), having long, soft, light-colored fur. It is found in the mountains of Central Asia, and dwells among rocks.
To manumit.
The act of manumitting, or of liberating a slave from bondage.
of Manumit
of Manumit
To release from slavery; to liberate from personal bondage or servitude; to free, as a slave.
Movable by hand.
A small wheel carriage, so constructed that a person sitting in it may move it.
Capable of cultivation.
Capable of receiving a fertilizing substance.
Cultivation.
Cultivation.
of Manure
of Manure
To cultivate by manual labor; to till; hence, to develop by culture.
To apply manure to; to enrich, as land, by the application of a fertilizing substance.
Any matter which makes land productive; a fertilizing substance, as the contents of stables and barnyards, dung, decaying animal or vegetable substances, etc.
Cultivation.
One who manures land.
Relating to manures.
The act of process of applying manure; also, the manure applied.
of Manus
The distal segment of the fore limb, including the carpus and fore foot or hand.
Written with or by the hand; not printed; as, a manuscript volume.
A literary or musical composition written with the hand, as distinguished from a printed copy.
Writing, as opposed to print; as, the book exists only in manuscript.
Manuscript.
Maintenance.
A small passageway, as in a mine, that a man may pass through.
Of or pertaining to the Isle of Man, or its inhabitants; as, the Manx language.
The language of the inhabitants of the Isle of Man, a dialect of the Celtic.
A retinue of servants; a household.
Consisting of a great number; numerous; not few.
The populace; the common people; the majority of people, or of a community.
A large or considerable number.
Having many faculties; versatile; many-sided.
The third division, or that between the reticulum, or honeycomb stomach, and the abomasum, or rennet stomach, in the stomach of ruminants; the omasum; the psalterium. So called from the numerous folds in its mucous membrane. See Illust of Ruminant.
Having many sides; -- said of figures. Hence, presenting many questions or subjects for consideration; as, a many-sided topic.
Interested in, and having an aptitude for, many unlike pursuits or objects of attention; versatile.
Alt. of Manywise
In many different ways; variously.
A name given to several species of Arctostaphylos, but mostly to A. glauca and A. pungens, shrubs of California, Oregon, etc., with reddish smooth bark, ovate or oval coriaceous evergreen leaves, and bearing clusters of red berries, which are said to be a favorite food of the grizzly bear.
of Maori
One of the aboriginal inhabitants of New Zealand; also, the original language of New Zealand.
Of or pertaining to the Maoris or to their language.
A representation of the surface of the earth, or of some portion of it, showing the relative position of the parts represented; -- usually on a flat surface. Also, such a representation of the celestial sphere, or of some part of it.
Anything which represents graphically a succession of events, states, or acts; as, an historical map.
of Map
of Map
To represent by a map; -- often with out; as, to survey and map, or map out, a county. Hence, figuratively: To represent or indicate systematically and clearly; to sketch; to plan; as, to map, or map out, a journey; to map out business.
The raccoon.
A tree of the genus Acer, including about fifty species. A. saccharinum is the rock maple, or sugar maple, from the sap of which sugar is made, in the United States, in great quantities, by evaporation; the red or swamp maple is A. rubrum; the silver maple, A. dasycarpum, having fruit wooly when young; the striped maple, A. Pennsylvanium, called also moosewood. The common maple of Europe is A. campestre, the sycamore maple is A. Pseudo-platanus, and the Norway maple is A. platanoides.
Having or consisting of lines resembling a map; as, the maplike figures in which certain lichens grow.
The making, or study, of maps.
A Chilian shrub (Aristotelia Maqui). Its bark furnishes strings for musical instruments, and a medicinal wine is made from its berries.
A small lake. See Mere.
of Mar
of Mar
To make defective; to do injury to, esp. by cutting off or defacing a part; to impair; to disfigure; to deface.
To spoil; to ruin.
A mark or blemish made by bruising, scratching, or the like; a disfigurement.
The principal or ruling evil spirit.
A female demon who torments people in sleep by crouching on their chests or stomachs, or by causing terrifying visions.
The Patagonian cavy (Dolichotis Patagonicus).
A large stork of the genus Leptoptilos (formerly Ciconia), esp. the African species (L. crumenifer), which furnishes plumes worn as ornaments. The Asiatic species (L. dubius, or L. argala) is the adjutant. See Adjutant.
One having five eighths negro blood; the offspring of a mulatto and a griffe.
A Mohammedan saint; especially, one who claims to work cures supernaturally.
A macaw.
A sacred inclosure or temple; -- so called by the islanders of the Pacific Ocean.
"Our Lord cometh;" -- an expression used by St. Paul at the conclusion of his first Epistle to the Corinthians (xvi. 22). This word has been used in anathematizing persons for great crimes; as much as to say, "May the Lord come quickly to take vengeance of thy crimes." See Anathema maranatha, under Anathema.
A genus of endogenous plants found in tropical America, and some species also in India. They have tuberous roots containing a large amount of starch, and from one species (Maranta arundinacea) arrowroot is obtained. Many kinds are cultivated for ornament.
A liqueur distilled from fermented cherry juice, and flavored with the pit of a variety of cherry which grows in Dalmatia.
A wasting of flesh without fever or apparent disease; a kind of consumption; atrophy; phthisis.
of Maraud
of Maraud
To rove in quest of plunder; to make an excursion for booty; to plunder.
An excursion for plundering.
A rover in quest of booty or plunder; a plunderer; one who pillages.
A small copper coin of Spain, equal to three mils American money, less than a farthing sterling. Also, an ancient Spanish gold coin.
A massive, compact limestone; a variety of calcite, capable of being polished and used for architectural and ornamental purposes. The color varies from white to black, being sometimes yellow, red, and green, and frequently beautifully veined or clouded. The name is also given to other rocks of like use and appearance, as serpentine or verd antique marble, and less properly to polished porphyry, granite, etc.
A thing made of, or resembling, marble, as a work of art, or record, in marble; or, in the plural, a collection of such works; as, the Arundel or Arundelian marbles; the Elgin marbles.
A little ball of marble, or of some other hard substance, used as a plaything by children; or, in the plural, a child's game played with marbles.
Made of, or resembling, marble; as, a marble mantel; marble paper.
Cold; hard; unfeeling; as, a marble breast or heart.
of Marble
of Marble
To stain or vein like marble; to variegate in color; as, to marble the edges of a book, or the surface of paper.
Made of, or faced with, marble.
Made to resemble marble; veined or spotted like marble.
Varied with irregular markings, or witch a confused blending of irregular spots and streaks.
Having the edge veined or spotted with different colors like marble, as a book.
of Marbleize
of Marbleize
To stain or grain in imitation of marble; to cover with a surface resembling marble; as, to marbleize slate, wood, or iron.
One who works upon marble or other stone.
One who colors or stains in imitation of marble.
The art or practice of variegating in color, in imitation of marble.
An intermixture of fat and lean in meat, giving it a marbled appearance.
Distinct markings resembling the variegations of marble, as on birds and insects.
Containing, or resembling, marble.
A cloth woven so as to imitate the appearance of marble; -- much used in the 15th and 16th centuries.
The refuse matter which remains after the pressure of fruit, particularly of grapes.
A weight of various commodities, esp. of gold and silver, used in different European countries. In France and Holland it was equal to eight ounces.
A coin formerly current in England and Scotland, equal to thirteen shillings and four pence.
A German coin and money of account. See Mark.
A merchant.
A sulphide of iron resembling pyrite or common iron pyrites in composition, but differing in form; white iron pyrites.
Alt. of Marcasitical
Containing, or having the nature of, marcasite.
A young wild boar.
In a marked emphatic manner; -- used adverbially as a direction.
A thin silk fabric used for linings, etc., in ladies' dresses.
Withering without/ falling off; fading; decaying.
Li/ble to wither or decay.
The third month of the year, containing thirty-one days.
A territorial border or frontier; a region adjacent to a boundary line; a confine; -- used chiefly in the plural, and in English history applied especially to the border land on the frontiers between England and Scotland, and England and Wales.
To border; to be contiguous; to lie side by side.
of March
of March
To move with regular steps, as a soldier; to walk in a grave, deliberate, or stately manner; to advance steadily.
To proceed by walking in a body or in military order; as, the German army marched into France.
TO cause to move with regular steps in the manner of a soldier; to cause to move in military array, or in a body, as troops; to cause to advance in a steady, regular, or stately manner; to cause to go by peremptory command, or by force.
The act of marching; a movement of soldiers from one stopping place to another; military progress; advance of troops.
Hence: Measured and regular advance or movement, like that of soldiers moving in order; stately or deliberate walk; steady onward movement.
The distance passed over in marching; as, an hour's march; a march of twenty miles.
A piece of music designed or fitted to accompany and guide the movement of troops; a piece of music in the march form.
One who marches.
The lord or officer who defended the marches or borders of a territory.
Alt. of Merchet
In old English and in Scots law, a fine paid to the lord of the soil by a tenant upon the marriage of one the tenant's daughters.
a. & n., fr. March, v.
The wife or the widow of a marquis; a woman who has the rank and dignity of a marquis.
Extremely rash; foolhardy. See under March, the month.
A person living in the marches between England and Scotland or Wales.
A kind of sweet bread or biscuit; a cake of pounded almonds and sugar.
A warden of the marches; a marcher.
Under the influence of Mars; courageous; bold.
Pining; lean; withered.
Characterized by emaciation, as a fever.
The state or quality of being withered or lean.
A follower of Marcion, a Gnostic of the second century, who adopted the Oriental notion of the two conflicting principles, and imagined that between them there existed a third power, neither wholly good nor evil, the Creator of the world and of man, and the God of the Jewish dispensation.
A celebrated Rhine wine.
A wasting away of flesh; decay.
One of a Gnostic sect of the second century, so called from Marcus, an Egyptian, who was reputed to be a margician.
The last day of Carnival; Shrove Tuesday; -- in some cities a great day of carnival and merrymaking.
The female of the horse and other equine quadrupeds.
Sighing, suffocative panting, intercepted utterance, with a sense of pressure across the chest, occurring during sleep; the incubus; -- obsolete, except in the compound nightmare.
A kind of large yellow rose.
A Marsh.
A European whitefish of the genus Coregonus.
A military officer of high rank; a marshal.
A supposed discovery which turns out to be a hoax; something grosaly absurd.
A long streaky cloud, spreading out like a horse's tail, and believed to indicate rain; a cirrus cloud. See Cloud.
An aquatic plant of the genus Hippuris (H. vulgaris), having narrow leaves in whorls.
A compound of the so-called margaric acid with a base.
Pertaining to, or resembling, pearl; pearly.
A fatty substance, extracted from animal fats and certain vegetable oils, formerly supposed to be a definite compound of glycerin and margaric acid, but now known to be simply a mixture or combination of tristearin and teipalmitin.
Pertaining to, or resembling, pearl; pearly.
A pearl.
A mineral related to the micas, but low in silica and yielding brittle folia with pearly luster.
Margaric.
Producing pearls.
A hidrous potash mica related to muscovite.
The ketone of margaric acid.
Margaric; -- formerly designating a supposed acid.
A sparoid fish (Diabasis aurolineatus) of the Gulf of Mexico, esteemed as a food fish; -- called also red-mouth grunt.
An American wild cat (Felis tigrina), ranging from Mexico to Brazil. It is spotted with black. Called also long-tailed cat.
Border; margin; edge; verge.
A margin; border; brink; edge.
To enter or note down upon the margin of a page; to margin.
A border; edge; brink; verge; as, the margin of a river or lake.
Specifically: The part of a page at the edge left uncovered in writing or printing.
The difference between the cost and the selling price of an article.
Something allowed, or reserved, for that which can not be foreseen or known with certainty.
Collateral security deposited with a broker to secure him from loss on contracts entered into by him on behalf of his principial, as in the speculative buying and selling of stocks, wheat, etc.
of Margin
of Margin
To furnish with a margin.
To enter in the margin of a page.
Of or pertaining to a margin.
Written or printed in the margin; as, a marginal note or gloss.
Marginal notes.
In the margin of a book.
Having a margin distinct in appearance or structure.
To furnish with a distinct margin; to margin.
Same as Marginate, a.
Having a margin.
Bordered with a distinct line of color.
A genus of small, polished, marine univalve shells, native of all warm seas.
Dehiscent by the separation of united carpels; -- said of fruits.
A large tree of genus Melia (M. Azadirachta) found in India. Its bark is bitter, and used as a tonic. A valuable oil is expressed from its seeds, and a tenacious gum exudes from its trunk. The M. Azedarach is a much more showy tree, and is cultivated in the Southern United States, where it is known as Pride of India, Pride of China, or bead tree. Various parts of the tree are considered anthelmintic.
Alt. of Margraviate
The territory or jurisdiction of a margrave.
Originally, a lord or keeper of the borders or marches in Germany.
The English equivalent of the German title of nobility, markgraf; a marquis.
The wife of a margrave.
The daisy (Bellis perennis). The name is often applied also to the ox-eye daisy and to the China aster.
Pertaining to the Virgin Mary, or sometimes to Mary, Queen of England, daughter of Henry VIII.
Marry.
A kind of bellflower, Companula Trachelium, once called Viola Mariana; but it is not a violet.
Produced in or by the sea.
A name for several plants with golden yellow blossoms, especially the Calendula officinalis (see Calendula), and the cultivated species of Tagetes.
A small marmoset (Midas rosalia); the silky tamarin.
A musical istrument of percussion, consisting of bars yielding musical tones when struck.
A spider monkey (Ateles belzebuth) of Central and South America.
A brine or pickle containing wine and spices, for enriching the flavor of meat and fish.
To salt or pickle, as fish, and then preserve in oil or vinegar; to prepare by the use of marinade.
Of or pertaining to the sea; having to do with the ocean, or with navigation or naval affairs; nautical; as, marine productions or bodies; marine shells; a marine engine.
Formed by the action of the currents or waves of the sea; as, marine deposits.
A solider serving on shipboard; a sea soldier; one of a body of troops trained to do duty in the navy.
The sum of naval affairs; naval economy; the department of navigation and sea forces; the collective shipping of a country; as, the mercantile marine.
A picture representing some marine subject.
Having the lower part of the body like a fish.
One whose occupation is to assist in navigating ships; a seaman or sailor.
Seamanship.
A representation of a sea view.
One who worships the Virgin Mary.
The worship of the Virgin Mary.
A puppet moved by strings, as in a puppet show.
The buffel duck.
See Boyle's law, under Law.
One of a genus (Calochortus) of tuliplike bulbous herbs with large, and often gaycolored, blossoms. Called also butterfly lily. Most of them are natives of California.
A species of civet; the zoril.
Low, wet ground; a marsh; a fen; a bog; a moor.
Moory; fenny; boggy.
Growing in marshes.
Of or pertaining to a husband; as, marital rights, duties, authority.
Having a husband; married.
Alt. of Maritimale
See Maritime.
Bordering on, or situated near, the ocean; connected with the sea by site, interest, or power; having shipping and commerce or a navy; as, maritime states.
Of or pertaining to the ocean; marine; pertaining to navigation and naval affairs, or to shipping and commerce by sea.
A genus of mintlike plants (Origanum) comprising about twenty-five species. The sweet marjoram (O. Majorana) is pecularly aromatic and fragrant, and much used in cookery. The wild marjoram of Europe and America is O. vulgare, far less fragrant than the other.
A license of reprisals. See Marque.
An old weight and coin. See Marc.
The unit of monetary account of the German Empire, equal to 23.8 cents of United States money; the equivalent of one hundred pfennigs. Also, a silver coin of this value.
A visible sign or impression made or left upon anything; esp., a line, point, stamp, figure, or the like, drawn or impressed, so as to attract the attention and convey some information or intimation; a token; a trace.
A character or device put on an article of merchandise by the maker to show by whom it was made; a trade-mark.
A character (usually a cross) made as a substitute for a signature by one who can not write.
A fixed object serving for guidance, as of a ship, a traveler, a surveyor, etc.; as, a seamark, a landmark.
A trace, dot, line, imprint, or discoloration, although not regarded as a token or sign; a scratch, scar, stain, etc.; as, this pencil makes a fine mark.
An evidence of presence, agency, or influence; a significative token; a symptom; a trace; specifically, a permanent impression of one's activity or character.
That toward which a missile is directed; a thing aimed at; what one seeks to hit or reach.
Attention, regard, or respect.
Limit or standard of action or fact; as, to be within the mark; to come up to the mark.
Badge or sign of honor, rank, or official station.
Preeminence; high position; as, particians of mark; a fellow of no mark.
A characteristic or essential attribute; a differential.
A number or other character used in registring; as, examination marks; a mark for tardiness.
Image; likeness; hence, those formed in one's image; children; descendants.
One of the bits of leather or colored bunting which are placed upon a sounding line at intervals of from two to five fathoms. The unmarked fathoms are called "deeps."
of Mark
of Mark
To put a mark upon; to affix a significant mark to; to make recognizable by a mark; as, to mark a box or bale of merchandise; to mark clothing.
To be a mark upon; to designate; to indicate; -- used literally and figuratively; as, this monument marks the spot where Wolfe died; his courage and energy marked him for a leader.
To leave a trace, scratch, scar, or other mark, upon, or any evidence of action; as, a pencil marks paper; his hobnails marked the floor.
To keep account of; to enumerate and register; as, to mark the points in a game of billiards or cards.
To notice or observe; to give attention to; to take note of; to remark; to heed; to regard.
To take particular notice; to observe critically; to note; to remark.
Remarkable.
Designated or distinguished by, or as by, a mark; hence; noticeable; conspicuous; as, a marked card; a marked coin; a marked instance.
See Marquee.
One who or that which marks.
One who keeps account of a game played, as of billiards.
A counter used in card playing and other games.
The soldier who forms the pilot of a wheeling column, or marks the direction of an alignment.
An attachment to a sewing machine for marking a line on the fabric by creasing it.
A meeting together of people, at a stated time and place, for the purpose of traffic (as in cattle, provisions, wares, etc.) by private purchase and sale, and not by auction; as, a market is held in the town every week.
A public place (as an open space in a town) or a large building, where a market is held; a market place or market house; esp., a place where provisions are sold.
An opportunity for selling anything; demand, as shown by price offered or obtainable; a town, region, or country, where the demand exists; as, to find a market for one's wares; there is no market for woolen cloths in that region; India is a market for English goods.
Exchange, or purchase and sale; traffic; as, a dull market; a slow market.
The price for which a thing is sold in a market; market price. Hence: Value; worth.
The privelege granted to a town of having a public market.
of Market
of Market
To deal in a market; to buy or sell; to make bargains for provisions or goods.
To expose for sale in a market; to traffic in; to sell in a market, and in an extended sense, to sell in any manner; as, most of the farmes have marketed their crops.
Fit to be offered for sale in a market; such as may be justly and lawfully sold; as, dacaye/ provisions are not marketable.
Current in market; as, marketable value.
Wanted by purchasers; salable; as, furs are not marketable in that country.
Quality of being marketable.
One who attends a market to buy or sell; one who carries goods to market.
The act of selling or of purchasing in, or as in, a market.
Articles in, or from, a market; supplies.
A market place.
A large wild goat (Capra megaceros), having huge flattened spiral horns. It inhabits the mountains of Northern India and Cashmere.
The act of one who, or that which, marks; the mark or marks made; arrangement or disposition of marks or coloring; as, the marking of a bird's plumage.
A marquis.
A marchioness.
A marksman.
of Marksman
One skillful to hit a mark with a missile; one who shoots well.
One who makes his mark, instead of writing his name, in signing documents.
Skill of a marksman.
To cover, as part of a rope, with marline, marking a pecular hitch at each turn to prevent unwinding.
A mixed earthy substance, consisting of carbonate of lime, clay, and sand, in very varivble proportions, and accordingly designated as calcareous, clayey, or sandy. See Greensand.
of Marl
of Marl
To overspread or manure with marl; as, to marl a field.
Resembling marl; partaking of the qualities of marl.
The American great marbled godwit (Limosa fedoa). Applied also to the red-breasted godwit (Limosa haematica).
A small line composed of two strands a little twisted, used for winding around ropes and cables, to prevent their being weakened by fretting.
To wind marline around; as, to marline a rope.
A variety of marl.
Partaking of the qualites of marlite.
Apit where marl is dug.
A sandy calcareous straum, containing, or impregnated with, iron, and lying between the upper and lower Lias of England.
Consisting or partaking of marl; resembling marl; abounding with marl.
A preserve or confection made of the pulp of fruit, as the quince, pear, apple, orange, etc., boiled with sugar, and brought to a jamlike consistence.
See Marmalade.
A ferruginous variety of shalerite or zinc blende, nearly black in color.
A thin, laminated variety of serpentine, usually of a pale green color.
Pertaining to, or like, marble.
Alt. of Marmorated
Variegated like marble; covered or overlaid with marble.
A covering or incrusting with marble; a casing of marble; a variegating so as to resemble marble.
A kind of hard finish for plasterwork, made of plaster of Paris and marble dust, and capable of taking a high polish.
Alt. of Marmorean
Pertaining to, or resembling, marble; made of marble.
The metamorphism of limestone, that is, its conversion into marble.
A species of small opossum (Didelphus murina) ranging from Mexico to Brazil.
Any one of numerous species of small South American monkeys of the genera Hapale and Midas, family Hapalidae. They have long soft fur, and a hairy, nonprehensile tail. They are often kept as pets. Called also squirrel monkey.
Any rodent of the genus Arctomys. The common European marmot (A. marmotta) is about the size of a rabbit, and inhabits the higher regions of the Alps and Pyrenees. The bobac is another European species. The common American species (A. monax) is the woodchuck.
Any one of several species of ground squirrels or gophers of the genus Spermophilus; also, the prairie dog.
A fine oil obtained from the kernel of Prunus brigantiaca. It is used instead of olive or almond oil.
See Marmoset.
See Maroon, the color.
of Maronite
One of a body of nominal Christians, who speak the Arabic language, and reside on Mount Lebanon and in different parts of Syria. They take their name from one Maron of the 6th century.
In the West Indies and Guiana, a fugitive slave, or a free negro, living in the mountains.
of Maroon
of Maroon
To put (a person) ashore on a desolate island or coast and leave him to his fate.
Having the color called maroon. See 4th Maroon.
A brownish or dull red of any description, esp. of a scarlet cast rather than approaching crimson or purple.
An explosive shell. See Marron, 3.
One who, by his officious /nterference, mars or frustrates a design or plot.
A license to pass the limits of a jurisdiction, or boundary of a country, for the purpose of making reprisals.
A large field tent; esp., one adapted to the use of an officer of high rank.
A marquis.
Inlaid work; work inlaid with pieces of wood, shells, ivory, and the like, of several colors.
A nobleman in England, France, and Germany, of a rank next below that of duke. Originally, the marquis was an officer whose duty was to guard the marches or frontiers of the kingdom. The office has ceased, and the name is now a mere title conferred by patent.
The seigniory, dignity, or lordship of a marquis; the territory governed by a marquis.
A marquisate.
The wife of a marquis; a marchioness.
A marquisate.
A coarse grass found on sandy beaches (Ammophila arundinacea). See Beach grass, under Beach.
One who mars or injures.
Marriageable.
The act of marrying, or the state of being married; legal union of a man and a woman for life, as husband and wife; wedlock; matrimony.
The marriage vow or contract.
A feast made on the occasion of a marriage.
Any intimate or close union.
The quality or state of being marriageable.
Fit for, or capable of, marriage; of an age at which marriage is allowable.
Being in the state of matrimony; wedded; as, a married man or woman.
Of or pertaining to marriage; connubial; as, the married state.
One who marries.
A large chestnut.
A chestnut color; maroon.
A paper or pasteboard box or shell, wound about with strong twine, filled with an explosive, and ignited with a fuse, -- used to make a noise like a cannon.
Same as 1st Maroon.
The razor-billed auk. See Auk.
The common guillemot.
The puffin.
The tissue which fills the cavities of most bones; the medulla. In the larger cavities it is commonly very fatty, but in the smaller cavities it is much less fatty, and red or reddish in color.
The essence; the best part.
One of a pair; a match; a companion; an intimate associate.
of Marrow
of Marrow
To fill with, or as with, marrow of fat; to glut.
A bone containing marrow; pl. ludicrously, knee bones or knees; as, to get down on one's marrowbones, i. e., to kneel.
A rich but late variety of pea.
Of the nature of, or like, marrow.
Destitute of marrow.
Full of marrow; pithy.
A genus of bitter aromatic plants, sometimes used in medicine; hoarhound.
of Marry
of Marry
To unite in wedlock or matrimony; to perform the ceremony of joining, as a man and a woman, for life; to constitute (a man and a woman) husband and wife according to the laws or customs of the place.
To join according to law, (a man) to a woman as his wife, or (a woman) to a man as her husband. See the Note to def. 4.
To dispose of in wedlock; to give away as wife.
To take for husband or wife. See the Note below.
Figuratively, to unite in the closest and most endearing relation.
To enter into the conjugal or connubial state; to take a husband or a wife.
Indeed ! in truth ! -- a term of asseveration said to have been derived from the practice of swearing by the Virgin Mary.
The god of war and husbandry.
One of the planets of the solar system, the fourth in order from the sun, or the next beyond the earth, having a diameter of about 4,200 miles, a period of 687 days, and a mean distance of 141,000,000 miles. It is conspicuous for the redness of its light.
The metallic element iron, the symbol of which / was the same as that of the planet Mars.
A kind of wine exported from Marsala in Sicily.
A genus of plants of the Milkweed family, mostly woody climbers with fragrant flowers, several species of which furnish valuable fiber, and one species (Marsdenia tinctoria) affords indigo.
Alt. of Marseillaise
Of or pertaining to Marseilles, in France, or to its inhabitants.
Alt. of Marseillaise
A native or inhabitant of Marseilles.
A general term for certain kinds of fabrics, which are formed of two series of threads interlacing each other, thus forming double cloth, quilted in the loom; -- so named because first made in Marseilles, France.
A tract of soft wet land, commonly covered partially or wholly with water; a fen; a swamp; a morass.
Originally, an officer who had the care of horses; a groom.
An officer of high rank, charged with the arrangement of ceremonies, the conduct of operations, or the like
One who goes before a prince to declare his coming and provide entertainment; a harbinger; a pursuivant.
One who regulates rank and order at a feast or any other assembly, directs the order of procession, and the like.
The chief officer of arms, whose duty it was, in ancient times, to regulate combats in the lists.
The highest military officer.
A ministerial officer, appointed for each judicial district of the United States, to execute the process of the courts of the United States, and perform various duties, similar to those of a sheriff. The name is also sometimes applied to certain police officers of a city.
of Marshal
of Marshal
of Marshal
of Marshal
To dispose in order; to arrange in a suitable manner; as, to marshal troops or an army.
To direct, guide, or lead.
To dispose in due order, as the different quarterings on an escutcheon, or the different crests when several belong to an achievement.
One who marshals.
The act of arranging in due order.
The arrangement of an escutcheon to exhibit the alliances of the owner.
The court or seat of a marshal; hence, the prison in Southwark, belonging to the marshal of the king's household.
The office of a marshal.
Alt. of Marsebanker
The menhaden.
The state or condition of being marshy.
A perennial plant of the genus Caltha (C. palustris), growing in wet places and bearing bright yellow flowers. In the United States it is used as a pot herb under the name of cowslip. See Cowslip.
Resembling a marsh; wet; boggy; fenny.
Pertaining to, or produced in, marshes; as, a marshy weed.
One of the Marsipobranchia.
A class of Vertebrata, lower than fishes, characterized by their purselike gill cavities, cartilaginous skeletons, absence of limbs, and a suckerlike mouth destitute of jaws. It includes the lampreys and hagfishes. See Cyclostoma, and Lamprey. Called also Marsipobranchiata, and Marsipobranchii.
Having a pouch for carrying the immature young; of or pertaining to the Marsupialia.
Of or pertaining to a marsupium; as, the marsupial bones.
One of the Marsupialia.
A subclass of Mammalia, including nearly all the mammals of Australia and the adjacent islands, together with the opossums of America. They differ from ordinary mammals in having the corpus callosum very small, in being implacental, and in having their young born while very immature. The female generally carries the young for some time after birth in an external pouch, or marsupium. Called also Marsupiata.
Alt. of Marsupian
One of the Marsupialia.
Related to or resembling the marsupials; furnished with a pouch for the young, as the marsupials, and also some fishes and Crustacea.
Same as Marsupium.
A fossil crinoid of the genus Marsupites, resembling a purse in form.
of Marsupium
The pouch, formed by a fold of the skin of the abdomen, in which marsupials carry their young; also, a pouch for similar use in other animals, as certain Crustacea.
The pecten in the eye of birds and reptiles. See Pecten.
A market.
A bargain.
To buy or sell in, or as in, a mart.
To traffic.
The god Mars.
Battle; contest.
A lily (Lilium Martagon) with purplish red flowers, found in Europe and Asia.
To make a blow with, or as with, a hammer.
A weapon resembling a hammer, often having one side of the head pointed; -- used by horsemen in the Middle Ages to break armor.
A small hammer used by marble workers and sculptors.
A building of masonry, generally circular, usually erected on the seacoast, with a gun on the summit mounted on a traversing platform, so as to be fired in any direction.
A bird. See Martin.
Any one of several fur-bearing carnivores of the genus Mustela, closely allied to the sable. Among the more important species are the European beech, or stone, marten (Mustela foina); the pine marten (M. martes); and the American marten, or sable (M. Americana), which some zoologists consider only a variety of the Russian sable.
The fur of the marten, used for hats, muffs, etc.
Same as Marten.
A blundering preacher.
Of, pertaining to, or suited for, war; military; as, martial music; a martial appearance.
Practiced in, or inclined to, war; warlike; brave.
Belonging to war, or to an army and navy; -- opposed to civil; as, martial law; a court-martial.
Pertaining to, or resembling, the god, or the planet, Mars.
Pertaining to, or containing, iron; chalybeate; as, martial preparations.
The quality of being warlike; exercises suitable for war.
A warrior.
of Martialize
of Martialize
To render warlike; as, to martialize a people.
In a martial manner.
The quality of being martial.
A perforated stone-faced runner for grinding.
One of several species of swallows, usually having the tail less deeply forked than the tail of the common swallows.
In military language, a strict disciplinarian; in general, one who lays stress on a rigid adherence to the details of discipline, or to forms and fixed methods.
The martin.
A species of tinamou (Calopezus elegans), having a long slender crest.
The principles or practices of a martinet; rigid adherence to discipline, etc.
Alt. of Martingal
A strap fastened to a horse's girth, passing between his fore legs, and fastened to the bit, or now more commonly ending in two rings, through which the reins pass. It is intended to hold down the head of the horse, and prevent him from rearing.
A lower stay of rope or chain for the jib boom or flying jib boom, fastened to, or reeved through, the dolphin striker. Also, the dolphin striker itself.
The act of doubling, at each stake, that which has been lost on the preceding stake; also, the sum so risked; -- metaphorically derived from the bifurcation of the martingale of a harness.
The feast of St. Martin, the eleventh of November; -- often called martlemans.
Iron sesquioxide in isometric form, probably a pseudomorph after magnetite.
See Martinmas.
The European house martin.
A bird without beak or feet; -- generally assumed to represent a martin. As a mark of cadency it denotes the fourth son.
One who, by his death, bears witness to the truth of the gospel; one who is put to death for his religion; as, Stephen was the first Christian martyr.
Hence, one who sacrifices his life, his station, or what is of great value to him, for the sake of principle, or to sustain a cause.
of Martyr
of Martyr
To put to death for adhering to some belief, esp. Christianity; to sacrifice on account of faith or profession.
To persecute; to torment; to torture.
The condition of a martyr; the death of a martyr; the suffering of death on account of adherence to the Christian faith, or to any cause.
Affliction; torment; torture.
Act of martyrizing, or state of being martyrized; torture.
To make a martyr of.
In the manner of a martyr.
A martyrology.
Alt. of Martyrological
Pertaining to martyrology or martyrs; registering, or registered in, a catalogue of martyrs.
A writer of martyrology; an historian of martyrs.
of Martyrology
A history or account of martyrs; a register of martyrs.
Martyrdom.
That which causes wonder; a prodigy; a miracle.
Wonder.
of Marvel
of Marvel
of Marvel
of Marvel
To be struck with surprise, astonishment, or wonder; to wonder.
To marvel at.
To cause to marvel, or be surprised; -- used impersonally.
Exciting wonder or surprise; astonishing; wonderful.
Partaking of the character of miracle, or supernatural power; incredible.
In a marvelous manner; wonderfully; strangely.
The quality or state of being marvelous; wonderfulness; strangeness.
A stone, or cast-iron plate, or former, on which hot glass is rolled to give it shape.
Marrow.
See Marry.
The marigold; a blossom of the marigold.
Mariolatry.
A large British fluke, or flounder (Rhombus megastoma); -- called also carter, and whiff.
Alt. of Mascagnite
Native sulphate of ammonia, found in volcanic districts; -- so named from Mascagni, who discovered it.
A lozenge voided.
Composed of, or covered with, lozenge-shaped scales; having lozenge-shaped divisions.
Alt. of Mascotte
A person who is supposed to bring good luck to the household to which he or she belongs; anything that brings good luck.
To make strong.
Of the male sex; not female.
Having the qualities of a man; suitable to, or characteristic of, a man; virile; not feminine or effeminate; strong; robust.
Belonging to males; appropriated to, or used by, males.
Having the inflections of, or construed with, words pertaining especially to male beings, as distinguished from feminine and neuter. See Gender.
The state or quality of being masculine; masculineness.
See Maze.
A drinking cup. See 1st Maslin, 2.
Same as Mazer.
A mesh.
A mass of mixed ingredients reduced to a soft pulpy state by beating or pressure; a mass of anything in a soft pulpy state. Specifically (Brewing), ground or bruised malt, or meal of rye, wheat, corn, or other grain (or a mixture of malt and meal) steeped and stirred in hot water for making the wort.
A mixture of meal or bran and water fed to animals.
A mess; trouble.
of Mash
of Mash
To convert into a mash; to reduce to a soft pulpy state by beating or pressure; to bruise; to crush; as, to mash apples in a mill, or potatoes with a pestle. Specifically (Brewing), to convert, as malt, or malt and meal, into the mash which makes wort.
One who, or that which, mashes; also (Brewing), a machine for making mash.
A charmer of women.
See Maslin.
Produced by crushing or bruising; resembling, or consisting of, a mash.
A cover, or partial cover, for the face, used for disguise or protection; as, a dancer's mask; a fencer's mask; a ball player's mask.
That which disguises; a pretext or subterfuge.
A festive entertainment of dancing or other diversions, where all wear masks; a masquerade; hence, a revel; a frolic; a delusive show.
A dramatic performance, formerly in vogue, in which the actors wore masks and represented mythical or allegorical characters.
A grotesque head or face, used to adorn keystones and other prominent parts, to spout water in fountains, and the like; -- called also mascaron.
In a permanent fortification, a redoubt which protects the caponiere.
A screen for a battery.
The lower lip of the larva of a dragon fly, modified so as to form a prehensile organ.
of Mask
of Mask
To cover, as the face, by way of concealment or defense against injury; to conceal with a mask or visor.
To disguise; to cover; to hide.
To conceal; also, to intervene in the line of.
To cover or keep in check; as, to mask a body of troops or a fortess by a superior force, while some hostile evolution is being carried out.
To take part as a masker in a masquerade.
To wear a mask; to be disguised in any way.
Wearing a mask or masks; characterized by masks; cincealed; hidden.
Same as Personate.
Having the anterior part of the head differing decidedly in color from the rest of the plumage; -- said of birds.
One who wears a mask; one who appears in disguise at a masquerade.
To confuse; to stupefy.
The dress or disguise of a maske/; masquerade.
The muskellunge.
Any spiral marine shell of the genus Persona, having a curiously twisted aperture.
An excitant containing opium, much used by the Turks.
A mixture composed of different materials
A mixture of metals resembling brass.
A mixture of different sorts of grain, as wheat and rye.
A vessel made of maslin, 1 (a).
Composed of different sorts; as, maslin bread, which is made of rye mixed with a little wheat.
One whose occupation is to build with stone or brick; also, one who prepares stone for building purposes.
A member of the fraternity of Freemasons. See Freemason.
To build stonework or brickwork about, under, in, over, etc.; to construct by masons; -- with a prepositional suffix; as, to mason up a well or terrace; to mason in a kettle or boiler.
Of or pertaining to Freemasons or to their craft or mysteries.
The art or occupation of a mason.
The work or performance of a mason; as, good or bad masonry; skillful masonry.
That which is built by a mason; anything constructed of the materials used by masons, such as stone, brick, tiles, or the like. Dry masonry is applied to structures made without mortar.
The craft, institution, or mysteries of Freemasons; freemasonry.
A kind of boat used on the coast of Madras, India. The planks are sewed together with strands of coir which cross over a wadding of the same material, so that the shock on taking the beach through surf is much reduced.
A Jewish critical work on the text of the Hebrew Scriptures, composed by several learned rabbis of the school of Tiberias, in the eighth and ninth centuries.
A Masorite.
Alt. of Masoretical
Of or relating to the Masora, or to its authors.
One of the writers of the Masora.
A mask; a masquerade.
An assembly of persons wearing masks, and amusing themselves with dancing, conversation, or other diversions.
A dramatic performance by actors in masks; a mask. See 1st Mask, 4.
Acting or living under false pretenses; concealment of something by a false or unreal show; pretentious show; disguise.
A Spanish diversion on horseback.
of Masquerade
of Masquerade
To assemble in masks; to take part in a masquerade.
To frolic or disport in disquise; to make a pretentious show of being what one is not.
To conceal with masks; to disguise.
One who masquerades; a person wearing a mask; one disguised.
The sacrifice in the sacrament of the Eucharist, or the consecration and oblation of the host.
The portions of the Mass usually set to music, considered as a musical composition; -- namely, the Kyrie, the Gloria, the Credo, the Sanctus, and the Agnus Dei, besides sometimes an Offertory and the Benedictus.
of Mass
of Mass
To celebrate Mass.
A quantity of matter cohering together so as to make one body, or an aggregation of particles or things which collectively make one body or quantity, usually of considerable size; as, a mass of ore, metal, sand, or water.
A medicinal substance made into a cohesive, homogeneous lump, of consistency suitable for making pills; as, blue mass.
A large quantity; a sum.
Bulk; magnitude; body; size.
The principal part; the main body.
The quantity of matter which a body contains, irrespective of its bulk or volume.
To form or collect into a mass; to form into a collective body; to bring together into masses; to assemble.
The killing of a considerable number of human beings under circumstances of atrocity or cruelty, or contrary to the usages of civilized people; as, the massacre on St. Bartholomew's Day.
Murder.
of Massacre
of Massacre
To kill in considerable numbers where much resistance can not be made; to kill with indiscriminate violence, without necessity, and contrary to the usages of nations; to butcher; to slaughter; -- limited to the killing of human beings.
One who massacres.
A rubbing or kneading of the body, especially when performed as a hygienic or remedial measure.
The black rattlesnake (Crotalus, / Caudisona, tergemina), found in the Mississippi Valley.
Alt. of Masse shot
A stroke made with the cue held vertically.
A priest who celebrates Mass.
The large muscle which raises the under jaw, and assists in mastication.
Of or pertaining to the masseter.
Masseteric.
Alt. of Masseuse
One who performs massage.
Lead protoxide, PbO, obtained as a yellow amorphous powder, the fused and crystalline form of which is called litharge; lead ocher. It is used as a pigment.
The state or quality of being massy; ponderousness.
Forming, or consisting of, a large mass; compacted; weighty; heavy; massy.
In mass; not necessarily without a crystalline structure, but having no regular form; as, a mineral occurs massive.
In a heavy mass.
The state or quality of being massive; massiness.
See Masoola boat.
Same as Masora.
Same as Masorite.
Compacted into, or consisting of, a mass; having bulk and weight ot substance; ponderous; bulky and heavy; weight; heavy; as, a massy shield; a massy rock.
The fruit of the oak and beech, or other forest trees; nuts; acorns.
A pole, or long, strong, round piece of timber, or spar, set upright in a boat or vessel, to sustain the sails, yards, rigging, etc. A mast may also consist of several pieces of timber united by iron bands, or of a hollow pillar of iron or steel.
The vertical post of a derrick or crane.
of Mast
of Mast
To furnish with a mast or masts; to put the masts of in position; as, to mast a ship.
The pharynx of a rotifer. It usually contains four horny pieces. The two central ones form the incus, against which the mallei, or lateral ones, work so as to crush the food.
The lore of a bird.
Furnished with a mast or masts; -- chiefly in composition; as, a three-masted schooner.
A vessel having (so many) masts; -- used only in compounds; as, a two-master.
A male person having another living being so far subject to his will, that he can, in the main, control his or its actions; -- formerly used with much more extensive application than now. (a) The employer of a servant. (b) The owner of a slave. (c) The person to whom an apprentice is articled. (d) A sovereign, prince, or feudal noble; a chief, or one exercising similar authority. (e) The head of a household. (f) The male head of a school or college. (g) A male teacher. (h) The director of a number of persons performing a ceremony or sharing a feast. (i) The owner of a docile brute, -- especially a dog or horse. (j) The controller of a familiar spirit or other supernatural being.
One who uses, or controls at will, anything inanimate; as, to be master of one's time.
One who has attained great skill in the use or application of anything; as, a master of oratorical art.
A title given by courtesy, now commonly pronounced mister, except when given to boys; -- sometimes written Mister, but usually abbreviated to Mr.
A young gentleman; a lad, or small boy.
The commander of a merchant vessel; -- usually called captain. Also, a commissioned officer in the navy ranking next above ensign and below lieutenant; formerly, an officer on a man-of-war who had immediate charge, under the commander, of sailing the vessel.
A person holding an office of authority among the Freemasons, esp. the presiding officer; also, a person holding a similar office in other civic societies.
of Master
of Master
To become the master of; to subject to one's will, control, or authority; to conquer; to overpower; to subdue.
To gain the command of, so as to understand or apply; to become an adept in; as, to master a science.
To own; to posses.
To be skillful; to excel.
Dominion; rule; command.
Inclined to play the master; domineering; imperious; arbitrary.
Having the skill or power of a master; indicating or expressing power or mastery.
In a masterful manner; imperiously.
The state of being a master; hence, disposition to command or hector.
Destitute of a master or owner; ungoverned or ungovernable.
The quality or state of being masterly; ability to control wisely or skillfully.
Suitable to, or characteristic of, a master; indicating thorough knowledge or superior skill and power; showing a master's hand; as, a masterly design; a masterly performance; a masterly policy.
Imperious; domineering; arbitrary.
With the skill of a master.
Masterly.
Anything done or made with extraordinary skill; a capital performance; a chef-d'oeuvre; a supreme achievement.
The state or office of a master.
Mastery; dominion; superior skill; superiority.
Chief work; masterpiece.
An ironical title of respect.
One of a class of poets which flourished in Nuremberg and some other cities of Germany in the 15th and 16th centuries. They bound themselves to observe certain arbitrary laws of rhythm.
A tall and coarse European umbelliferous plant (Peucedanum Ostruthium, formerly Imperatoria).
The Astrantia major, a European umbelliferous plant with a showy colored involucre.
Improperly, the cow parsnip (Heracleum lanatum).
of Mastery
The position or authority of a master; dominion; command; supremacy; superiority.
Superiority in war or competition; victory; triumph; preeminence.
Contest for superiority.
A masterly operation; a feat.
Specifically, the philosopher's stone.
The act process of mastering; the state of having mastered.
Abounding in mast; producing mast in abundance; as, the mastful forest; a mastful chestnut.
The top or head of a mast; the part of a mast above the hounds.
To cause to go to the masthead as a punishment.
A building in which vessels' masts are shaped, fitted, etc.
A low shrubby tree of the genus Pistacia (P. Lentiscus), growing upon the islands and coasts of the Mediterranean, and producing a valuable resin; -- called also, mastic tree.
A resin exuding from the mastic tree, and obtained by incision. The best is in yellowish white, semitransparent tears, of a faint smell, and is used as an astringent and an aromatic, also as an ingredient in varnishes.
A kind of cement composed of burnt clay, litharge, and linseed oil, used for plastering walls, etc.
Capable of being masticated.
A part of a bridle, the slavering bit.
of Masticate
of Masticate
To grind or crush with, or as with, the teeth and prepare for swallowing and digestion; to chew; as, to masticate food.
One who masticates.
The act or operation of masticating; chewing, as of food.
One who masticates.
A machine for cutting meat into fine pieces for toothless people; also, a machine for cutting leather, India rubber, or similar tough substances, into fine pieces, in some processes of manufacture.
Chewing; adapted to perform the office o/ chewing food.
of Masticatory
A substance to be chewed to increase the saliva.
See Mastic.
A white, amorphous, tenacious substance resembling caoutchouc, and obtained as an insoluble residue of mastic.
Massicot.
of Mastiff
of Mastiff
A breed of large dogs noted for strength and courage. There are various strains, differing in form and color, and characteristic of different countries.
One of the Mastigopoda.
The Infusoria.
Any one of several large spiny-tailed lizards of the genus Uromastix. They inhabit Southern Asia and North Africa.
The act or process of putting a mast or masts into a vessel; also, the scientific principles which determine the position of masts, and the mechanical methods of placing them.
Inflammation of the breast.
Bearing no mast; as, a mastless oak or beech.
Having no mast; as, a mastless vessel.
See Maslin.
An extinct genus of mammals closely allied to the elephant, but having less complex molar teeth, and often a pair of lower, as well as upper, tusks, which are incisor teeth. The species were mostly larger than elephants, and their romains occur in nearly all parts of the world in deposits ranging from Miocene to late Quaternary time.
A large extinct genus of labyrinthodonts, found in the European Triassic rocks.
Pertaining to, or resembling, a mastodon; as, mastodontic dimensions.
Alt. of Mastodyny
Pain occuring in the mamma or female breast, -- a form of neuralgia.
Resembling the nipple or the breast; -- applied specifically to a process of the temporal bone behind the ear.
Pertaining to, or in the region of, the mastoid process; mastoidal.
Same as Mastoid.
The natural history of Mammalia.
Mistress.
Onanism; self-pollution.
Full of mast; abounding in acorns, etc.
Same as Masoola boat.
A name given by coppersmiths to an alloy of copper, tin, iron, etc., usually called white metal.
Cast down; dejected; overthrown; slain.
A fabric of sedge, rushes, flags, husks, straw, hemp, or similar material, used for wiping and cleaning shoes at the door, for covering the floor of a hall or room, and for other purposes.
Any similar fabric for various uses, as for covering plant houses, putting beneath dishes or lamps on a table, securing rigging from friction, and the like.
Anything growing thickly, or closely interwoven, so as to resemble a mat in form or texture; as, a mat of weeds; a mat of hair.
An ornamental border made of paper, pasterboard, metal, etc., put under the glass which covers a framed picture; as, the mat of a daguerreotype.
of Mat
of Mat
To cover or lay with mats.
To twist, twine, or felt together; to interweave into, or like, a mat; to entangle.
To grow thick together; to become interwoven or felted together like a mat.
An old dance with swords and bucklers; a sword dance.
The three-banded armadillo (Tolypeutis tricinctus). See Illust. under Loricata.
Alt. of Matador
The killer; the man appointed to kill the bull in bullfights.
In the game of quadrille or omber, the three principal trumps, the ace of spades being the first, the ace of clubs the third, and the second being the deuce of a black trump or the seven of a red one.
A shrike or butcher bird; -- called also mattages.
The bearded tortoise (Chelys fimbriata) of South American rivers.
A place where animals are slaughtered for their hides and tallow.
Anything used for catching and retaining or communicating fire, made of some substance which takes fire readily, or remains burning some time; esp., a small strip or splint of wood dipped at one end in a substance which can be easily ignited by friction, as a preparation of phosphorus or chlorate of potassium.
A person or thing equal or similar to another; one able to mate or cope with another; an equal; a mate.
A bringing together of two parties suited to one another, as for a union, a trial of skill or force, a contest, or the like
A contest to try strength or skill, or to determine superiority; an emulous struggle.
A matrimonial union; a marriage.
An agreement, compact, etc.
A candidate for matrimony; one to be gained in marriage.
Equality of conditions in contest or competition.
Suitable combination or bringing together; that which corresponds or harmonizes with something else; as, the carpet and curtains are a match.
A perforated board, block of plaster, hardened sand, etc., in which a pattern is partly imbedded when a mold is made, for giving shape to the surfaces of separation between the parts of the mold.
of Match
of Match
To be a mate or match for; to be able to complete with; to rival successfully; to equal.
To furnish with its match; to bring a match, or equal, against; to show an equal competitor to; to set something in competition with, or in opposition to, as equal.
To oppose as equal; to contend successfully against.
To make or procure the equal of, or that which is exactly similar to, or corresponds with; as, to match a vase or a horse; to match cloth.
To make equal, proportionate, or suitable; to adapt, fit, or suit (one thing to another).
To marry; to give in marriage.
To fit together, or make suitable for fitting together; specifically, to furnish with a tongue and a groove, at the edges; as, to match boards.
To be united in marriage; to mate.
To be of equal, or similar, size, figure, color, or quality; to tally; to suit; to correspond; as, these vases match.
Capable of being matched; comparable on equal conditions; adapted to being joined together; correspondent.
A coarse cloth.
A coat made of match-cloth.
One who, or that which, matches; a matching machine. See under 3d Match.
Having no equal; unequaled.
Unlike each other; unequal; unsuited.
An old form of gunlock containing a match for firing the priming; hence, a musket fired by means of a match.
One who makes matches for burning or kinding.
One who tries to bring about marriages.
The act or process of making matches for kindling or burning.
The act or process of trying to bring about a marriage for others.
Busy in making or contriving marriages; as, a matchmaking woman.
The Paraguay tea, being the dried leaf of the Brazilian holly (Ilex Paraguensis). The infusion has a pleasant odor, with an agreeable bitter taste, and is much used for tea in South America.
Same as Checkmate.
See 2d Mat.
To confuse; to confound.
To checkmate.
One who customarily associates with another; a companion; an associate; any object which is associated or combined with a similar object.
Hence, specifically, a husband or wife; and among the lower animals, one of a pair associated for propagation and the care of their young.
A suitable companion; a match; an equal.
An officer in a merchant vessel ranking next below the captain. If there are more than one bearing the title, they are called, respectively, first mate, second mate, third mate, etc. In the navy, a subordinate officer or assistant; as, master's mate; surgeon's mate.
of Mate
of Mate
To match; to marry.
To match one's self against; to oppose as equal; to compete with.
To be or become a mate or mates, especially in sexual companionship; as, some birds mate for life; this bird will not mate with that one.
Having no mate.
A dish of food composed of many kinds of fish.
A vain, unprofitable discourse or inquiry.
Any unprofitable science.
See Alma mater, Dura mater, and Pia mater.
Consisting of matter; not spiritual; corporeal; physical; as, material substance or bodies.
Hence: Pertaining to, or affecting, the physical nature of man, as distinguished from the mental or moral nature; relating to the bodily wants, interests, and comforts.
Of solid or weighty character; not insubstantial; of cinsequence; not be dispensed with; important.
Pertaining to the matter, as opposed to the form, of a thing. See Matter.
The substance or matter of which anything is made or may be made.
To form from matter; to materialize.
The doctrine of materialists; materialistic views and tenets.
The tendency to give undue importance to material interests; devotion to the material nature and its wants.
Material substances in the aggregate; matter.
One who denies the existence of spiritual substances or agents, and maintains that spiritual phenomena, so called, are the result of some peculiar organization of matter.
One who holds to the existence of matter, as distinguished from the idealist, who denies it.
Alt. of Materialistical
Of or pertaining to materialism or materialists; of the nature of materialism.
The quality or state of being material; material existence; corporeity.
Importance; as, the materiality of facts.
The act of materializing, or the state of being materialized.
of Materialize
of Materialize
To invest with material characteristics; to make perceptible to the senses; hence, to present to the mind through the medium of material objects.
To regard as matter; to consider or explain by the laws or principles which are appropriate to matter.
To cause to assume a character appropriate to material things; to occupy with material interests; as, to materialize thought.
To make visable in, or as in, a material form; -- said of spirits.
To appear as a material form; to take substantial shape.
In the state of matter.
In its essence; substantially.
In an important manner or degree; essentaily; as, it materially concern us to know the real motives of our actions.
The state of being material.
Material or substance used in the composition of remedies; -- a general term for all substances used as curative agents in medicine.
That branch of medical science which treats of the nature and properties of all the substances that are employed for the cure of diseases.
See Materialist.
Alt. of Materiated
Consisting of matter.
Act of forming matter.
That in a complex system which constitutes the materials, or instruments employed, in distinction from the personnel, or men; as, the baggage, munitions, provisions, etc., of an army; or the buildings, libraries, and apparatus of a college, in distinction from its officers.
See Material.
Of or pertaining to a mother; becoming to a mother; motherly; as, maternal love; maternal tenderness.
In a motherly manner.
The state of being a mother; the character or relation of a mother.
The knapweed (Centaurea nigra).
A mowing, or that which is gathered by mowing; -- chiefly used in composition; as, an aftermath.
See Mathematical.
Of or pertaining to mathematics; according to mathematics; hence, theoretically precise; accurate; as, mathematical geography; mathematical instruments; mathematical exactness.
One versed in mathematics.
That science, or class of sciences, which treats of the exact relations existing between quantities or magnitudes, and of the methods by which, in accordance with these relations, quantities sought are deducible from other quantities known or supposed; the science of spatial and quantitative relations.
See Madder.
The mayweed.  Cf. Maghet.
Learning; especially, mathematics.
See Trinitarian.
A Peruvian plant (Piper, / Artanthe, elongatum), allied to the pepper, the leaves of which are used as a styptic and astringent.
A fat herring with undeveloped roe.
A French mastiff.
Morning.
Morning worship or service; morning prayers or songs.
Time of morning service; the first canonical hour in the Roman Catholic Church.
Of or pertaining to the morning, or to matins; used in the morning; matutinal.
Relating to the morning, or to matins; matutinal.
A reception, or a musical or dramatic entertainment, held in the daytime. See SoirEe.
A round-bottomed glass flask having a long neck; a bolthead.
See Matress.
The mother and ruler of a family or of her descendants; a ruler by maternal right.
Of or pertaining to a matriarch; governed by a matriarch.
The office or jurisdiction of a matriarch; a matriarchal form of government.
See Matrix.
Of or pertaining to matricide.
The murder of a mother by her son or daughter.
One who murders one's own mother.
of Matriculate
of Matriculate
To enroll; to enter in a register; specifically, to enter or admit to membership in a body or society, particularly in a college or university, by enrolling the name in a register.
To go though the process of admission to membership, as by examination and enrollment, in a society or college.
Matriculated.
One who is matriculated.
The act or process of matriculating; the state of being matriculated.
Matrimony.
Of or pertaining to marriage; derived from marriage; connubial; nuptial; hymeneal; as, matrimonial rights or duties.
In a matrimonial manner.
Matrimonial.
The union of man and woman as husband and wife; the nuptial state; marriage; wedlock.
A kind of game at cards played by several persons.
of Matrix
The womb.
Hence, that which gives form or origin to anything
The cavity in which anything is formed, and which gives it shape; a die; a mold, as for the face of a type.
The earthy or stony substance in which metallic ores or crystallized minerals are found; the gangue.
The five simple colors, black, white, blue, red, and yellow, of which all the rest are composed.
The lifeless portion of tissue, either animal or vegetable, situated between the cells; the intercellular substance.
A rectangular arrangement of symbols in rows and columns. The symbols may express quantities or operations.
A wife or a widow, especially, one who has borne children; a woman of staid or motherly manners.
A housekeeper; esp., a woman who manages the domestic economy of a public instution; a head nurse in a hospital; as, the matron of a school or hospital.
The state of a matron.
The collective body of matrons.
Of or pertaining to a matron; suitable to an elderly lady or to a married woman; grave; motherly.
The state of being a matron.
of Matronize
of Matronize
To make a matron of; to make matronlike.
To act the part of a marton toward; to superintend; to chaperone; as, to matronize an assembly.
Like a matron; sedate; grave; matronly.
Advanced in years; elderly.
Like, or befitting, a matron; grave; sedate.
See Metronymic.
Formerly, in the British service, a gunner or a gunner's mate; one of the soldiers in a train of artillery, who assisted the gunners in loading, firing, and sponging the guns.
See Matte.
A shrike or butcher bird; -- written also matagasse.
A subterranean repository for wheat.
A partly reduced copper sulphide, obtained by alternately roasting and melting copper ore in separating the metal from associated iron ores, and called coarse metal, fine metal, etc., according to the grade of fineness. On the exterior it is dark brown or black, but on a fresh surface is yellow or bronzy in color.
A dead or dull finish, as in gilding where the gold leaf is not burnished, or in painting where the surface is purposely deprived of gloss.
Having a dull surface; unburnished; as, matted gold leaf or gilding.
Covered with a mat or mats; as, a matted floor.
Tangled closely together; having its parts adhering closely together; as, matted hair.
That of which anything is composed; constituent substance; material; the material or substantial part of anything; the constituent elements of conception; that into which a notion may be analyzed; the essence; the pith; the embodiment.
That of which the sensible universe and all existent bodies are composed; anything which has extension, occupies space, or is perceptible by the senses; body; substance.
That with regard to, or about which, anything takes place or is done; the thing aimed at, treated of, or treated; subject of action, discussion, consideration, feeling, complaint, legal action, or the like; theme.
That which one has to treat, or with which one has to do; concern; affair; business.
Affair worthy of account; thing of consequence; importance; significance; moment; -- chiefly in the phrases what matter ? no matter, and the like.
Inducing cause or occasion, especially of anything disagreeable or distressing; difficulty; trouble.
Amount; quantity; portion; space; -- often indefinite.
Substance excreted from living animal bodies; that which is thrown out or discharged in a tumor, boil, or abscess; pus; purulent substance.
That which is permanent, or is supposed to be given, and in or upon which changes are effected by psychological or physical processes and relations; -- opposed to form.
Written manuscript, or anything to be set in type; copy; also, type set up and ready to be used, or which has been used, in printing.
of Matter
of Matter
To be of importance; to import; to signify.
To form pus or matter, as an abscess; to maturate.
To regard as important; to take account of; to care for.
Not being, or having, matter; as, matterless spirits.
Unimportant; immaterial.
Adhering to facts; not turning aside from absolute realities; not fanciful or imaginative; commonplace; dry.
Generating or containing pus; purulent.
Full of substance or matter; important.
The act of interweaving or tangling together so as to make a mat; the process of becoming matted.
Mats, in general, or collectively; mat work; a matlike fabric, for use in covering floors, packing articles, and the like; a kind of carpeting made of straw, etc.
Materials for mats.
An ornamental border. See 3d Mat, 4.
A dull, lusterless surface in certain of the arts, as gilding, metal work, glassmaking, etc.
An implement for digging and grubbing. The head has two long steel blades, one like an adz and the other like a narrow ax or the point of a pickax.
An American clupeoid fish (Clupea mediocris), similar to the shad in habits and appearance, but smaller and less esteemed for food; -- called also hickory shad, tailor shad, fall herring, and shad herring.
A quilted bed; a bed stuffed with hair, moss, or other suitable material, and quilted or otherwise fastened.
A mass of interwoven brush, poles, etc., to protect a bank from being worn away by currents or waves.
A medicine, or application, which promotes suppuration.
of Maturate
of Maturate
To bring to ripeness or maturity; to ripen.
To promote the perfect suppuration of (an abscess).
To ripen; to become mature; specif/cally, to suppurate.
The process of bringing, or of coming, to maturity; hence, specifically, the process of suppurating perfectly; the formation of pus or matter.
Conducing to ripeness or maturity; hence, conducing to suppuration.
A remedy promoting maturation; a maturant.
Brought by natural process to completeness of growth and development; fitted by growth and development for any function, action, or state, appropriate to its kind; full-grown; ripe.
Completely worked out; fully digested or prepared; ready for action; made ready for destined application or use; perfected; as, a mature plan.
Of or pertaining to a condition of full development; as, a man of mature years.
Come to, or in a state of, completed suppuration.
of Mature
of Mature
To bring or hasten to maturity; to promote ripeness in; to ripen; to complete; as, to mature one's plans.
To advance toward maturity; to become ripe; as, wine matures by age; the judgment matures by age and experience.
Hence, to become due, as a note.
In a mature manner; with ripeness; completely.
With caution; deliberately.
Early; soon.
The state or quality of being mature; maturity.
One who brings to maturity.
Approaching maturity.
Approaching maturity; as, maturing fruits; maturing notes of hand.
The state or quality of being mature; ripeness; full development; as, the maturity of corn or of grass; maturity of judgment; the maturity of a plan.
Arrival of the time fixed for payment; a becoming due; termination of the period a note, etc., has to run.
Of or pertaining to the morning; early.
Matutinal.
Matutinal.
A name of several maritime grasses, as the sea sand-reed (Ammophila arundinacea) which is used in Holland to bind the sand of the seacoast dikes (see Beach grass, under Beach); also, the Lygeum Spartum, a Mediterranean grass of similar habit.
A native house servant in India.
A cake of unleavened bread eaten by the Jews at the feast of the Passover.
A lemur; -- applied to several species, as the White-fronted, the ruffed, and the ring-tailed lemurs.
A gray plaid; -- used by shepherds in Scotland.
To throw onto confusion or disorder; to render maudlin.
Tearful; easily moved to tears; exciting to tears; excessively sentimental; weak and silly.
Drunk, or somewhat drunk; fuddled; given to drunkenness.
Alt. of Maudeline
An aromatic composite herb, the costmary; also, the South European Achillea Ageratum, a kind of yarrow.
A maudlin state.
The oxeye daisy.
Alt. of Maugre
In spite of; in opposition to; notwithstanding.
To defy.
See Malkin.
A hare.
A heavy wooden hammer or beetle.
of Maul
of Maul
To beat and bruise with a heavy stick or cudgel; to wound in a coarse manner.
To injure greatly; to do much harm to.
The common mallow.
A severe beating with a stick, cudgel, or the fist.
A stick used by painters as a rest for the hand while working.
See Mawmet.
To munch.
See Manche.
A hand basket.
An East Indian weight, varying in different localities from 25 to about 82 pounds avoirdupois.
Alt. of Maunder
To beg.
To mutter; to mumble; to grumble; to speak indistinctly or disconnectedly; to talk incoherently.
To utter in a grumbling manner; to mutter.
A beggar.
One who maunders.
A pick with two prongs, to pry with.
The Thursday in Passion week, or next before Good Friday.
Mangy.
See Moresque.
A member of the Congregation of Saint Maur, an offshoot of the Benedictines, originating in France in the early part of the seventeenth century. The Maurists have been distinguished for their interest in literature.
Pertaining to a mausoleum; monumental.
of Mausoleum
of Mausoleum
A magnificent tomb, or stately sepulchral monument.
A girl; esp., a great, awkward girl; a wench.
See Mauve aniline, under Mauve.
A color of a delicate purple, violet, or lilac.
An artificial organic base, obtained by oxidizing a mixture of aniline and toluidine, and valuable for the dyestuffs it forms.
Mauve-colored.
In the southwestern part of the united States, a bullock or heifer that has not been branded, and is unclaimed or wild; -- said to be from Maverick, the name of a cattle owner in Texas who neglected to brand his cattle.
The European throstle or song thrush (Turdus musicus).
A gull.
A stomach; the receptacle into which food is taken by swallowing; in birds, the craw; -- now used only of the lower animals, exept humorously or in contempt.
Appetite; inclination.
An old game at cards.
A maggot.
A slattern; a mawks.
See Malkin, and Maukin.
Slatternly.
Apt to cause satiety or loathing; nauseous; disgusting.
Easily disgusted; squeamish; sentimentally fastidious.
In a mawkish way.
The quality or state of being mawkish.
A slattern; a mawk.
Maggoty.
A puppet; a doll; originally, an idol, because in the Middle Ages it was generally believed that the Mohammedans worshiped images representing Mohammed.
The religion of Mohammed; also, idolatry. See Mawmet.
Nauseous.
The seed of the opium poppy.
Any intestinal worm found in the stomach, esp. the common round worm (Ascaris lumbricoides), and allied species.
One of the larvae of botflies of horses; a bot.
of Maxilla
The bone of either the upper or the under jaw.
The bone, or principal bone, of the upper jaw, the bone of the lower jaw being the mandible.
One of the lower or outer jaws of arthropods.
Alt. of Maxillary
Pertaining to either the upper or the lower jaw, but now usually applied to the upper jaw only.
The principal maxillary bone; the maxilla.
Of or pertaining to a maxilla.
Having the form, or structure, of a maxilla.
One of the mouth appendages of Crustacea, situated next behind the maxillae. Crabs have three pairs, but many of the lower Crustacea have but one pair of them. Called also jawfoot, and foot jaw.
Pertaining to the maxilla and mandible; as, the maxillo-mandibular nerve.
Pertaining to the maxillary and palatine regions of the skull; as, the maxillo-palatine process of the maxilla. Also used as n.
Pertaining to the maxillary and turbinal regions of the skull.
The maxillo-turbinal, or inferior turbinate, bone.
An established principle or proposition; a condensed proposition of important practical truth; an axiom of practical wisdom; an adage; a proverb; an aphorism.
The longest note formerly used, equal to two longs, or four breves; a large.
A gold coin of Bavaria, of the value of about 13s. 6d. sterling, or about three dollars and a quarter.
The act or process of increasing to the highest degree.
To increase to the highest degree.
of Maximum
The greatest quantity or value attainable in a given case; or, the greatest value attained by a quantity which first increases and then begins to decrease; the highest point or degree; -- opposed to minimum.
Greatest in quantity or highest in degree attainable or attained; as, a maximum consumption of fuel; maximum pressure; maximum heat.
of May
An auxiliary verb qualifyng the meaning of another verb, by expressing: (a) Ability, competency, or possibility; -- now oftener expressed by can.
A maiden.
The fifth month of the year, containing thirty-one days.
The early part or springtime of life.
The flowers of the hawthorn; -- so called from their time of blossoming; also, the hawthorn.
The merrymaking of May Day.
The name for the doctrine of the unreality of matter, called, in English, idealism; hence, nothingness; vanity; illusion.
Perhaps; possibly; peradventure.
Possible; probable, but not sure.
Possibility; uncertainty.
The whimbrel; -- called also May fowl, May curlew, and May whaap.
The knot.
The bobolink.
The hawthorn.
The hawthorn.
A large dark-red cherry of excellent quality.
A common American minnow (Fundulus majalis). See Minnow.
In England, the hawthorn; in New England, the trailing arbutus (see Arbutus); also, the blossom of these plants.
Perhaps; peradventure.
The maiming of a person by depriving him of the use of any of his members which are necessary for defense or protection. See Maim.
The celebrating of May Day.
A sauce compounded of raw yolks of eggs beaten up with olive oil to the consistency of a sirup, and seasoned with vinegar, pepper, salt, etc.; -- used in dressing salads, fish, etc. Also, a dish dressed with this sauce.
The chief magistrate of a city or borough; the chief officer of a municipal corporation. In some American cities there is a city court of which the major is chief judge.
The conductir of a mule team; also, a head shepherd.
The office, or the term of office, of a mayor.
The wife of a mayor.
The office of a mayor.
A tall pole erected in an open place and wreathed with flowers, about which the rustic May-day sports were had.
The edible fruit of a passion flower, especially that of the North American Passiflora incarnata, an oval yellowish berry as large as a small apple.
A composite plant (Anthemis Cotula), having a strong odor; dog's fennel. It is a native of Europe, now common by the roadsides in the United States.
The feverfew.
Alt. of Mazame
A goatlike antelope (Haplocerus montanus) which inhabits the Rocky Mountains, frequenting the highest parts; -- called also mountain goat.
A kind of small black cherry.
The jaw; the head or skull.
To knock on the head.
Of or pertaining to Cardinal Mazarin, prime minister of France, 1643-1661.
Mazarine blue.
Of or pertaining to Ahura-Mazda, or Ormuzd, the beneficent deity in the Zoroastrian dualistic system; hence, Zoroastrian.
The Zoroastrian religion.
A wild fancy; a confused notion.
Confusion of thought; perplexity; uncertainty; state of bewilderment.
A confusing and baffling network, as of paths or passages; an intricacy; a labyrinth.
of Maze
of Maze
To perplex greatly; to bewilder; to astonish and confuse; to amaze.
To be bewildered.
The condition of being mazed; confusion; astonishment.
Mazy.
A large drinking bowl; -- originally made of maple.
In a mazy manner.
The state or quality of being mazy.
Of or pertaining to mazology.
One versed in mazology or mastology.
Same as Mastology.
Alt. of Mazurka
A Polish dance, or the music which accompanies it, usually in 3-4 or 3-8 measure, with a strong accent on the second beat.
Perplexed with turns and windings; winding; intricate; confusing; perplexing; embarrassing; as, mazy error.
One. See Men, pron.
The person speaking, regarded as an object; myself; a pronoun of the first person used as the objective and dative case of the pronoum I; as, he struck me; he gave me the money, or he gave the money to me; he got me a hat, or he got a hat for me.
To skulk; to cower. See Mich.
An uxorious, effeminate, or spiritless man.
A fermented drink made of water and honey with malt, yeast, etc.; metheglin; hydromel.
A drink composed of sirup of sarsaparilla or other flavoring extract, and water. It is sometimes charged with carbonic acid gas.
A meadow.
A tract of low or level land producing grass which is mown for hay; any field on which grass is grown for hay.
Low land covered with coarse grass or rank herbage near rives and in marshy places by the sea; as, the salt meadows near Newark Bay.
Of or pertaining to a meadow; of the nature of a meadow; produced, growing, or living in, a meadow.
Alt. of Meadowwort
The name of several plants of the genus Spiraea, especially the white- or pink-flowered S. salicifolia, a low European and American shrub, and the herbaceous S. Ulmaria, which has fragrant white flowers in compound cymes.
Of or pertaining to meadows; resembling, or consisting of, meadow.
Alt. of Meagre
Destitue of, or having little, flesh; lean.
Destitute of richness, fertility, strength, or the like; defective in quantity, or poor in quality; poor; barren; scanty in ideas; wanting strength of diction or affluence of imagery.
Dry and harsh to the touch, as chalk.
Alt. of Meagre
To make lean.
Alt. of Meagrely
Poorly; thinly.
Alt. of Meagreness
The state or quality of being meager; leanness; scantiness; barrenness.
A large European sciaenoid fish (Sciaena umbra or S. aquila), having white bloodless flesh. It is valued as a food fish.
A hook with a long handle.
The process of picking out the oakum from the seams of a vessel which is to be recalked.
A part; a fragment; a portion.
The portion of food taken at a particular time for the satisfaction of appetite; the quantity usually taken at one time with the purpose of satisfying hunger; a repast; the act or time of eating a meal; as, the traveler has not eaten a good meal for a week; there was silence during the meal.
Grain (esp. maize, rye, or oats) that is coarsely ground and unbolted; also, a kind of flour made from beans, pease, etc.; sometimes, any flour, esp. if coarse.
Any substance that is coarsely pulverized like meal, but not granulated.
To sprinkle with, or as with, meal.
To pulverize; as, mealed powder.
Maize or Indian corn; -- the common name in South Africa.
The quality or state of being mealy.
See Mealy-mouthed.
The usual time of eating a meal.
Having the qualities of meal; resembling meal; soft, dry, and friable; easily reduced to a condition resembling meal; as, a mealy potato.
Overspread with something that resembles meal; as, the mealy wings of an insect.
Using soft words; plausible; affectedly or timidly delicate of speech; unwilling to tell the truth in plain language.
of Mean
of Mean
To have in the mind, as a purpose, intention, etc.; to intend; to purpose; to design; as, what do you mean to do ?
To signify; to indicate; to import; to denote.
To have a purpose or intention.
Destitute of distinction or eminence; common; low; vulgar; humble.
Wanting dignity of mind; low-minded; base; destitute of honor; spiritless; as, a mean motive.
Of little value or account; worthy of little or no regard; contemptible; despicable.
Of poor quality; as, mean fare.
Penurious; stingy; close-fisted; illiberal; as, mean hospitality.
Occupying a middle position; middle; being about midway between extremes.
Intermediate in excellence of any kind.
Average; having an intermediate value between two extremes, or between the several successive values of a variable quantity during one cycle of variation; as, mean distance; mean motion; mean solar day.
That which is mean, or intermediate, between two extremes of place, time, or number; the middle point or place; middle rate or degree; mediocrity; medium; absence of extremes or excess; moderation; measure.
A quantity having an intermediate value between several others, from which it is derived, and of which it expresses the resultant value; usually, unless otherwise specified, it is the simple average, formed by adding the quantities together and dividing by their number, which is called an arithmetical mean. A geometrical mean is the square root of the product of the quantities.
That through which, or by the help of which, an end is attained; something tending to an object desired; intermediate agency or measure; necessary condition or coagent; instrument.
Hence: Resources; property, revenue, or the like, considered as the condition of easy livelihood, or an instrumentality at command for effecting any purpose; disposable force or substance.
A part, whether alto or tenor, intermediate between the soprano and base; a middle part.
Meantime; meanwhile.
A mediator; a go-between.
A winding, crooked, or involved course; as, the meanders of the veins and arteries.
A tortuous or intricate movement.
Fretwork. See Fret.
To wind, turn, or twist; to make flexuous.
of Meander
of Meander
To wind or turn in a course or passage; to be intricate.
Winding; having many turns.
A genus of corals with meandering grooves and ridges, including the brain corals.
Alt. of Meandry
Winding; flexuous.
That which is meant or intended; intent; purpose; aim; object; as, a mischievous meaning was apparent.
That which is signified, whether by act lanquage; signification; sence; import; as, the meaning of a hint.
Sense; power of thinking.
Moderately.
In a mean manner; unworthily; basely; poorly; ungenerously.
The condition, or quality, of being mean; want of excellence; poorness; lowness; baseness; sordidness; stinginess.
A mean act; as, to be guilty of meanness.
Of a mean spirit; base; groveling.
imp. & p. p. of Mean.
Alt. of Meanwhile
The intervening time; as, in the meantime (or mean time).
Alt. of Meanwhile
In the intervening time; during the interval.
A boundary. See Mere.
Five hundred; as, a mease of herrings.
Leprosy.
A leper.
A tapeworm larva. See 2d Measles, 4.
Infected or spotted with measles, as pork.
Leprosy; also, a leper.
A contagious febrile disorder commencing with catarrhal symptoms, and marked by the appearance on the third day of an eruption of distinct red circular spots, which coalesce in a crescentic form, are slightly raised above the surface, and after the fourth day of the eruption gradually decline; rubeola.
A disease of cattle and swine in which the flesh is filled with the embryos of different varieties of the tapeworm.
A disease of trees.
The larvae of any tapeworm (Taenia) in the cysticerus stage, when contained in meat. Called also bladder worms.
Infected with measles.
Containing larval tapeworms; -- said of pork and beef.
Capable of being measured; susceptible of mensuration or computation.
Moderate; temperate; not excessive.
A standard of dimension; a fixed unit of quantity or extent; an extent or quantity in the fractions or multiples of which anything is estimated and stated; hence, a rule by which anything is adjusted or judged.
An instrument by means of which size or quantity is measured, as a graduated line, rod, vessel, or the like.
The dimensions or capacity of anything, reckoned according to some standard; size or extent, determined and stated; estimated extent; as, to take one's measure for a coat.
The contents of a vessel by which quantity is measured; a quantity determined by a standard; a stated or limited quantity or amount.
Extent or degree not excessive or beyong bounds; moderation; due restraint; esp. in the phrases, in measure; with measure; without or beyond measure.
Determined extent, not to be exceeded; limit; allotted share, as of action, influence, ability, or the like; due proportion.
The quantity determined by measuring, especially in buying and selling; as, to give good or full measure.
Undefined quantity; extent; degree.
Regulated division of movement
A regulated movement corresponding to the time in which the accompanying music is performed; but, especially, a slow and stately dance, like the minuet.
The group or grouping of beats, caused by the regular recurrence of accented beats.
The space between two bars.
The manner of ordering and combining the quantities, or long and short syllables; meter; rhythm; hence, a foot; as, a poem in iambic measure.
A number which is contained in a given number a number of times without a remainder; as in the phrases, the common measure, the greatest common measure, etc., of two or more numbers.
A step or definite part of a progressive course or policy; a means to an end; an act designed for the accomplishment of an object; as, political measures; prudent measures; an inefficient measure.
The act of measuring; measurement.
Beds or strata; as, coal measures; lead measures.
of Measure
of Measure
To ascertain by use of a measuring instrument; to compute or ascertain the extent, quantity, dimensions, or capacity of, by a certain rule or standard; to take the dimensions of; hence, to estimate; to judge of; to value; to appraise.
To serve as the measure of; as, the thermometer measures changes of temperature.
To pass throught or over in journeying, as if laying off and determining the distance.
To adjust by a rule or standard.
To allot or distribute by measure; to set off or apart by measure; -- often with out or off.
To make a measurement or measurements.
To result, or turn out, on measuring; as, the grain measures well; the pieces measure unequally.
To be of a certain size or quantity, or to have a certain length, breadth, or thickness, or a certain capacity according to a standard measure; as, cloth measures three fourths of a yard; a tree measures three feet in diameter.
Regulated or determined by a standard; hence, equal; uniform; graduated; limited; moderated; as, he walked with measured steps; he expressed himself in no measured terms.
Without measure; unlimited; immeasurable.
The act or result of measuring; mensuration; as, measurement is required.
The extent, size, capacity, amount. or quantity ascertained by measuring; as, its measurement is five acres.
One who measures; one whose occupation or duty is to measure commondities in market.
Used in, or adapted for, ascertaining measurements, or dividing by measure.
Food, in general; anything eaten for nourishment, either by man or beast. Hence, the edible part of anything; as, the meat of a lobster, a nut, or an egg.
The flesh of animals used as food; esp., animal muscle; as, a breakfast of bread and fruit without meat.
Specifically, dinner; the chief meal.
To supply with food.
Of or pertaining to a meatus; resembling a meatus.
Fed; fattened.
Having (such) meat; -- used chiefly in composition; as, thick-meated.
Alt. of Meathe
A sweet liquor; mead.
Quality of being meaty.
Having no meat; without food.
A speculum for examining a natural passage, as the urethra.
An instrument for cutting into the urethra so as to enlarge its orifice.
of Meatus
A natural passage or canal; as, the external auditory meatus. See Illust. of Ear.
Abounding in meat.
The sea mew.
See Mew, to cry as a cat.
See Mewl, and Miaul.
See 1st Measle.
Falling in small drops; mistling; mizzing.
See Moebles.
A rope of hair or of maguey fiber, for tying horses, etc.
Of or pertaining to Mecca, in Arabia.
A native or inhabitant of Mecca.
The art of the application of the laws of motion or force to construction.
A mechanician; an artisan; an artificer; one who practices any mechanic art; one skilled or employed in shaping and uniting materials, as wood, metal, etc., into any kind of structure, machine, or other object, requiring the use of tools, or instruments.
Having to do with the application of the laws of motion in the art of constructing or making things; of or pertaining to mechanics; mechanical; as, the mechanic arts.
Of or pertaining to a mechanic or artificer, or to the class of artisans; hence, rude; common; vulgar.
Base.
Pertaining to, governed by, or in accordance with, mechanics, or the laws of motion; pertaining to the quantitative relations of force and matter, as distinguished from mental, vital, chemical, etc.; as, mechanical principles; a mechanical theory; mechanical deposits.
Of or pertaining to a machine or to machinery or tools; made or formed by a machine or with tools; as, mechanical precision; mechanical products.
Done as if by a machine; uninfluenced by will or emotion; proceeding automatically, or by habit, without special intention or reflection; as, mechanical singing; mechanical verses; mechanical service.
Made and operated by interaction of forces without a directing intelligence; as, a mechanical universe.
Obtained by trial, by measurements, etc.; approximate; empirical. See the 2d Note under Geometric.
A mechanic.
To cause to become mechanical.
In a mechanical manner.
The state or quality of being mechanical.
One skilled in the theory or construction of machines; a machinist.
Pertaining to, connected with, or dependent upon, both mechanics and chemistry; -- said especially of those sciences which treat of such phenomena as seem to depend on the laws both of mechanics and chemistry, as electricity and magnetism.
That science, or branch of applied mathematics, which treats of the action of forces on bodies.
The arrangement or relation of the parts of a machine; the parts of a machine, taken collectively; the arrangement or relation of the parts of anything as adapted to produce an effect; as, the mechanism of a watch; the mechanism of a sewing machine; the mechanism of a seed pod.
Mechanical operation or action.
An ideal machine; a combination of movable bodies constituting a machine, but considered only with regard to relative movements.
A maker of machines; one skilled in mechanics.
One who regards the phenomena of nature as the effects of forces merely mechanical.
of Mechanize
of Mechanize
To cause to be mechanical.
One of a number of copies of anything multiplied mechanically.
Treating of mechanics.
Written, copied, or recorded by machinery; produced by mechanography; as, a mechanographic record of changes of temperature; mechanographic prints.
An artist who, by mechanical means, multiplies copies of works of art.
The art of mechanically multiplying copies of a writing, or any work of art.
That branch of science which treats of moving machines.
One of a religious congregation of the Roman Catholic Church devoted to the improvement of Armenians.
A kind of lace made at, or originating in, Mechlin, in Belgium.
A species of jalap, of very feeble properties, said to be obtained from the root of a species of Convolvulus (C. Mechoacan); -- so called from Michoacan, in Mexico, whence it is obtained.
Pertaining to, or discovered by, J. F. Meckel, a German anatomist.
A salt of meconic acid.
Pertaining to, or obtained from, the poppy or opium; specif. (Chem.), designating an acid related to aconitic acid, found in opium and extracted as a white crystalline substance.
An alkaloid found in opium, and extracted as a yellow amorphous substance which is easily decomposed.
A kind of gonophore produced by hydroids of the genus Gonothyraea. It has tentacles, and otherwise resembles a free medusa, but remains attached by a pedicel.
A substance regarded as an anhydride of meconinic acid, existing in opium and extracted as a white crystalline substance. Also erroneously called meconina, meconia, etc., as though it were an alkaloid.
Pertaining to, or designating, an acid which occurs in opium, and which may be obtained by oxidizing narcotine.
Opium.
The contents of the fetal intestine; hence, first excrement.
A piece of metal in the form of a coin, struck with a device, and intended to preserve the remembrance of a notable event or an illustrious person, or to serve as a reward.
of Medal
of Medal
of Medal
of Medal
To honor or reward with a medal.
A small medal.
A person that is skilled or curious in medals; a collector of medals.
A designer of medals.
One who has gained a medal as the reward of merit.
Of or pertaining to a medal, or to medals.
A large medal or memorial coin.
A circular or oval (or, sometimes, square) tablet bearing a figure or figures represented in relief.
The art of making and striking medals and coins.
of Meddle
of Meddle
To mix; to mingle.
To interest or engage one's self; to have to do; -- / a good sense.
To interest or engage one's self unnecessarily or impertinently, to interfere or busy one's self improperly with another's affairs; specifically, to handle or distrub another's property without permission; -- often followed by with or in.
To mix; to mingle.
One who meddles; one who interferes or busies himself with things in which he has no concern; an officious person; a busybody.
Given to meddling; apt to interpose in the affairs of others; officiously intrusive.
Meddlesome.
In a meddling manner.
A native or inhabitant of Media in Asia.
See lst & 2d Mead, and Meed.
pl. of Medium.
of Media
One of the sonant mutes /, /, / (b, d, g), in Greek, or of their equivalents in other languages, so named as intermediate between the tenues, /, /, / (p, t, k), and the aspiratae  (aspirates) /, /, / (ph or f, th, ch). Also called middle mute, or medial, and sometimes soft mute.
The state or quality of being mediate.
Of or relating to the Middle Ages; as, mediaeval architecture.
The method or spirit of the Middle Ages; devotion to the institutions and practices of the Middle Ages; a survival from the Middle Ages.
One who has a taste for, or is versed in, the history of the Middle Ages; one in sympathy with the spirit or forms of the Middle Ages.
In the manner of the Middle Ages; in accordance with mediaevalism.
The people who lived in the Middle Ages.
Of or pertaining to a mean or average; mean; as, medial alligation.
See 2d Media.
See Half-moon.
Being in the middle; running through the middle; as, a median groove.
Situated in the middle; lying in a plane dividing a bilateral animal into right and left halves; -- said of unpaired organs and parts; as, median coverts.
A median line or point.
The third above the keynote; -- so called because it divides the interval between the tonic and dominant into two thirds.
Of or pertaining to a mediastinum.
Alt. of Mediastinum
A partition; a septum; specifically, the folds of the pleura (and the space included between them) which divide the thorax into a right and left cavity. The space included between these folds of the pleura, called the mediastinal space, contains the heart and gives passage to the esophagus and great blood vessels.
Being between the two extremes; middle; interposed; intervening; intermediate.
Acting by means, or by an intervening cause or instrument; not direct or immediate; acting or suffering through an intervening agent or condition.
Gained or effected by a medium or condition.
of Mediate
of Mediate
To be in the middle, or between two; to intervene.
To interpose between parties, as the equal friend of each, esp. for the purpose of effecting a reconciliation or agreement; as, to mediate between nations.
To effect by mediation or interposition; to bring about as a mediator, instrument, or means; as, to mediate a peace.
To divide into two equal parts.
In a mediate manner; by a secondary cause or agent; not directly or primarily; by means; -- opposed to immediately.
The state of being mediate.
The act of mediating; action or relation of anything interposed; action as a necessary condition, means, or instrument; interposition; intervention.
Hence, specifically, agency between parties at variance, with a view to reconcile them; entreaty for another; intercession.
Pertaining to mediation; used in mediation; as, mediative efforts.
The act of mediatizing.
of Mediatize
of Mediatize
To cause to act through an agent or to hold a subordinate position; to annex; -- specifically applied to the annexation during the former German empire of a smaller German state to a larger, while allowing it a nominal sovereignty, and its prince his rank.
One who mediates; especially, one who interposes between parties at variance for the purpose of reconciling them; hence, an intercessor.
Of or pertaining to a mediator, or to mediation; mediatory; as, a mediatorial office.
The office or character of a mediator.
Mediatorial.
Alt. of Mediatrix
A female mediator.
A leguminous plant of the genus Medicago. The black medic is the Medicago lupulina; the purple medic, or lucern, is M. sativa.
Medical.
Capable of being medicated; admitting of being cured or healed.
Of, pertaining to, or having to do with, the art of healing disease, or the science of medicine; as, the medical profession; medical services; a medical dictionary; medical jurisprudence.
Containing medicine; used in medicine; medicinal; as, the medical properties of a plant.
In a medical manner; with reference to healing, or to the principles of the healing art.
Anything used for healing diseases or wounds; a medicine; a healing application.
Of or pertaining to medicaments or healing applications; having the qualities of medicaments.
A quack.
of Medicate
of Medicate
To tincture or impregnate with anything medicinal; to drug.
To treat with medicine.
The act or process of medicating.
Medicinal; acting like a medicine.
Of or relating to the Medici, a noted Italian family; as, the Medicean Venus.
Medicinal; having the power of healing.
Having curative or palliative properties; used for the cure or alleviation of bodily disorders; as, medicinal tinctures, plants, or springs.
Of or pertaining to medicine; medical.
In a medicinal manner.
The science which relates to the prevention, cure, or alleviation of disease.
Any substance administered in the treatment of disease; a remedial agent; a remedy; physic.
A philter or love potion.
A physician.
To give medicine to; to affect as a medicine does; to remedy; to cure.
Of or pertaining to law as affected by medical facts.
A large transverse commissure in the third ventricle of the brain; the middle or soft commissure.
of Medicornu
The middle or inferior horn of each lateral ventricle of the brain.
Science of medicine.
The middle part; half; moiety.
Alt. of Medievalist
Alt. of Medievalist
Same as Medi/val, Medi/valism, etc.
A subdivision of the Niagara period in the American upper Silurian, characterized by the formations known as the Oneida conglomerate, and the Medina sandstone. See the Chart of Geology.
Same as Para.
Mediocre.
Of a middle quality; of but a moderate or low degree of excellence; indifferent; ordinary.
A mediocre person.
A young monk who was excused from performing a portion of a monk's duties.
A mediocre person.
The quality of being mediocre; a middle state or degree; a moderate degree or rate.
Moderation; temperance.
Pertaining to that part of the columella of the ear which, in some animals, connects the stapes with the other parts of the columella.
The mediostapedial part of the columella.
Intermediate.
Meditation.
of Meditate
of Meditate
To keep the mind in a state of contemplation; to dwell on anything in thought; to think seriously; to muse; to cogitate; to reflect.
To contemplate; to keep the mind fixed upon; to study.
To purpose; to intend; to design; to plan by revolving in the mind; as, to meditate a war.
The act of meditating; close or continued thought; the turning or revolving of a subject in the mind; serious contemplation; reflection; musing.
Thought; -- without regard to kind.
One who is given to meditation.
Disposed to meditate, or to meditation; as, a meditative man; a meditative mood.
Inclosed, or nearly inclosed, with land; as, the Mediterranean Sea, between Europe and Africa.
Inland; remote from the ocean.
Of or pertaining to the Mediterranean Sea; as, Mediterranean trade; a Mediterranean voyage.
Inland.
of Medium
of Medium
That which lies in the middle, or between other things; intervening body or quantity. Hence, specifically: (a) Middle place or degree; mean.
See Mean.
The mean or middle term of a syllogism; that by which the extremes are brought into connection.
A substance through which an effect is transmitted from one thing to another; as, air is the common medium of sound. Hence: The condition upon which any event or action occurs; necessary means of motion or action; that through or by which anything is accomplished, conveyed, or carried on; specifically, in animal magnetism, spiritualism, etc., a person through whom the action of another being is said to be manifested and transmitted.
An average.
A trade name for printing and writing paper of certain sizes. See Paper.
The liquid vehicle with which dry colors are ground and prepared for application.
Having a middle position or degree; mean; intermediate; medial; as, a horse of medium size; a decoction of medium strength.
Having a medium size; as, a medium-sized man.
of Medius
The third or middle finger; the third digit, or that which corresponds to it.
A tree of the genus Mespilus (M. Germanica); also, the fruit of the tree. The fruit is something like a small apple, but has a bony endocarp. When first gathered the flesh is hard and austere, and it is not eaten until it has begun to decay.
To mix; to mingle; to meddle.
of Medley
A mixture; a mingled and confused mass of ingredients, usually inharmonious; a jumble; a hodgepodge; -- often used contemptuously.
The confusion of a hand to hand battle; a brisk, hand to hand engagement; a melee.
A composition of passages detached from several different compositions; a potpourri.
A cloth of mixed colors.
Mixed; of mixed material or color.
Mingled; confused.
See Medle.
A class of claret wines, including several varieties, from the district of Medoc in the department of Gironde.
See Bonito, 3.
A species of gull or tern.
Marrow; pith; hence, essence.
The marrow of bones; the deep or inner portion of an organ or part; as, the medulla, or medullary substance, of the kidney; specifically, the medula oblongata.
A soft tissue, occupying the center of the stem or branch of a plant; pith.
See Medullary.
Pertaining to, consisting of, or resembling, marrow or medulla.
Pertaining to the medula oblongata.
Filled with spongy pith; pithy.
Furnished with a medulla or marrow, or with a medullary sheath; as, a medullated nerve fiber.
A variety of lignin or cellulose found in the medulla, or pith, of certain plants.  Cf. Lignin, and Cellulose.
The Gorgon; or one of the Gorgons whose hair was changed into serpents, after which all who looked upon her were turned into stone.
of Medusa
Any free swimming acaleph; a jellyfish.
A medusa.
Resembling a medusa in shape or structure.
Like a medusa; having the fundamental structure of a medusa, but without a locomotive disk; -- said of the sessile gonophores of hydroids.
A sessile gonophore. See Illust. under Gonosome.
See Mich.
That which is bestowed or rendered in consideration of merit; reward; recompense.
Merit or desert; worth.
A gift; also, a bride.
To reward; to repay.
To deserve; to merit.
Worthy of meed, reward, or recompense; meritorious.
According to merit; suitably.
Mild of temper; not easily provoked or orritated; patient under injuries; not vain, or haughty, or resentful; forbearing; submissive.
Evincing mildness of temper, or patience; characterized by mildness or patience; as, a meek answer; a meek face.
Alt. of Meeken
To make meek; to nurture in gentleness and humility.
In a meek manner.
The quality or state of being meek.
Simple; unmixed. See Mere, a.
See Mere, a lake.
A boundary. See Mere.
A South African carnivore (Cynictis penicillata), allied to the ichneumons.
A fine white claylike mineral, soft, and light enough when in dry masses to float in water. It is a hydrous silicate of magnesia, and is obtained chiefly in Asia Minor. It is manufacturd into tobacco pipes, cigar holders, etc. Also called sepiolite.
A tobacco pipe made of this mineral.
of Meet
of Meet
To join, or come in contact with; esp., to come in contact with by approach from an opposite direction; to come upon or against, front to front, as distinguished from contact by following and overtaking.
To come in collision with; to confront in conflict; to encounter hostilely; as, they met the enemy and defeated them; the ship met opposing winds and currents.
To come into the presence of without contact; to come close to; to intercept; to come within the perception, influence, or recognition of; as, to meet a train at a junction; to meet carriages or persons in the street; to meet friends at a party; sweet sounds met the ear.
To perceive; to come to a knowledge of; to have personal acquaintance with; to experience; to suffer; as, the eye met a horrid sight; he met his fate.
To come up to; to be even with; to equal; to match; to satisfy; to ansver; as, to meet one's expectations; the supply meets the demand.
To come together by mutual approach; esp., to come in contact, or into proximity, by approach from opposite directions; to join; to come face to face; to come in close relationship; as, we met in the street; two lines meet so as to form an angle.
To come together with hostile purpose; to have an encounter or conflict.
To assemble together; to congregate; as, Congress meets on the first Monday of December.
To come together by mutual concessions; hence, to agree; to harmonize; to unite.
An assembling together; esp., the assembling of huntsmen for the hunt; also, the persons who so assemble, and the place of meeting.
Suitable; fit; proper; appropriate; qualified; convenient.
Meetly.
To render fit.
One who meets.
Mead. See Meathe.
A coming together; an assembling; as, the meeting of Congress.
A junction, crossing, or union; as, the meeting of the roads or of two rivers.
A congregation; a collection of people; a convention; as, a large meeting; an harmonius meeting.
An assembly for worship; as, to attend meeting on Sunday; -- in England, applied distinctively and disparagingly to the worshiping assemblies of Dissenters.
A house used as a place of worship; a church; -- in England, applied only to a house so used by Dissenters.
Fitly; suitably; properly.
Fitness; suitableness; propriety.
Alt. of Megalo-
Alt. of Megalo-
Combining forms signifying: (a) Great, extended, powerful; as, megascope, megacosm.
A million times, a million of; as, megameter, a million meters; megafarad, a million farads; megohm, a million ohms.
Alt. of Megacephalous
Large headed; -- applied to animals, and to plants when they have large flower heads.
The Irish elk.
A leaf-cutting bee of the genus Megachilus. See Leaf cutter, under Leaf.
See Macrocosm.
A million coulombs.
Any one of several species of Old World blood-sucking bats of the genus Megaderma.
One of the larger measures of force, amounting to one million dynes.
One of the larger measures of electrical capacity, amounting to one million farads; a macrofarad.
A million ergs; a megerg.
Pertaining to, or in honor of, Cybele; as, the Megalesian games at Rome.
An optical apparatus in which pictures are viewed through a large lens with stereoptical effects. It is often combined with the stereoscope.
A large stone; especially, a large stone used in ancient building.
See Meg-.
A large, flattened corpuscle, twice the diameter of the ordinary red corpuscle, found in considerable numbers in the blood in profound anaemia.
A form of mental alienation in which the patient has grandiose delusions.
An extinct quaternary mammal, of great size, allied to the sloth.
Having a loud voice.
A chief city; a metropolis.
A larva, in a stage following the zoea, in the development of most crabs. In this stage the legs and abdominal appendages have appeared, the abdomen is relatively long, and the eyes are large. Also used adjectively.
A large fish; the tarpum.
Greatness of soul.
Alt. of Megalosaurus
A gigantic carnivorous dinosaur, whose fossil remains have been found in England and elsewhere.
An instrument for determining longitude by observation of the stars.
A micrometer.
Alt. of Megametre
In the metric system, one million meters, or one thousand kilometers.
A million amperes.
A device to magnify sound, or direct it in a given direction in a greater volume, as a very large funnel used as an ear trumpet or as a speaking trumpet.
An extinct genus of tree ferns with large, two-ranked leaves, or fronds.
Any one of several species of large-footed, gallinaceous birds of the genera Megapodius and Leipoa, inhabiting Australia and other Pacific islands. See Jungle fowl (b) under Jungle, and Leipoa.
A metropolis.
Alt. of Megaric
Belonging, or pertaining, to Megara, a city of ancient Greece.
A modification of the magic lantern, used esp. for throwing a magnified image of an opaque object on a screen, solar or artificial light being used.
Having the orbital index relatively large; having the orbits narrow transversely; -- opposed to microseme.
Alt. of Megasse
See Bagasse.
One of a group which includes the higher orders of mammals, having a large size as a typical characteristic.
Having a typically large size; belonging to the megasthenes.
One of a group of univalve shells, having a large aperture or mouth.
Alt. of Megatherium
An extinct gigantic quaternary mammal, allied to the ant-eaters and sloths. Its remains are found in South America.
One of a family of extinct edentates found in America. The family includes the megatherium, the megalonyx, etc.
One of the larger measures of electro-motive force, amounting to one million volts.
A million webers.
One of the larger measures of work, amounting to one million ergs; -- called also megalerg.
Alt. of Megilph
A gelatinous compound of linseed oil and mastic varnish, used by artists as a vehicle for colors.
One of the larger measures of electrical resistance, amounting to one million ohms.
A kind of sick or nevrous headache, usually periodical and confined to one side of the head.
A fancy; a whim; a freak; a humor; esp., in the plural, lowness of spirits.
A sudden vertigo in a horse, succeeded sometimes by unconsciousness, produced by an excess of blood in the brain; a mild form of apoplexy.
The British smooth sole, or scaldfish (Psetta arnoglossa).
Of, pertaining to, or discovered by, Meibomius.
See Menge.
Alt. of Meiny
A family, including servants, etc.; household; retinue; train.
Company; band; army.
See Miocene.
A member of the scapolite, group, occuring in glassy crystals on Monte Somma, near Naples.
Diminution; a species of hyperbole, representing a thing as being less than it really is.
Having fever stamens than the parts of the corolla.
See Mastersinger.
See Mechitarist.
An earthy black oxide of copper, arising from the decomposition of other ores.
Alt. of Melado
A mixture of sugar and molasses; crude sugar as it comes from the pans without being drained.
A discharge from the bowels of black matter, consisting of altered blood.
The dark coloring matter of the liquid of the cuttlefish.
See Melanotype.
A white or buff-colored granular powder, C6H9N11, obtained by heating ammonium sulphocyanate.
A strong nitrogenous base, C3H6N6, produced from several cyanogen compounds, and obtained as a white crystalline substance, -- formerly supposed to be produced by the decomposition of melam. Called also cyanuramide.
The black hellebore.
Alt. of Melampyrite
The saccharine substance dulcite; -- so called because found in the leaves of cowwheat (Melampyrum). See Dulcite.
A morbid condition in which the blood contains black pigment either floating freely or imbedded in the white blood corpuscles.
A medicine supposed to expel black bile or choler.
A kind of mental unsoundness characterized by extreme depression of spirits, ill-grounded fears, delusions, and brooding over one particular subject or train of ideas.
A person affected with melancholy; a melancholic.
Given to melancholy; depressed; melancholy; dejected; unhappy.
One affected with a gloomy state of mind.
A gloomy state of mind; melancholy.
In a melancholy manner.
The state or quality of being melancholy.
Melancholy.
One affected with melancholy or dejection.
To become gloomy or dejected in mind.
To make melancholy.
Depression of spirits; a gloomy state continuing a considerable time; deep dejection; gloominess.
Great and continued depression of spirits, amounting to mental unsoundness; melancholia.
Pensive maditation; serious thoughtfulness.
Ill nature.
Depressed in spirits; dejected; gloomy dismal.
Producing great evil and grief; causing dejection; calamitous; afflictive; as, a melancholy event.
Somewhat deranged in mind; having the jugment impaired.
Favorable to meditation; somber.
Of or pertaining to Melanesia.
A mixture; a medley.
One of a family of fresh-water pectinibranchiate mollusks, having a turret-shaped shell.
Melanotic.
Of or pertaining to the black-haired races.
A complex nitrogenous hydrocarbon obtained artificially (as by the action of cyanogen chloride on aniline) as a white, crystalline substance; -- called also diphenyl guanidin.
A black pigment found in the pigment-bearing cells of the skin (particularly in the skin of the negro), in the epithelial cells of the external layer of the retina (then called fuscin), in the outer layer of the choroid, and elsewhere. It is supposed to be derived from the decomposition of hemoglobin.
An undue development of dark-colored pigment in the skin or its appendages; -- the opposite of albinism.
A disease; black jaundice. See Mel/na.
Affected with melanism; of the nature of melanism.
A black variety of garnet.
A group of the human race, including the dark whites.
Having a dark complexion; of or pertaining to the Melanochroi.
A mineral of a red, or brownish or yellowish red color. It is a chromate of lead; -- called also phoenicocroite.
Having very dark or black hair; black-haired.
An East Indian genus of large trees. Melanorrh/a usitatissima is the lignum-vitae of Pegu, and yelds a valuable black varnish.
An instrument containing a combination of colored glasses such that they transmit only red light, so that objects of other colors, as green leaves, appear black when seen through it. It is used for viewing colored flames, to detect the presence of potassium, lithium, etc., by the red light which they emit.
The morbid deposition of black matter, often of a malignant character, causing pigmented tumors.
An alga of any kind that produces blackish spores, or seed dust. The melanosperms include the rockweeds and all kinds of kelp.
Melanistic.
A positive picture produced with sensitized collodion on a smooth surface of black varnish, coating a thin plate of iron; also, the process of making such a picture.
A hydrous sulphate of iron of a green color and vitreous luster; iron vitriol.
A small fish of the Mediterranean; a gilthead. See Gilthead (a).
Pertaining to, or designating, a complex nitrogenous acid obtained by decomposition of melam, or of urea, as a white crystalline powder; -- called also melanurenic acid.
Any one of several dark-colored augitic, eruptive rocks allied to basalt.
A dark discoloration of the skin, usually local; as, Addison's melasma, or Addison's disease.
See Molasses.
Pertaining to, or designating, an acid obtained from molasses or glucose, and probably identical with saccharic acid. See Saccharic.
A genus of evergreen tropical shrubs; -- so called from the black berries of some species, which stain the mouth.
Belonging to the order of which Melastoma is the type.
One of a sect, chiefly in Syria and Egypt, which acknowledges the authority of the pope, but adheres to the liturgy and ceremonies of the Eastern Church.
Of or pertaining to the genus Meleagris.
A genus of American gallinaceous birds, including the common and the wild turkeys.
A fight in which the combatants are mingled in one confused mass; a hand to hand conflict; an affray.
See Melaena.
An unsaturated hydrocarbon, C30H60, of the ethylene series, obtained from beeswax as a white, scaly, crystalline wax; -- called also melissene, and melissylene.
An explosive of great destructive power; -- so called from its color, which resembles honey.
See Quercitin.
A variety of sugar, isomeric with sucrose, extracted from the manna of the larch (Larix).
Pertaining to a natural order (Meliacae) of plants of which the genus Melia is the type. It includes the mahogany and the Spanish cedar.
Alt. of Melib/an
Alternately responsive, as verses.
Of or pertaining to song; lyric; tuneful.
Consisting of or containing matter like honey; -- said of certain encysted tumors.
A genus of grasses (Melica) of little agricultural importance.
See Melocoton.
A meadlike drink.
A mineral occurring in small yellow crystals, found in the lavas (melilite basalt) of Vesuvius, and elsewhere.
Any species of Melilotus, a genus of leguminous herbs having a vanillalike odor; sweet clover; hart's clover. The blue melilot (Melilotus caerulea) is used in Switzerland to give color and flavor to sapsago cheese.
Of, pertaining to, or obtained from, sweet clover or melilot; specifically, designating an acid of the aromatic series, obtained from melilot as a white crystalline substance.
of Meliorate
of Meliorate
To make better; to improve; to ameliorate; to soften; to make more tolerable.
To grow better.
Same as Meliorator.
The act or operation of meliorating, or the state of being meliorated; improvement.
One who meliorates.
The doctrine that there is a tendency throughout nature toward improvement.
The state or quality of being better; melioration.
Belonging to the genus Meliphaga.
Any bird of the genus Meliphaga and allied genera; a honey eater; -- called also meliphagidan.
Eating, or feeding upon, honey.
of Melisma
A piece of melody; a song or tune, -- as opposed to recitative or musical declamation.
A grace or embellishment.
A genus of labiate herbs, including the balm, or bee balm (Melissa officinalis).
Pertaining to, or derived from, beeswax; specif., denoting an acid obtained by oxidation of myricin.
See Myricyl.
See Melene.
A variety of sugar isomeric with sucrose, extracted from cotton seeds and from the so-called Australian manna (a secretion of certain species of Eucalyptus).
To mix; to meddle.
Honey.
A mill.
A mellitate.
A melee; a conflict.
See Mellitic.
Producing honey.
Producing honey.
The making or production of honey.
A flow of sweetness, or a sweet, smooth flow.
Flowing as with honey; smooth; mellifluous.
In a mellifluent manner.
Flowing as with honey; smooth; flowing sweetly or smoothly; as, a mellifluous voice.
Having the qualities of honey.
Honeydew.
Speaking sweetly or harmoniously.
See Meliphagan.
See Meliphagous.
A salt of mellitic acid.
A mineral of a honey color, found in brown coal, and partly the result of vegetable decomposition; honeystone. It is a mellitate of alumina.
Containing saccharine matter; marked by saccharine secretions; as, mellitic diabetes.
Pertaining to, or derived from, the mineral mellite.
A yellow powder, C6H3N9, obtained from certain sulphocyanates. It has acid properties and forms compounds called mellonides.
See Mellone.
Soft or tender by reason of ripeness; having a tender pulp; as, a mellow apple.
Easily worked or penetrated; not hard or rigid; as, a mellow soil.
Not coarse, rough, or harsh; subdued; soft; rich; delicate; -- said of sound, color, flavor, style, etc.
Well matured; softened by years; genial; jovial.
Warmed by liquor; slightly intoxicated.
of Mellow
of Mellow
To make mellow.
To become mellow; as, ripe fruit soon mellows.
In a mellow manner.
Quality or state of being mellow.
Soft; unctuous.
A climbing plant (Ullucus officinalis) of the Andes, having tuberous roots which are used as a substitute for potatoes.
A mill.
Alt. of Melocotoon
A quince.
A kind of peach having one side deep red, and the flesh yellow.
A kind of small reed organ; -- a portable form of the seraphine.
A music hall.
Of the nature of melody; relating to, containing, or made up of, melody; melodious.
The department of musical science which treats of the pitch of tones, and of the laws of melody.
A contrivance for preserving a record of music, by recording the action of the keys of a musical instrument when played upon.
Containing, or producing, melody; musical; agreeable to the ear by a sweet succession of sounds; as, a melodious voice.
A composer or singer of melodies.
of Melodize
of Melodize
To make melodious; to form into, or set to, melody.
To make melody; to compose melodies; to harmonize.
Formerly, a kind of drama having a musical accompaniment to intensify the effect of certain scenes. Now, a drama abounding in romantic sentiment and agonizing situations, with a musical accompaniment only in parts which are especially thrilling or pathetic. In opera, a passage in which the orchestra plays a somewhat descriptive accompaniment, while the actor speaks; as, the melodrama in the gravedigging scene of Beethoven's "Fidelio".
Of or pertaining to melodrama; like or suitable to a melodrama; unnatural in situation or action.
One who acts in, or writes, melodramas.
Melodrama.
of Melody
A sweet or agreeable succession of sounds.
A rhythmical succession of single tones, ranging for the most part within a given key, and so related together as to form a musical whole, having the unity of what is technically called a musical thought, at once pleasing to the ear and characteristic in expression.
The air or tune of a musical piece.
A genus of beetles without wings, but having short oval elytra; the oil beetles. These beetles are sometimes used instead of cantharides for raising blisters. See Oil beetle, under Oil.
Same as Melodiograph.
A beetle of the genus Melolontha, and allied genera. See May beetle, under May.
The juicy fruit of certain cucurbitaceous plants, as the muskmelon, watermelon, and citron melon; also, the plant that produces the fruit.
A large, ornamental, marine, univalve shell of the genus Melo.
A piano having a mechanical attachment which enables the player to prolong the notes at will.
Of or pertaining to meloplasty, or the artificial formation of a new cheek.
The process of restoring a cheek which has been destroyed wholly or in part.
The art of forming melody; melody; -- now often used for a melodic passage, rather than a complete melody.
A picture produced by a process in which development after exposure may be deferred indefinitely, so as to permit transportation of exposed plates; also, the process itself.
The Muse of tragedy.
The eighteenth asteroid.
Honey of roses.
See 2d Milt.
of Melt
of Melt
of Melt
To reduce from a solid to a liquid state, as by heat; to liquefy; as, to melt wax, tallow, or lead; to melt ice or snow.
Hence: To soften, as by a warming or kindly influence; to relax; to render gentle or susceptible to mild influences; sometimes, in a bad sense, to take away the firmness of; to weaken.
To be changed from a solid to a liquid state under the influence of heat; as, butter and wax melt at moderate temperatures.
To dissolve; as, sugar melts in the mouth.
Hence: To be softened; to become tender, mild, or gentle; also, to be weakened or subdued, as by fear.
To lose distinct form or outline; to blend.
To disappear by being dispersed or dissipated; as, the fog melts away.
Capable of being melted.
One who, or that which, melts.
Liquefaction; the act of causing (something) to melt, or the process of becoming melted.
Causing to melt; becoming melted; -- used literally or figuratively; as, a melting heat; a melting appeal; a melting mood.
A kind of stout woolen cloth with unfinished face and without raised nap. A commoner variety has a cotton warp.
To remember; to cause to remember; to mention.
A part of an animal capable of performing a distinct office; an organ; a limb.
Hence, a part of a whole; an independent constituent of a body
A part of a discourse or of a period or sentence; a clause; a part of a verse.
Either of the two parts of an algebraic equation, connected by the sign of equality.
Any essential part, as a post, tie rod, strut, etc., of a framed structure, as a bridge truss.
Any part of a building, whether constructional, as a pier, column, lintel, or the like, or decorative, as a molding, or group of moldings.
One of the persons composing a society, community, or the like; an individual forming part of an association; as, a member of the society of Friends.
Having limbs; -- chiefly used in composition.
Having legs of a different tincture from that of the body; -- said of a bird in heraldic representations.
The state of being a member.
The collective body of members, as of a society.
Relating to a member.
Same as Membranous.
Thin and rather soft or pliable, as the leaves of the rose, peach tree, and aspen poplar.
A thin layer or fold of tissue, usually supported by a fibrous network, serving to cover or line some part or organ, and often secreting or absorbing certain fluids.
See Membranous.
Having or producing membranes.
Having the form of a membrane or of parchment.
The science which treats of membranes.
Pertaining to, consisting of, or resembling, membrane; as, a membranous covering or lining.
Membranaceous.
of Memento
A hint, suggestion, token, or memorial, to awaken memory; that which reminds or recalls to memory; a souvenir.
A small deerlet, or chevrotain, of India.
A celebrated Egyptian statue near Thebes, said to have the property of emitting a harplike sound at sunrise.
Alt. of Memoirs
A memorial account; a history composed from personal experience and memory; an account of transactions or events (usually written in familiar style) as they are remembered by the writer. See History, 2.
A memorial of any individual; a biography; often, a biography written without special regard to method and completeness.
An account of something deemed noteworthy; an essay; a record of investigations of any subject; the journals and proceedings of a society.
A writer of memoirs.
Things remarkable and worthy of remembrance or record; also, the record of them.
The quality or state of being memorable.
Worthy to be remembered; very important or remarkable.
of Memorandum
of Memorandum
A record of something which it is desired to remember; a note to help the memory.
A brief or informal note in writing of some transaction, or an outline of an intended instrument; an instrument drawn up in a brief and compendious form.
To commemorate.
Commemorative.
Memory.
Serving to preserve remembrance; commemorative; as, a memorial building.
Mnemonic; assisting the memory.
Anything intended to preserve the memory of a person or event; something which serves to keep something else in remembrance; a monument.
A memorandum; a record.
A written representation of facts, addressed to the government, or to some branch of it, or to a society, etc., -- often accompanied with a petition.
Memory; remembrance.
A species of informal state paper, much used in negotiation.
One who writes or signs a memorial.
of Memorialize
of Memorialize
To address or petition by a memorial; to present a memorial to; as, to memorialize the legislature.
One who petitions by a memorial.
One who, or that which, causes to be remembered.
By, or from, memory.
of Memorize
of Memorize
To cause to be remembered ; hence, to record.
To commit to memory; to learn by heart.
of Memory
The faculty of the mind by which it retains the knowledge of previous thoughts, impressions, or events.
The reach and positiveness with which a person can remember; the strength and trustworthiness of one's power to reach and represent or to recall the past; as, his memory was never wrong.
The actual and distinct retention and recognition of past ideas in the mind; remembrance; as, in memory of youth; memories of foreign lands.
The time within which past events can be or are remembered; as, within the memory of man.
Something, or an aggregate of things, remembered; hence, character, conduct, etc., as preserved in remembrance, history, or tradition; posthumous fame; as, the war became only a memory.
A memorial.
Of or pertaining to the ancient city of Memphis in Egypt; hence, Egyptian; as, Memphian darkness.
pl. of Man.
A man; one; -- used with a verb in the singular, and corresponding to the present indefinite one or they.
An iron-black or steel-gray mineral, consisting chiefly of the oxides of iron and titanium. It is commonly massive, but occurs also in rhombohedral crystals. Called also titanic iron ore, and ilmenite.
The show of an intention to inflict evil; a threat or threatening; indication of a probable evil or catastrophe to come.
of Menace
of Menace
To express or show an intention to inflict, or to hold out a prospect of inflicting, evil or injury upon; to threaten; -- usually followed by with before the harm threatened; as, to menace a country with war.
To threaten, as an evil to be inflicted.
To act in threatening manner; to wear a threatening aspect.
One who menaces.
In a threatening manner.
See Manage.
A collection of animals; a menagerie.
A piace where animals are kept and trained.
A collection of wild or exotic animals, kept for exhibition.
Emmenagogue.
of Menaion
A work of twelve volumes, each containing the offices in the Greek Church for a month; also, each volume of the same.
Alt. of Menild
Covered with spots; speckled; variegated.
of Mend
of Mend
To repair, as anything that is torn, broken, defaced, decayed, or the like; to restore from partial decay, injury, or defacement; to patch up; to put in shape or order again; to re-create; as, to mend a garment or a machine.
To alter for the better; to set right; to reform; hence, to quicken; as, to mend one's manners or pace.
To help, to advance, to further; to add to.
To grow better; to advance to a better state; to become improved.
Capable of being mended.
Given to deception or falsehood; lying; as, a mendacious person.
False; counterfeit; containing falsehood; as, a mendacious statement.
of Mendacity
The quality or state of being mendacious; a habit of lying.
A falsehood; a lie.
One who mends or repairs.
See Mendinant.
The condition of being mendicant; beggary; begging.
Practicing beggary; begging; living on alms; as, mendicant friars.
A beggar; esp., one who makes a business of begging; specifically, a begging friar.
To beg.
The act or practice of begging; beggary; mendicancy.
The practice of begging; the life of a beggar; mendicancy.
A mendicant or begging friar.
Amendment.
The cackerel.
Medregal.
See Amends.
of Menge
of Menge
of Menge
of Menge
To mix.
An American marine fish of the Herring familt (Brevoortia tyrannus), chiefly valuable for its oil and as a component of fertilizers; -- called also mossbunker, bony fish, chebog, pogy, hardhead, whitefish, etc.
A large stone set upright in olden times as a memorial or monument. Many, of unknown date, are found in Brittany and throughout Northern Europe.
Belonging to a retinue or train of servants; performing servile office; serving.
Pertaining to servants, esp. domestic servants; servile; low; mean.
A domestic servant or retainer, esp. one of humble rank; one employed in low or servile offices.
A person of a servile character or disposition.
A disease characterized by deafness and vertigo, resulting in incoordination of movement. It is supposed to depend upon a morbid condition of the semicircular canals of the internal ear. Named after Meniere, a French physician.
See Opal.
Of or pertaining to the meninges.
The three membranes that envelop the brain and spinal cord; the pia mater, dura mater, and arachnoid membrane.
Inflammation of the membranes of the brain or spinal cord.
Pertaining to, or having the form of, a meniscus.
Concavo-convex, like a meniscus.
of Meniscus
of Meniscus
A crescent.
A lens convex on one side and concave on the other.
An interarticular synovial cartilage or membrane; esp., one of the intervertebral synovial disks in some parts of the vertebral column of birds.
Pertaining to a natural order (Menispermace/) of climbing plants of which moonseed (Menispermum) is the type.
Pertaining to, or obtained from, moonseed (Menispermum), or other plants of the same family, as the Anamirta Cocculus.
An alkaloid distinct from picrotoxin and obtained from the cocculus indicus (the fruit of Anamirta Cocculus, formerly Menispermum Cocculus) as a white, crystalline, tasteless powder; -- called also menispermina.
Same as Miniver.
Alt. of Mennonite
One of a small denomination of Christians, so called from Menno Simons of Friesland, their founder. They believe that the New Testament is the only rule of faith, that there is no original sin, that infants should not be baptized, and that Christians ought not to take oath, hold office, or render military service.
Alt. of Menobranchus
A large aquatic American salamander of the genus Necturus, having permanent external gills.
of Menology
of Menology
Alt. of Menology
A register of months.
A brief calendar of the lives of the saints for each day in the year, or a simple remembrance of those whose lives are not written.
The period of natural cessation of menstruation. See Change of life, under Change.
Alt. of Menopome
The hellbender.
Profuse menstruation.
Any profuse bleeding from the uterus; Metrorrhagia.
Stoppage of the mences.
Same as Menostasis.
A minnow.
One whose motive is to please men or the world, rather than God.
Belonging to the table; transacted at table; as, mensal conversation.
Occurring once in a month; monthly.
Manliness; dignity; comeliness; civility.
To grace.
The catamenial or menstrual discharge, a periodic flow of blood or bloody fluid from the uterus or female generative organs.
Recurring once a month; monthly; gone through in a month; as, the menstrual revolution of the moon; pertaining to monthly changes; as, the menstrual equation of the sun's place.
Of or pertaining to the menses; as, menstrual discharges; the menstrual period.
Of or pertaining to a menstruum.
Subject to monthly flowing or menses.
Menstruous.
of Menstruate
of Menstruate
To discharge the menses; to have the catamenial flow.
The discharge of the menses; also, the state or the period of menstruating.
The menstrual flux; menses.
Having the monthly flow or discharge; menstruating.
Of or pertaining tj the monthly flow; catamenial.
of Menstruum
of Menstruum
Any substance which dissolves a solid body; a solvent.
The quality of being mensurable.
Capable of being measured; measurable.
The quality or state of being mensurable; measurableness.
Of or pertaining to measure.
To measure.
The act, process, or art, of measuring.
That branch of applied geometry which gives rules for finding the length of lines, the areas of surfaces, or the volumes of solids, from certain simple data of lines and angles.
A suffix denoting that which does a thing; an act or process; the result of an act or process; state or condition; as, aliment, that which nourishes, ornament, increment; fragment, piece broken, segment; abridgment, act of abridging, imprisonment, movement, adjournment; amazement, state of being amazed, astonishment.
p. p. of Menge.
Sycosis.
Of or pertaining to the chin; genian; as, the mental nerve; the mental region.
A plate or scale covering the mentum or chin of a fish or reptile.
Of or pertaining to the mind; intellectual; as, mental faculties; mental operations, conditions, or exercise.
Quality or state of mind.
In the mind; in thought or meditation; intellectually; in idea.
A widely distributed genus of fragrant herbs, including the peppermint, spearmint, etc. The plants have small flowers, usually arranged in dense axillary clusters.
A colorless liquid hydrocarbon resembling oil of turpentine, obtained by dehydrating menthol. It has an agreeable odor and a cooling taste.
A white, crystalline, aromatic substance resembling camphor, extracted from oil of peppermint (Mentha); -- called also mint camphor or peppermint camphor.
A compound radical forming the base of menthol.
Of or pertaining to mental culture; serving to improve or strengthen the mind.
A speaking or notice of anything, -- usually in a brief or cursory manner. Used especially in the phrase to make mention of.
of Mention
of Mention
To make mention of; to speak briefly of; to name.
Fit to be mentioned.
Of or pertaining to the chin and lower jaw.
The bone or cartilage forming the anterior extremity of the lower jaw in some adult animals and the young of others.
A wise and faithful counselor or monitor.
Containing advice or admonition.
The front median plate of the labium in insects. See Labium.
The details of a banquet; a bill of fare.
See Amenuse.
See 6th and 7th Mew.
Pertaining to, or resembling, the devil Mephistopheles, "a crafty, scoffing, relentless fiend;" devilish; crafty.
Alt. of Mephitical
Tending to destroy life; poisonous; noxious; as, mephitic exhalations; mephitic regions.
Offensive to the smell; as, mephitic odors.
Noxious, pestilential, or foul exhalations from decomposing substances, filth, or other source.
A genus of mammals, including the skunks.
Same as Mephitis, 1.
Being without mixture or adulteration; hence, strong; racy.
Capable of being bought or sold.
Of or pertaining to merchants, or the business of merchants; having to do with trade, or the buying and selling of commodities; commercial.
Any one of a series of compounds of mercaptans with aldehydes.
Any one of series of compounds, hydrosulphides of alcohol radicals, in composition resembling the alcohols, but containing sulphur in place of oxygen, and hence called also the sulphur alcohols. In general, they are colorless liquids having a strong, repulsive, garlic odor. The name is specifically applied to ethyl mercaptan, C2H5SH. So called from its avidity for mercury, and other metals.
A compound of mercaptan formed by replacing its sulphur hydrogen by a metal; as, potassium mercaptide, C2H5SK.
Market; trade.
A foreign trader.
See under Chart, and see Mercator's projection, under Projection.
Commerce; traffic; trade.
To subject to fine or amercement; to mulct; to amerce.
The quahog.
A mercenary.
In a mercenary manner.
The quality or state of being mercenary; venality.
Acting for reward; serving for pay; paid; hired; hireling; venal; as, mercenary soldiers.
Hence: Moved by considerations of pay or profit; greedy of gain; sordid; selfish.
of Mercenary
One who is hired; a hireling; especially, a soldier hired into foreign service.
Originally, a dealer in any kind of goods or wares; now restricted to a dealer in textile fabrics, as silks or woolens.
The business of a mercer.
The trade of mercers; the goods in which a mercer deals.
To traffic.
Such as can be used or transferred as merchandise.
The objects of commerce; whatever is usually bought or sold in trade, or market, or by merchants; wares; goods; commodities.
The act or business of trading; trade; traffic.
of Merchandise
of Merchandise
To trade; to carry on commerce.
To make merchandise of; to buy and sell.
A trader.
Trade; commerce.
One who traffics on a large scale, especially with foreign countries; a trafficker; a trader.
A trading vessel; a merchantman.
One who keeps a store or shop for the sale of goods; a shopkeeper.
Of, pertaining to, or employed in, trade or merchandise; as, the merchant service.
To be a merchant; to trade.
Fit for market; such as is usually sold in market, or such as will bring the ordinary price; as, merchantable wheat; sometimes, a technical designation for a particular kind or class.
Merchantlike; suitable to the character or business of a merchant.
of Merchantman
A merchant.
A trading vessel; a ship employed in the transportation of goods, as, distinguished from a man-of-war.
The body of merchants taken collectively; as, the merchantry of a country.
The business of a merchant; merchandise.
Merciful.
Full of mercy; having or exercising mercy; disposed to pity and spare offenders; unwilling to punish.
Unwilling to give pain; compassionate.
To pity.
Destitute of mercy; cruel; unsparing; -- said of animate beings, and also, figuratively, of things; as, a merciless tyrant; merciless waves.
A radical regarded as derived from ammonium by the substitution of mercury for a portion of the hydrogen.
Having the qualities fabled to belong to the god Mercury; swift; active; sprightly; fickle; volatile; changeable; as, a mercurial youth; a mercurial temperament.
Having the form or image of Mercury; -- applied to ancient guideposts.
Of or pertaining to Mercury as the god of trade; hence, money-making; crafty.
Of or pertaining to, or containing, mercury; as, mercurial preparations, barometer. See Mercury, 2.
Caused by the use of mercury; as, mercurial sore mouth.
A person having mercurial qualities.
A preparation containing mercury.
One under the influence of Mercury; one resembling Mercury in character.
A physician who uses much mercury, in any of its forms, in his practice.
of Mercurialize
of Mercurialize
To affect with mercury.
To treat with mercury; to expose to the vapor of mercury.
To be sprightly, fantastic, or capricious.
In a mercurial manner.
Of, pertaining to, or derived from, mercury; containing mercury; -- said of those compounds of mercury into which this element enters in its lowest proportion.
The process or operation of obtaining the mercury, in its fluid form, from mercuric minerals.
The act or process of compounding, or the state of being compounded, with mercury.
of Mercurify
of Mercurify
To obtain mercury from, as mercuric minerals, which may be done by any application of intense heat that expels the mercury in fumes, which are afterward condensed.
To combine or mingle mercury with; to impregnate with mercury; to mercurialize.
A communication of news; an announcement.
Of, pertaining to, or derived from, mercury; containing mercury; -- said of those compounds of mercury in which it is present in its highest proportion.
A Latin god of commerce and gain; -- treated by the poets as identical with the Greek Hermes, messenger of the gods, conductor of souls to the lower world, and god of eloquence.
A metallic element mostly obtained by reduction from cinnabar, one of its ores. It is a heavy, opaque, glistening liquid (commonly called quicksilver), and is used in barometers, thermometers, ect. Specific gravity 13.6. Symbol Hg (Hydrargyrum). Atomic weight 199.8. Mercury has a molecule which consists of only one atom. It was named by the alchemists after the god Mercury, and designated by his symbol, /.
One of the planets of the solar system, being the one nearest the sun, from which its mean distance is about 36,000,000 miles. Its period is 88 days, and its diameter 3,000 miles.
A carrier of tidings; a newsboy; a messenger; hence, also, a newspaper.
Sprightly or mercurial quality; spirit; mutability; fickleness.
A plant (Mercurialis annua), of the Spurge family, the leaves of which are sometimes used for spinach, in Europe.
To wash with a preparation of mercury.
of Mercy
Forbearance to inflict harm under circumstances of provocation, when one has the power to inflict it; compassionate treatment of an offender or adversary; clemency.
Compassionate treatment of the unfortunate and helpless; sometimes, favor, beneficence.
Disposition to exercise compassion or favor; pity; compassion; willingness to spare or to help.
A blessing regarded as a manifestation of compassion or favor.
Ordure; dung.
A combining form meaning part, portion; as, blastomere, epimere.
A pool or lake.
A boundary.
To divide, limit, or bound.
A mare.
Unmixed; pure; entire; absolute; unqualified.
Only this, and nothing else; such, and no more; simple; bare; as, a mere boy; a mere form.
Purely; unmixedly; absolutely.
Not otherwise than; simply; barely; only.
Tissue composed of spheroidal cells.
An officer who ascertains meres or boundaries.
The land within the boundaries of a farm; a farmstead or farm.
A stone designating a limit or boundary; a landmark.
Of or pertaining to prostitutes; having to do with harlots; lustful; as, meretricious traffic.
Resembling the arts of a harlot; alluring by false show; gaudily and deceitfully ornamental; tawdry; as, meretricious dress or ornaments.
Any bird of the genus Merganser, and allied genera. They are allied to the ducks, but have a sharply serrated bill.
of Merge
of Merge
To cause to be swallowed up; to immerse; to sink; to absorb.
To be sunk, swallowed up, or lost.
One who, or that which, merges.
An absorption of one estate, or one contract, in another, or of a minor offense in a greater.
One carpel of an umbelliferous fruit. See Cremocarp.
A permanent colony of cells or plastids which may remain isolated, like Rotifer, or may multiply by gemmation to form higher aggregates, termed zoides.
Being at, or pertaining to, midday; belonging to, or passing through, the highest point attained by the sun in his diurnal course.
Pertaining to the highest point or culmination; as, meridian splendor.
Midday; noon.
Hence: The highest point, as of success, prosperity, or the like; culmination.
A great circle of the sphere passing through the poles of the heavens and the zenith of a given place. It is crossed by the sun at midday.
A great circle on the surface of the earth, passing through the poles and any given place; also, the half of such a circle included between the poles.
Of or pertaining to the meridian.
Having a southern aspect; southern; southerly.
The state of being in the meridian.
Position in the south; aspect toward the south.
In the direction of the meridian.
A boy's play, called also fivepenny morris. See Morris.
A delicate pastry made of powdered sugar and the whites of eggs whipped up, -- with jam or cream added.
Of or pertaining to a variety of sheep with very fine wool, originally bred in Spain.
Made of the wool of the merino sheep.
of Merino
A breed of sheep originally from Spain, noted for the fineness of its wool.
A fine fabric of merino wool.
Dividing into cells or segments; characterized by separation into two or more parts or sections by the formation of internal partitions; as, merismatic growth, where one cell divides into many.
A tissue of growing cells, or cells capable of further division.
The quality or state of deserving well or ill; desert.
Esp. in a good sense: The quality or state of deserving well; worth; excellence.
Reward deserved; any mark or token of excellence or approbation; as, his teacher gave him ten merits.
of Merit
of Merit
To earn by service or performance; to have a right to claim as reward; to deserve; sometimes, to deserve in a bad sense; as, to merit punishment.
To reward.
To acquire desert; to gain value; to receive benefit; to profit.
Deserving of reward.
By merit; deservedly.
Alt. of Merithallus
Same as Internode.
One who depends on merit for salvation.
Possessing merit; deserving of reward or honor; worthy of recompense; valuable.
Meritorious.
A play of children, in swinging on ropes, or the like, till they are dizzy.
An old Scotch silver coin; a mark or marc.
A mark; a sign.
Murky.
Originally, a wig; afterwards, a mop for cleaning cannon.
Alt. of Merle
The European blackbird. See Blackbird.
A small European falcon (Falco lithofalco, or F. aesalon).
The European whiting.
One of the solid parts of a battlemented parapet; a battlement. See Illust. of Battlement.
The European hake; -- called also herring hake and sea pike.
A fabled marine creature, typically represented as having the upper part like that of a woman, and the lower like a fish; a sea nymph, sea woman, or woman fish.
of Merman
The male corresponding to mermaid; a sea man, or man fish.
An ovum, as that of a mammal, only partially composed of germinal matter, that is, consisting of both a germinal portion and an albuminous or nutritive one; -- opposed to holoblast.
Consisting only in part of germinal matter; characterized by partial segmentation only; as, meroblastic ova, in which a portion of the yolk only undergoes fission; meroblastic segmentation; -- opposed to holoblastic.
Hernia in the thigh; femoral hernia .
Applied to the ovaries of insects when they secrete vitelligenous cells, as well as ova.
One of a family of birds (Meropidae), including the bee-eaters.
The fourth joint of a typical appendage of Crustacea.
Organization in part.
The plain surface between the channels of a triglyph.
The proximal segment of the hind limb; the thigh.
One of the serial segments, or metameres, of which the bodies of vertebrate and articulate animals are composed.
A class of Arthropoda, allied to the Crustacea. It includes the trilobites, Eurypteroidea, and Limuloidea. All are extinct except the horseshoe crabs of the last group. See Limulus.
See Jack, 8 (c).
Of or pertaining to the first Frankish dynasty in Gaul or France.
One of the kings of this dynasty.
In a merry manner; with mirth; with gayety and laughter; jovially. See Mirth, and Merry.
See Merrymake, n.
See Merrymake, v.
Gayety, with laughter; mirth; frolic.
The quality or state of being merry; merriment; mirth; gayety, with laughter.
Laughingly gay; overflowing with good humor and good spirits; jovial; inclined to laughter or play ; sportive.
Cheerful; joyous; not sad; happy.
Causing laughter, mirth, gladness, or delight; as, / merry jest.
A kind of wild red cherry.
One whose business is to make sport for others; a buffoon; a zany; especially, one who attends a mountebank or quack doctor.
Any revolving contrivance for affording amusement; esp., a ring of flying hobbyhorses.
Mirth; frolic; a meeting for mirth; a festival.
To make merry; to be jolly; to feast.
One who makes merriment or indulges in conviviality; a jovial comrade.
Making or producing mirth; convivial; jolly.
The act of making merry; conviviality; merriment; jollity.
A meeting for mirth.
The forked bone of a fowl's breast; -- called also wishbone. See Furculum.
Immersion.
A bird of the Thrush family.
See Meros.
Marvel.
See Meso-.
A high tableland; a plateau on a hill.
A salt of mesaconic acid.
Pertaining to, or designating, one of several isomeric acids obtained from citric acid.
Same as Mesiad.
Same as Mesial.
A marriage with a person of inferior social position; a misalliance.
Same as Mesially.
One of a class of independent, isolated cells found in the mesoderm, while the germ layers are undergoing differentiation.
Mesenteric.
Having the ratio of the length to the breadth of the cranium a medium one; neither brachycephalic nor dolichocephalic.
Mesaticephalic.
A distilled liquor prepared in Mexico from a species of agave. See Agave.
pl. of Madame and Madam.
of Meseems
It seems to me.
A leper.
Leprosy.
A genus of herbaceous or suffruticose plants, chiefly natives of South Africa. The leaves are opposite, thick, and f/eshy. The flowers usually open about midday, whence the name.
Of or pertaining to the mesencephalon or midbrain.
The middle segment of the brain; the midbrain. Sometimes abbreviated to mesen. See Brain.
The part of the mesoblast which gives rise to the connective tissues and blood.
Pertaining to a mesentery; mesaraic.
All that part of the alimentary canal which is developed from the primitive enteron and is lined with hypoblast. It is distinguished from the stomod/um, a part at the anterior end of the canal, including the cavity of the mouth, and the proctod/um, a part at the posterior end, which are formed by invagination and are lined with epiblast.
The membranes, or one of the membranes (consisting of a fold of the peritoneum and inclosed tissues), which connect the intestines and their appendages with the dorsal wall of the abdominal cavity. The mesentery proper is connected with the jejunum and ilium, the other mesenteries being called mesocaecum, mesocolon, mesorectum, etc.
One of the vertical muscular radiating partitions which divide the body cavity of Anthozoa into chambers.
Mesaraic.
Of or pertaining to the middle of the ethmoid region or ethmoid bone.
The median vertical plate, or median element, of the ethmoid bone.
The opening or space inclosed by the threads of a net between knot and knot, or the threads inclosing such a space; network; a net.
The engagement of the teeth of wheels, or of a wheel and rack.
of Mesh
of Mesh
To catch in a mesh.
To engage with each other, as the teeth of wheels.
Mashed; brewed.
Formed with meshes; netted.
Toward, or on the side toward, the mesial plane; mesially; -- opposed to laterad.
Middle; median; in, or in the region of, the mesial plane; internal; -- opposed to lateral.
In, near, or toward, the mesial plane; mesiad.
A hypothetical radical formerly supposed to exist in mesityl oxide.
A salt of mesitylenic acid.
A colorless, fragrant liquid, C6H3(CH3)3, of the benzene series of hydrocarbons, obtained by distilling acetone with sulphuric acid.
A crystalline substance obtained from mesitylene.
See Maslin.
A person subjected to mesmeric influence; one who is mesmerized.
Alt. of Mesmerical
Of, pertaining to, or induced by, mesmerism; as, mesmeric sleep.
The art of inducing an extraordinary or abnormal state of the nervous system, in which the actor claims to control the actions, and communicate directly with the mind, of the recipient. See Animal magnetism, under Magnetism.
One who practices, or believes in, mesmerism.
The act of mesmerizing; the state of being mesmerized.
of Mesmerize
of Mesmerize
To bring into a state of mesmeric sleep.
One who mesmerizes.
Middle; intervening; as, a mesne lord, that is, a lord who holds land of a superior, but grants a part of it to another person, in which case he is a tenant to the superior, but lord or superior to the second grantee, and hence is called the mesne lord.
Alt. of Mes-
A combining form denoting in the middle, intermediate;
denoting a type of hydrocarbons which are regarded as methenyl derivatives. Also used adjectively.
The fold of peritoneum which suspends the ovary from the dorsal wall of the body cavity.
The mesoderm.
The cell nucleus; mesoplast.
Relating to the mesoblast; as, the mesoblastic layer.
Of or pertaining to a region of the carapace of a crab covering the middle branchial region.
of Mesobronchium
The main bronchus of each lung.
The fold of peritoneum attached to the caecum.
The middle layer of a pericarp which consists of three distinct or dissimilar layers.
Of or pertaining to, or in the region of, the middle of the head; as, the mesocephalic flexure.
Having the cranial cavity of medium capacity; neither megacephalic nor microcephalic.
Having the ratio of the length to the breadth of the cranium a medium one; mesaticephalic.
The pons Varolii.
Mesocephalic.
Alt. of Mesocoelia
The cavity of the mesencephalon; the iter.
The fold of peritoneum, or mesentery, attached to the colon.
A process from the middle of the coracoid in some animals.
Alt. of Mesocuniform
One of the bones of the tarsus. See 2d Cuneiform.
The layer of the blastoderm, between the ectoderm and endoderm; mesoblast. See Illust. of Blastoderm and Ectoderm.
The middle body layer in some invertebrates.
The middle layer of tissue in some vegetable structures.
Pertaining to, or derived from, the mesoderm; as, mesodermal tissues.
Same as Mesodermal.
Having teeth of moderate size.
The fold of peritoneum connecting the stomach with the dorsal wall of the abdominal cavity; the mesogastrium.
Of or pertaining to the middle region of the abdomen, or of the stomach.
Of or pertaining to the mesogaster.
Of or pertaining to the middle gastric lobe of the carapace of a crab.
The umbilical region.
The mesogaster.
A thin gelatinous tissue separating the ectoderm and endoderm in certain coelenterates.
Having the jaws slightly projecting; between prognathous and orthognathous. See Gnathic index, under Gnathic.
A fold of the peritoneum connecting the liver with the dorsal wall of the abdominal cavity.
An extinct mammal of the Horse family, but not larger than a sheep, and having three toes on each foot.
An instrument of the ancients for finding two mean proportionals between two given lines, required in solving the problem of the duplication of the cube.
Same as Thomsonite.
A zeolitic mineral, grayish white or yellowish, occuring in delicate groups of crystals, also fibrous massive. It is a hydrous silicate of alumina, lime, and soda.
A logarithm of the cosine or cotangent.
The fold of the peritoneum supporting the oviduct.
A bird having a mesomyodous larynx.
Having the intrinsic muscles of the larynx attached to the middle of the semirings.
The mesial plane dividing the body of an animal into similar right and left halves. The line in which it meets the dorsal surface has been called the dorsimeson, and the corresponding ventral edge the ventrimeson.
Of or pertaining to the middle portion of the nasal region.
Of or pertaining to the mesonephros; as, the mesonephric, or Wolffian, duct.
The middle one of the three pairs of embryonic renal organs developed in most vertebrates; the Wolffian body.
The dorsal portion of the mesothorax of insects.
The middle bark of a tree; the green layer of bark, usually soon covered by the outer or corky layer, and obliterated.
See Glabella.
The parenchyma of a leaf between the skin of the two surfaces.
The nucleus of a cell; mesoblast.
Of or pertaining to the mesopodialia or to the parts of the limbs to which they belong.
of Mesopodiale
One of the bones of either the carpus or tarsus.
The middle portion of the foot in the Gastropoda and Pteropoda.
The middle one of the three principal basal cartilages in the fins of fishes.
The fold of peritoneum which attaches the testis to the dorsal wall of the body cavity or scrotal sac.
The fold of peritoneum, or mesentery, attached to the rectum.
Having the nose of medium width; between leptorhine and platyrhine.
Same as Mosasauria.
A process from the middle of the scapula in some animals; the spine of the scapula.
Of or pertaining to the mesoscapula.
The scutum or dorsal plate of the middle thoracic segment of an insect. See Illust. of Butterfly.
Having a medium orbital index; having orbits neither broad nor narrow; between megaseme and microseme.
See the Note under Meteorite.
A membrane of a seed. See Secundine.
A product of metabolic action.
Of or pertaining to the mesosternum.
The middle portion, or body, of the sternum.
The ventral piece of the middle segment of the thorax in insects.
Pertaining to, or designating, an acid called also inactive tartaric acid.
The middle layer of the gonophore in the Hydrozoa.
Epithelial mesoderm; a layer of cuboidal epithelium cells, formed from a portion of the mesoderm during the differetiation of the germ layers. It constitutes the boundary of the c/lum.
Of or pertaining to the mesothorax.
The middle segment of the thorax in insects. See Illust. of Coleoptera.
Having the middle of the body surrounded by bands of cilia; -- said of the larvae of certain marine annelids.
An old term covering natrolite or soda mesolite, scolecite or lime mesotype, and mesolite or lime-soda mesotype.
The fold of peritoneum connecting the ovary with the wall of the abdominal cavity.
A salt of mesoxalic acid.
Pertaining to, or designating, an acid, CH2O2(CO2H)2, obtained from amido malonic acid.
A group of very lowly organized, wormlike parasites, including the Dicyemata. They are found in cephalopods. See Dicyemata.
Belonging, or relating, to the secondary or reptilian age, or the era between the Paleozoic and Cenozoic. See Chart of Geology.
The Mesozoic age or formation.
Contempt; scorn.
Misadventure; ill-success.
Alt. of Mesquit
A name for two trees of the southwestern part of North America, the honey mesquite, and screw-pod mesquite.
Mass; church service.
A quantity of food set on a table at one time; provision of food for a person or party for one meal; as, a mess of pottage; also, the food given to a beast at one time.
A number of persons who eat together, and for whom food is prepared in common; especially, persons in the military or naval service who eat at the same table; as, the wardroom mess.
A set of four; -- from the old practice of dividing companies into sets of four at dinner.
The milk given by a cow at one milking.
A disagreeable mixture or confusion of things; hence, a situation resulting from blundering or from misunderstanding; as, he made a mess of it.
of Mess
of Mess
To take meals with a mess; to belong to a mess; to eat (with others); as, I mess with the wardroom officers.
To supply with a mess.
Any notice, word, or communication, written or verbal, sent from one person to another.
Hence, specifically, an official communication, not made in person, but delivered by a messenger; as, the President's message.
To bear as a message.
A messenger.
A messenger.
One who bears a message; the bearer of a verbal or written communication, notice, or invitation, from one person to another, or to a public body; specifically, an office servant who bears messages.
One who, or that which, foreshows, or foretells.
A hawser passed round the capstan, and having its two ends lashed together to form an endless rope or chain; -- formerly used for heaving in the cable.
A person appointed to perform certain ministerial duties under bankrupt and insolvent laws, such as to take charge og the estate of the bankrupt or insolvent.
A dog.
A German epic poem on the Messiah, by Klopstock.
The expected king and deliverer of the Hebrews; the Savior; Christ.
The state or office of the Messiah.
Of or relating to the Messiah; as, the Messianic office or character.
The Messiah.
The tenth month of the French republican calendar dating from September 22, 1792. It began June 19, and ended July 18. See VendEmiaire.
Sirs; gentlemen; -- abbreviated to Messrs., which is used as the plural of Mr.
Of or pertaining to Messina, or its inhabitans.
An associate in a mess.
A dwelling house, with the adjacent buildings and curtilage, and the adjoining lands appropriated to the use of the household.
Most.
The offspring of a white person and a quadroon; -- so called in the West Indies.
See Mister, a trade.
of Mestino
See Mestizo.
of Mestizo
The offspring of an Indian or a negro and a European or person of European stock.
A kind of brass. See Maslin.
A repetition at the end of a stanza.
imp. & p. p. of Meet.
imp. & p. p. of Mete, to measure.
p. p. of Mete, to dream.
Alt. of Met-
A prefix meaning between, with, after, behind, over, about, reversely; as, metachronism, the error of placing after the correct time; metaphor, lit., a carrying over; metathesis, a placing reversely.
Other; duplicate, corresponding to; resembling; hence, metameric; as, meta-arabinic, metaldehyde.
That two replacing radicals, in the benzene nucleus, occupy the relative positions of 1 and 3, 2 and 4, 3 and 5, 4 and 6, 5 and 1, or 6 and 2; as, metacresol, etc.  See Ortho-, and Para-.
Having less than the highest number of hydroxyl groups; -- said of acids; as, metaphosphoric acid. Also used adjectively.
of Metabasis
A transition from one subject to another.
Same as Metabola.
Alt. of Metabole
A change or mutation; a change of disease, symptoms, or treatment.
Alt. of Metabolia
A comprehensive group of insects, including those that undegro a metamorphosis.
An insect which undergoes a metamorphosis.
Of or pertaining to metamorphosis; pertaining to, or involving, change.
Of or pertaining to metabolism; as, metabolic activity; metabolic force.
Metabolism.
The act or process, by which living tissues or cells take up and convert into their own proper substance the nutritive material brought to them by the blood, or by which they transform their cell protoplasm into simpler substances, which are fitted either for excretion or for some special purpose, as in the manufacture of the digestive ferments. Hence, metabolism may be either constructive (anabolism), or destructive (katabolism).
A product of metabolism; a substance produced by metabolic action, as urea.
To change by a metabolic process. See Metabolism.
Of or pertaining to the lobe of the carapace of crabs covering the posterior branchiae.
Of or pertaining to the metacarpus.
A metacarpal bone.
That part of the skeleton of the hand or forefoot between the carpus and phalanges. In man it consists of five bones. See Illust. of Artiodactyla.
Alt. of -tre
The point of intersection of a vertical line through the center of gravity of the fluid displaced by a floating body which is tipped through a small angle from its position of equilibrium, and the inclined line which was vertical through the center of gravity of the body when in equilibrium.
A colorless liquid of an agreeable odor, C6H10O, obtained by distilling a mixture of sugar and lime; -- so called because formerly regarded as a polymeric modification of acetone.
A white, amorphous, insoluble substance regarded as a polymeric variety of chloral.
An error committed in chronology by placing an event after its real time.
The power og changing color at will by the expansion of special pigment cells, under nerve influence, as seen in many reptiles, fishes, etc.
Sulphide of mercury in isometric form and black in color.
A defect in pronouncing the letter m, or a too frequent use of it.
A polymeric modification of acrolein obtained by heating it with caustic potash. It is a crystalline substance having an aromatic odor.
A process projecting backward and downward from the acromion of the scapula of some mammals.
Discoidal by derivation; -- applied especially to the placenta of man and apes, because it is supposed to have been derived from a diffused placenta.
Of or pertaining to the two posterior gastric lobes of the carapace of crabs.
Measurement, especially of coal.
Charge for, or price of, measuring.
The change of form which one animal species undergoes in a series of successively produced individuals, extending from the one developed from the ovum to the final perfected individual. Hence, metagenesis involves the production of sexual individuals by nonsexual means, either directly or through intervening sexless generations. Opposed to monogenesis. See Alternate generation, under Generation.
Alternation of sexual and asexual or gemmiparous generations; -- in distinction from heterogamy.
Of or pertaining to metagenesis.
Metagenetic.
Cross-billed; -- said of certain birds, as the crossbill.
Anagrammatism.
By or pertaining to metagraphy.
The art or act of rendering the letters of the alphabet of one language into the possible equivalents of another; transliteration.
An elementary substance, as sodium, calcium, or copper, whose oxide or hydroxide has basic rather than acid properties, as contrasted with the nonmetals, or metalloids. No sharp line can be drawn between the metals and nonmetals, and certain elements partake of both acid and basic qualities, as chromium, manganese, bismuth, etc.
Ore from which a metal is derived; -- so called by miners.
A mine from which ores are taken.
The substance of which anything is made; material; hence, constitutional disposition; character; temper.
Courage; spirit; mettle. See Mettle.
The broken stone used in macadamizing roads and ballasting railroads.
The effective power or caliber of guns carried by a vessel of war.
Glass in a state of fusion.
The rails of a railroad.
of Metal
of Metal
of Metal
of Metal
To cover with metal; as, to metal a ship's bottom; to metal a road.
A hypothetical radical derived from ammonium by the substitution of metallic atoms in place of hydrogen.
A form of albumin found in ascitic and certain serous fluids. It is sometimes regarded as a mixture of albumin and mucin.
A white crystalline substance isomeric with, and obtained from, acetic aldehyde by polymerization, and reconvertible into the same.
of Metalepsis
The continuation of a trope in one word through a succession of significations, or the union of two or more tropes of a different kind in one word.
Exchange; replacement; substitution; metathesis.
Of or pertaining to a metalepsis.
Transverse; as, the metaleptic motion of a muscle.
Of, pertaining to, concerned in, or occurring by, metalepsy.
Metaleptic.
Of or pertaining to a metal; of the nature of metal; resembling metal; as, a metallic appearance; a metallic alloy.
Of, pertaining to, or characterized by, the essential and implied properties of a metal, as contrasted with a nonmetal or metalloid; basic; antacid; positive.
See Metallic.
In a metallic manner; by metallic means.
The production and working or manufacture of metals.
Producing metals; yielding metals.
Having the form or structure of a metal.
Pertaining to, or resembling, a metal; metallic; as, metalline properties.
Impregnated with metallic salts; chalybeate; as, metalline water.
A substance of variable composition, but resembling a soft, dark-colored metal, used in the bearings of machines for obviating friction, and as a substitute for lubricants.
A worker in metals, or one skilled in metals.
The act or process of metallizing.
of Metallize
of Metallize
To impart metallic properties to; to impregnate with a metal.
A coloring produced by the deposition of some metallic compound; specifically, the prismatic tints produced by depositing a film of peroxide of lead on polished steel by electricity.
The art or process of coloring metals.
A print made by metallography.
Pertaining to, or by means of, metallography.
One who writes on the subject of metals.
The science or art of metals and metal working; also, a treatise on metals.
A method of transferring impressions of the grain of wood to metallic surfaces by chemical action.
A substitute for lithography, in which metallic plates are used instead of stone.
Formerly, the metallic base of a fixed alkali, or alkaline earth; -- applied by Sir H. Davy to sodium, potassium, and some other metallic substances whose metallic character was supposed to be not well defined.
Now, one of several elementary substances which in the free state are unlike metals, and whose compounds possess or produce acid, rather than basic, properties; a nonmetal; as, boron, carbon, phosphorus, nitrogen, oxygen, sulphur, chlorine, bromine, etc., are metalloids.
Having the appearance of a metal.
Having the properties of a nonmetal; nonmetallic; acid; negative.
Metalloid.
Metalorganic.
Treatment of disease by applying metallic plates to the surface of the body.
Alt. of Metallurgical
Of or pertaining to metallurgy.
One who works in metals, or prepares them for use; one who is skilled in metallurgy.
The art of working metals, comprehending the whole process of separating them from other matters in the ore, smelting, refining, and parting them; sometimes, in a narrower sense, only the process of extracting metals from their ores.
of Metalman
A worker in metals.
Beyond the scope or province of logic.
Pertaining to, or denoting, any one of a series of compounds of certain metallic elements with organic radicals; as, zinc methyl, sodium ethyl, etc.
Any one of several metameric forms of the same substance, or of different substances having the same composition; as, xylene has three metamers, viz., orthoxylene, metaxylene, and paraxylene.
One of successive or homodynamous parts in animals and plants; one of a series of similar parts that follow one another in a vertebrate or articulate animal, as in an earthworm; a segment; a somite. See Illust. of Loeven's larva.
Having the same elements united in the same proportion by weight, and with the same molecular weight, but possessing a different structure and different properties; as, methyl ether and ethyl alcohol are metameric compounds. See Isomeric.
Of or pertaining to a metamere or its formation; as, metameric segmentation.
In a metameric manner.
The symmetry of a metameric structure; serial symmetry; the state of being made up of metameres.
The state or quality of being metameric; also, the relation or condition of metameric compounds.
Subject to change; changeable; variable.
Causing a change of structure.
Pertaining to, produced by, or exhibiting, certain changes which minerals or rocks may have undergone since their original deposition; -- especially applied to the recrystallization which sedimentary rocks have undergone through the influence of heat and pressure, after which they are called metamorphic rocks.
The state or quality of being metamorphic; the process by which the material of rock masses has been more or less recrystallized by heat, pressure, etc., as in the change of sedimentary limestone to marble.
One who believes that the body of Christ was merged into the Deity when he ascended.
To metamorphose.
of Metamorphose
of Metamorphose
To change into a different form; to transform; to transmute.
Same as Metamorphosis.
One who metamorphoses.
Changing the form; transforming.
of Metamorphosis
Change of form, or structure; transformation.
A change in the form or function of a living organism, by a natural process of growth or development; as, the metamorphosis of the yolk into the embryo, of a tadpole into a frog, or of a bud into a blossom. Especially, that form of sexual reproduction in which an embryo undergoes a series of marked changes of external form, as the chrysalis stage, pupa stage, etc., in insects. In these intermediate stages sexual reproduction is usually impossible, but they ultimately pass into final and sexually developed forms, from the union of which organisms are produced which pass through the same cycle of changes. See Transformation.
The change of material of one kind into another through the agency of the living organism; metabolism.
A larval crustacean in a stage following the nauplius, and having about seven pairs of appendages.
Of or pertaining to the metanephros.
The most posterior of the three pairs of embryonic renal organs developed in many vertebrates.
The dorsal portion of the metaphorax of insects.
A salt of metantimonic acid.
Pertaining to, or designating, an acid (formerly called antimonic acid) analogous to metaphosphoric acid, and obtained as a white amorphous insoluble substance, (HSbO3).
Formerly, designating an acid, which is now properly called pyroantimonic acid, and analogous to pyrophosphoric acid.
Pertaining to, or designating, a supposed acid obtained from pectin.
A substance obtained from, and resembling, pectin, and occurring in overripe fruits.
An intermediate product formed in the gastric digestion of albuminous matter.
The transference of the relation between one set of objects to another set for the purpose of brief explanation; a compressed simile; e. g., the ship plows the sea.
Alt. of Metaphorical
Of or pertaining to metaphor; comprising a metaphor; not literal; figurative; tropical; as, a metaphorical expression; a metaphorical sense.
One who makes metaphors.
A salt of metaphosphoric acid.
Pertaining to, or designating, a monobasic acid, HPO3, analogous to nitric acid, and, by heating phosphoric acid, obtained as a crystalline substance, commonly called glacial phosphoric acid.
A verbal translation; a version or translation from one language into another, word for word; -- opposed to paraphrase.
An answering phrase; repartee.
Translated literally.
Metaphrase.
A literal translator.
Alt. of Metaphrastical
Close, or literal.
See Metaphysics.
Metaphysical.
Of or pertaining to metaphysics.
According to rules or principles of metaphysics; as, metaphysical reasoning.
Preternatural or supernatural.
In the manner of metaphysical science, or of a metaphysician.
One who is versed in metaphysics.
The science of real as distinguished from phenomenal being; ontology; also, the science of being, with reference to its abstract and universal conditions, as distinguished from the science of determined or concrete being; the science of the conceptions and relations which are necessarily implied as true of every kind of being; phylosophy in general; first principles, or the science of first principles.
Hence: The scientific knowledge of mental phenomena; mental philosophy; psychology.
Change of form; transformation.
A change in the letters or syllables of a word.
A word having more than one form of the root.
The posterior division of the foot in the Gastropoda and Pteropoda.
Of or pertaining to the metapodialia, or to the parts of the limbs to which they belong.
of Metapodiale
One of the bones of either the metacarpus or metatarsus.
of Metapodium
Same as Metapode.
of Metapophysis
A tubercle projecting from the anterior articular processes of some vertebr/; a mammillary process.
The posterior of the three principal basal cartilages in the fins of fishes.
A salt of metasilicic acid.
Designating an acid derived from silicic acid by the removal of water; of or pertaining to such an acid.
An alteration in a mineral or rock mass when involving a chemical change of the substance, as of chrysolite to serpentine; -- opposed to ordinary metamorphism, as implying simply a recrystallization.
One of the component segments of the body of an animal.
A salt of metastannic acid.
Pertaining to, or designating, a compound of tin (metastannic acid), obtained, as an isomeric modification of stannic acid, in the form of a white amorphous substance.
of Metastasis
A spiritual change, as during baptism.
A change in the location of a disease, as from one part to another.
The act or process by which matter is taken up by cells or tissues and is transformed into other matter; in plants, the act or process by which are produced all of those chemical changes in the constituents of the plant which are not accompanied by a production of organic matter; metabolism.
Of, pertaining to, or caused by, metastasis; as, a metastatic abscess; the metastatic processes of growth.
Of or pertaining to the metasternum.
The most posterior element of the sternum; the ensiform process; xiphisternum.
The ventral plate of the third or last segment of the thorax of insects.
Alt. of Metastome
A median elevation behind the mouth in the arthropods.
Of or pertaining to the metatarsus.
A metatarsal bone.
Metatarsus.
of Metatarsus
That part of the skeleton of the hind or lower limb between the tarsus and phalanges; metatarse. It consists, in the human foot, of five bones. See Illustration in Appendix.
of Metathesis
Transposition, as of the letters or syllables of a word; as, pistris for pristis; meagre for meager.
A mere change in place of a morbid substance, without removal from the body.
The act, process, or result of exchange, substitution, or replacement of atoms and radicals; thus, by metathesis an acid gives up all or part of its hydrogen, takes on an equivalent amount of a metal or base, and forms a salt.
Alt. of Metathetical
Of or pertaining to metathesis.
Of or pertaining to the metathorax.
The last or posterior segment of the thorax in insects. See Illust. of Coleoptera.
Of, pertaining to, or designating, an acid of titanium analogous to metasilicic acid.
A salt of metatungstic acid.
Of, pertaining to, or designating, an acid known only in its salts (the metatungstates) and properly called polytungstic, or pyrotungstic, acid.
A salt of metavanadic acid.
Of, pertaining to, or designating, a vanadic acid analogous to metaphosphoric acid.
That variety of xylene, or dimethyl benzene, in which the two methyl groups occupy the meta position with reference to each other. It is a colorless inf/ammable liquid.
A system of farming on halves.
One who cultivates land for a share (usually one half) of its yield, receiving stock, tools, and seed from the landlord.
Those animals in which the protoplasmic mass, constituting the egg, is converted into a multitude of cells, which are metamorphosed into the tissues of the body. A central cavity is commonly developed, and the cells around it are at first arranged in two layers, -- the ectoderm and endoderm. The group comprises nearly all animals except the Protozoa.
of Metazoan
One of the Metazoa.
Of or pertaining to the Metazoa.
One of the Metazoa.
Meat.
To meet.
of Mete
of Mete
To dream; also impersonally; as, me mette, I dreamed.
of Mete
of Mete
To find the quantity, dimensions, or capacity of, by any rule or standard; to measure.
To measure.
Measure; limit; boundary; -- used chiefly in the plural, and in the phrase metes and bounds.
A quantity of corn formerly given by the lord to his customary tenants, as an encouragement to, or reward for, labor and faithful service.
According to measure or proportion; proportionable; proportionate.
Alt. of Metempirical
Related, or belonging, to the objects of knowledge within the province of metempirics.
The science that is concerned with metempirics.
The concepts and relations which are conceived as beyond, and yet as related to, the knowledge gained by experience.
of Metempsychose
of Metempsychose
To translate or transfer, as the soul, from one body to another.
The passage of the soul, as an immortal essence, at the death of the animal body it had inhabited, into another living body, whether of a brute or a human being; transmigration of souls.
The suppression of a day in the calendar to prevent the date of the new moon being set a day too late, or the suppression of the bissextile day once in 134 years. The opposite to this is the proemptosis, or the addition of a day every 330 years, and another every 2,400 years.
The posterior part of the brain, including the medulla; the afterbrain. Sometimes abbreviated to meten.
The assimilation by one body or organism of the elements of another.
Any phenomenon or appearance in the atmosphere, as clouds, rain, hail, snow, etc.
Specif.: A transient luminous body or appearance seen in the atmosphere, or in a more elevated region.
Of or pertaining to a meteor, or to meteors; atmospheric, as, meteoric phenomena; meteoric stones.
Influenced by the weather; as, meteoric conditions.
Flashing; brilliant; transient; like a meteor; as, meteoric fame.
Meteoric.
Flatulent distention of the abdomen; tympanites.
A mass of stone or iron which has fallen to the earth from space; an aerolite.
To ascend in vapors; to take the form of a meteor.
An instrument which registers meteorologic phases or conditions.
Of or pertaining to meteorography.
The registration of meteorological phenomena.
A small body moving through space, or revolving about the sun, which on entering the earth's atmosphere would be deflagrated and appear as a meteor.
Of or pertaining to a meteoroid or to meteoroids.
A meteoric stone; an aerolite; a meteorite.
Alt. of Meteorological
Of or pertaining to the atmosphere and its phenomena, or to meteorology.
A person skilled in meteorology.
The science which treats of the atmosphere and its phenomena, particularly of its variations of heat and moisture, of its winds, storms, etc.
A species of divination by meteors, chiefly by thunder and lightning, which was held in high estimation by the Romans.
An apparatus which transmits automatically to a central station atmospheric changes as marked by the anemometer, barometer, thermometer, etc.
An astrolabe; a planisphere.
An instrument for measuring the position, length, and direction, of the apparent path of a shooting star.
Of the nature or appearance of a meteor.
A suffix denoting that by which anything is measured; as, barometer, chronometer, dynamometer.
One who, or that which, metes or measures. See Coal-meter.
An instrument for measuring, and usually for recording automatically, the quantity measured.
A line above or below a hanging net, to which the net is attached in order to strengthen it.
Alt. of Metre
Rhythmical arrangement of syllables or words into verses, stanzas, strophes, etc.; poetical measure, depending on number, quantity, and accent of syllables; rhythm; measure; verse; also, any specific rhythmical arrangements; as, the Horatian meters; a dactylic meter.
A poem.
A measure of length, equal to 39.37 English inches, the standard of linear measure in the metric system of weights and measures. It was intended to be, and is very nearly, the ten millionth part of the distance from the equator to the north pole, as ascertained by actual measurement of an arc of a meridian. See Metric system, under Metric.
The act of measuring, or the cost of measuring.
A measure of energy or work done; the power exerted in raising one gram through the distance of one meter against gravitation.
A measuring rod.
A yard, staff, or rod, used as a measure.
See Meathe.
A stable crystalline compound obtained by the decomposition of hemoglobin. It is found in old blood stains.
A white waxy substance, found in small quantities in spermaceti as an ethereal salt of several fatty acids, and regarded as an alcohol of the methane series.
A light, colorless, gaseous, inflammable hydrocarbon, CH4; marsh gas. See Marsh gas, under Gas.
A fermented beverage made of honey and water; mead.
See Methylene.
The hypothetical hydrocarbon radical CH, regarded as an essential residue of certain organic compounds.
A binary compound of methyl with some element; as, aluminium methide, Al2(CH3)6.
of Methinks
It seems to me; I think. See Me.
A salt of methionic acid.
Of, pertaining to, or designating, a sulphonic (thionic) acid derivative of methane, obtained as a stable white crystalline substance, CH2.(SO3H)2, which forms well defined salts.
An orderly procedure or process; regular manner of doing anything; hence, manner; way; mode; as, a method of teaching languages; a method of improving the mind.
Orderly arrangement, elucidation, development, or classification; clear and lucid exhibition; systematic arrangement peculiar to an individual.
Classification; a mode or system of classifying natural objects according to certain common characteristics; as, the method of Theophrastus; the method of Ray; the Linnaean method.
Alt. of Methodical
Arranged with regard to method; disposed in a suitable manner, or in a manner to illustrate a subject, or to facilitate practical observation; as, the methodical arrangement of arguments; a methodical treatise.
Proceeding with regard to method; systematic.
Of or pertaining to the ancient school of physicians called methodists.
The art and principles of method.
The system of doctrines, polity, and worship, of the sect called Methodists.
One who observes method.
One of an ancient school of physicians who rejected observation and founded their practice on reasoning and theory.
One of a sect of Christians, the outgrowth of a small association called the "Holy Club," formed at Oxford University, A.D. 1729, of which the most conspicuous members were John Wesley and his brother Charles; -- originally so called from the methodical strictness of members of the club in all religious duties.
A person of strict piety; one who lives in the exact observance of religious duties; -- sometimes so called in contempt or ridicule.
Of or pertaining to the sect of Methodists; as, Methodist hymns; a Methodist elder.
Alt. of Methodistical
Of or pertaining to methodists, or to the Methodists.
The act or process of methodizing, or the state of being methodized.
of Methodize
of Methodize
To reduce to method; to dispose in due order; to arrange in a convenient manner; as, to methodize one's work or thoughts.
One who methodizes.
Of or pertaining to methodology.
The science of method or arrangement; a treatise on method.
The technical name of methyl alcohol or wood spirit; also, by extension, the class name of any of the series of alcohols of the methane series of which methol proper is the type. See Methyl alcohol, under Methyl.
A hypothetical radical, CH3O, analogous to hydroxyl.
A hydrocarbon radical, CH3, not existing alone but regarded as an essential residue of methane, and appearing as a component part of many derivatives; as, methyl alcohol, methyl ether, methyl amine, etc.
A light, volatile liquid, H2C(OCH3)2, regarded as a complex ether, and having a pleasant ethereal odor. It is obtained by the partial oxidation of methyl alcohol. Called also formal.
See Methyl amine, under Methyl.
An alcoholate of methyl alcohol in which the hydroxyl hydrogen is replaced by a metal, after the analogy of a hydrate; as, sodium methylate, CH3ONa.
To impregnate or mix with methyl or methyl alcohol.
Impregnated with, or containing, methyl alcohol or wood spirit; as, methylated spirits.
A hydrocarbon radical, CH2, not known in the free state, but regarded as an essential residue and component of certain derivatives of methane; as, methylene bromide, CH2Br2; -- formerly called also methene.
Pertaining to, derived from, or containing, methyl; specifically, designating methyl alcohol. See under Methyl.
A white, silky, crystalline substance extracted from the thick rootstock of a species of pepper (Piper methysticum) of the South Sea Islands; -- called also kanakin.
A sojourner; an immigrant; an alien resident in a Grecian city, but not a citizen.
Timid; fearful.
Alt. of Metive
See Metis.
Alt. of Metisse
The offspring of a white person and an American Indian.
The offspring of a white person and a quadroon; an octoroon.
The space between two dentils.
The space between two triglyphs.
Pertaining to, or discovered by, Meton, the Athenian.
Alt. of Metonymical
Used by way of metonymy.
A trope in which one word is put for another that suggests it; as, we say, a man keeps a good table instead of good provisions; we read Virgil, that is, his poems; a man has a warm heart, that is, warm affections.
The space between two triglyphs of the Doric frieze, which, among the ancients, was often adorned with carved work. See Illust. of Entablature.
The face of a crab.
Of or pertaining to the forehead or frontal bones; frontal; as, the metopic suture.
Fortune telling by physiognomy.
Alt. of Metoposcopical
Of or relating to metoposcopy.
One versed in metoposcopy.
The study of physiognomy; the art of discovering the character of persons by their features, or the lines of the face.
The postero-lateral ossification in the sternum of birds; also, the part resulting from such ossification.
See Meter.
Relating to measurement; involving, or proceeding by, measurement.
Of or pertaining to the meter as a standard of measurement; of or pertaining to the decimal system of measurement of which a meter is the unit; as, the metric system; a metric measurement.
Of or pertaining to the meter; arranged in meter; consisting of verses; as, metrical compositions.
Of or pertaining to measurement; as, the inch, foot, yard, etc., are metrical terms; esp., of or pertaining to the metric system.
In a metrical manner.
A composer of verses.
See Metric, a.
Composition in metrical form; versification.
To make verse.
A maker of verses.
Inflammation of the womb.
An instrument for measuring colors.
An instrument attached to a locomotive for recording its speed and the number and duration of its stops.
Of or pertaining to metrology.
The science of, or a system of, weights and measures; also, a treatise on the subject.
A mania for writing verses.
One who has metromania.
An instrument for measuring the size of the womb.
An instrument consisting of a short pendulum with a sliding weight. It is set in motion by clockwork, and serves to measure time in music.
Measurement of time by an instrument.
Derived from the name of one's mother, or other female ancestor; as, a metronymic name or appellation. -- A metronymic appellation.
A metropolis.
The mother city; the chief city of a kingdom, state, or country.
The seat, or see, of the metropolitan, or highest church dignitary.
Of or pertaining to the capital or principal city of a country; as, metropolitan luxury.
Of, pertaining to, or designating, a metropolitan or the presiding bishop of a country or province, his office, or his dignity; as, metropolitan authority.
The superior or presiding bishop of a country or province.
An archbishop.
A bishop whose see is civil metropolis. His rank is intermediate between that of an archbishop and a patriarch.
The see of a metropolitan bishop.
A metropolitan.
Of or pertaining to a metropolis; being a metropolis; metropolitan; as, the metropolitical chair.
Profuse bleeding from the womb, esp. such as does not occur at the menstrual period.
A modification of the stethoscope, for directly auscultating the uterus from the vagina.
A myrtaceous genus of trees or shrubs, found in Australia and the South Sea Islands, and having very hard wood. Metrosideros vera is the true ironwood.
An instrument for cutting or scarifying the uterus or the neck of the uterus.
The operation of cutting into the uterus; hysterotomy; the Caesarean section.
A suffix denoting the art, process, or science, of measuring; as, acidmetry, chlorometry, chronometry.
imp. of Mete, to dream.
Substance or quality of temperament; spirit, esp. as regards honor, courage, fortitude, ardor, etc.; disposition; -- usually in a good sense.
Having mettle; high-spirited; ardent; full of fire.
Full of spirit; possessing constitutional ardor; fiery; as, a mettlesome horse.
A cage for hawks; a mew. See 4th Mew, 1.
To move.
A gull, esp. the common British species (Larus canus); called also sea mew, maa, mar, mow, and cobb.
of Mew
of Mew
To shed or cast; to change; to molt; as, the hawk mewed his feathers.
To cast the feathers; to molt; hence, to change; to put on a new appearance.
A cage for hawks while mewing; a coop for fattening fowls; hence, any inclosure; a place of confinement or shelter; -- in the latter sense usually in the plural.
A stable or range of stables for horses; -- compound used in the plural, and so called from the royal stables in London, built on the site of the king's mews for hawks.
To shut up; to inclose; to confine, as in a cage or other inclosure.
To cry as a cat.
The common cry of a cat.
of Mewl
of Mewl
To cry, as a young child; to squall.
One that mewls.
An alley where there are stables; a narrow passage; a confined place.
Alt. of Mexical
See Mescal.
Of or pertaining to Mexico or its people.
A native or inhabitant of Mexico.
To cause to be like the Mexicans, or their country, esp. in respect of frequent revolutions of government.
To become like the Mexicans, or their country or government.
Same as Meine.
Same as Mescal.
A small European shrub (Daphne Mezereum), whose acrid bark is used in medicine.
A mosque.
A piece of parchment bearing the Decalogue and attached to the doorpost; -- in use among orthodox Hebrews.
Same as Entresol.
A partial story which is not on the same level with the story of the main part of the edifice, as of a back building, where the floors are on a level with landings of the staircase of the main house.
With a medium fullness of sound.
Mean; not extreme.
Mezzo-rilievo.
A middle degree of relief in figures, between high and low relief.
Sculpture in this kind of relief. See under Alto-rilievo.
Having a medium compass between the soprano and contralto; -- said of the voice of a female singer.
A mezzo-soprano voice.
A person having such a voice.
A manner of engraving on copper or steel by drawing upon a surface previously roughened, and then removing the roughness in places by scraping, burnishing, etc., so as to produce the requisite light and shade. Also, an engraving so produced.
To engrave in mezzotint.
One who engraves in mezzotint.
Mezzotint.
of Mezzotinto
of Mezzotinto
To engrave in mezzotint; to represent by mezzotint.
See Mohr.
A syllable applied to the third tone of the scale of C, i. e., to E, in European solmization, but to the third tone of any scale in the American system.
A tribe of Indians that formerly occupied the country between the Wabash and Maumee rivers.
A mineral of an iron-black color, and very sectile, consisting principally of sulphur, antimony, and silver.
The orang-outang.
A granitoid rock containing feldspar, biotite, elaeolite, and sodalite.
Miasma.
of Miasma
Infectious particles or germs floating in the air; air made noxious by the presence of such particles or germs; noxious effluvia; malaria.
Containing miasma; miasmatic.
Alt. of Miasmatical
Containing, or relating to, miasma; caused by miasma; as, miasmatic diseases.
One who has made a special study of miasma.
That department of medical science which treats of miasma.
of Miaul
of Miaul
To cry as a cat; to mew; to caterwaul.
The crying of a cat.
The name of a group of minerals characterized by highly perfect cleavage, so that they readily separate into very thin leaves, more or less elastic. They differ widely in composition, and vary in color from pale brown or yellow to green or black. The transparent forms are used in lanterns, the doors of stoves, etc., being popularly called isinglass. Formerly called also cat-silver, and glimmer.
Partaking of the nature of, or consisting of, mica and lime; -- applied to a mica schist containing carbonate of lime.
Pertaining to, or containing, mica; splitting into laminae or leaves like mica.
pl of Mouse.
of Micella
A theoretical aggregation of molecules constituting a structural particle of protoplasm, capable of increase or diminution without change in chemical nature.
Alt. of Miche
To lie hid; to skulk; to act, or carry one's self, sneakingly.
The feat of the archangel Michael, a church festival, celebrated on the  29th of September. Hence, colloquially, autumn.
One who skulks, or keeps out of sight; hence, a truant; an idler; a thief, etc.
Theft; cheating.
Hiding; skulking; cowardly.
Much; great.
A tribe of Indians inhabiting Nova Scotia and New Brunswick.
A small South American monkey (Mico melanurus), allied to the marmoset. The name was originally applied to an albino variety.
Same as Microustic.
A genus of sea urchins, similar to Spatangus, abounding in the chalk formation; -- from the starlike disposal of the ambulacral furrows.
Having a small brain.
Alt. of Micr-
A combining form
Small, little, trivial, slight; as, microcosm, microscope.
A millionth part of; as, microfarad, microohm, micrometer.
One of the smaller measures of electrical currents; the millionth part of one ampere.
In the classification of Cohn, one of the four tribes of Bacteria.
Alt. of Microbion
A microscopic organism; -- particularly applied to bacteria and especially to pathogenic forms; as, the microbe of fowl cholera.
Of, pertaining to, or caused by, microbes; as, the microbian theory; a microbian disease.
Of or pertaining to a microbe.
Any agent detrimental to, or destructive of, the life of microbes or bacterial organisms.
Alt. of Microcephalous
Having a small head; having the cranial cavity small; -- opposed to megacephalic.
Of or pertaining to micro-chemistry; as, a micro-chemical test.
The application of chemical tests to minute objects or portions of matter, magnified by the use of the microscopy; -- distinguished from macro-chemistry.
A chronoscope.
A mineral of the feldspar group, like orthoclase or common feldspar in composition, but triclinic in form.
Of or pertaining to micrococci; caused by micrococci.
of Micrococcus
A genus of Spherobacteria, in the form of very small globular or oval cells, forming, by transverse division, filaments, or chains of cells, or in some cases single organisms shaped like dumb-bells (Diplococcus), all without the power of motion. See Illust. of Ascoccus.
A little world; a miniature universe. Hence (so called by Paracelsus), a man, as a supposed epitome of the exterior universe or great world. Opposed to macrocosm.
Alt. of Microcosmical
Of or pertaining to the microcosm.
Description of man as a microcosm.
A measure of electrical quantity; the millionth part of one coulomb.
Pertaining, or suited, to the audition of small sounds; fitted to assist hearing.
An instrument for making faint sounds audible, as to a partially deaf person.
The weight of the half hydrogen molecule, or of the hydrogen atom, taken as the standard in comparing the atomic weights of the elements; thus, an atom of oxygen weighs sixteen microcriths. See Crith.
Crystalline on a fine, or microscopic, scale; consisting of fine crystals; as, the ground mass of certain porphyrics is microcrystalline.
One of the elementary granules found in blood. They are much smaller than an ordinary corpuscle, and are particularly noticeable in disease, as in anaemia.
Having small teeth.
The millionth part of a farad.
A microscopic form of life; an animal or vegetable organism microscopic size.
Of or pertaining to micro-geology.
The part of geology relating to structure and organisms which require to be studied with a microscope.
An instrument for executing minute writing or engraving.
Of or pertaining to micrography.
The description of microscopic objects.
The millionth part of an ohm.
A tribe of Lepidoptera, including a vast number of minute species, as the plume moth, clothes moth, etc.
An extinct genus of small Triassic mammals, the oldest yet found in European strata.
A rare mineral of resinous luster and high specific gravity. It is a tantalate of calcium, and occurs in octahedral crystals usually very minute.
A minute inclosed crystal, often observed when minerals or rocks are examined in thin sections under the microscope.
Same as Microlite, 2.
Formed of small stones.
Alt. of Micrological
Of or pertaining to micrology; very minute; as, micrologic examination.
That part of science which treats of microscopic objects, or depends on microscopic observation.
Attention to petty items or differences.
One of the smaller cells, or blastomeres, resulting from the complete segmentation of a telolecithal ovum.
An instrument, used with a telescope or microscope, for measuring minute distances, or the apparent diameters of objects which subtend minute angles. The measurement given directly is that of the image of the object formed at the focus of the object glass.
Alt. of Micrometrical
Belonging to micrometry; made by the micrometer.
The art of measuring with a micrometer.
The millionth part of a meter.
A measure of length; the thousandth part of one millimeter; the millionth part of a meter.
Of or pertaining to Micronesia, a collective designation of the islands in the western part of the Pacific Ocean, embracing the Marshall and Gilbert groups, the Ladrones, the Carolines, etc.
A dark race inhabiting the Micronesian Islands. They are supposed to be a mixed race, derived from Polynesians and Papuans.
An instrument for noting minute portions of time.
Any microscopic form of life; -- particularly applied to bacteria and similar organisms, esp. such are supposed to cause infectious diseases.
A kind of pantograph which produces copies microscopically minute.
A rock showing under the microscope the structure of a graphic granite (pegmatite).
An instrument for intensifying and making audible very feeble sounds. It produces its effects by the changes of intensity in an electric current, occasioned by the variations in the contact resistance of conducting bodies, especially of imperfect conductors, under the action of acoustic vibrations.
The science which treats of the means of increasing the intensity of low or weak sounds, or of the microphone.
Serving to augment the intensity of weak sounds; microcoustic.
A microscopically small photograph of a picture, writing, printed page, etc.
An enlarged representation of a microscopic object, produced by throwing upon a sensitive plate the magnified image of an object formed by a microscope or other suitable combination of lenses.
The art of making microphotographs.
Alt. of Microphthalmy
An unnatural smallness of the eyes, occurring as the result of disease or of imperfect development.
Small-leaved.
Pertaining to, or of the nature of, microphytes.
A very minute plant, one of certain unicellular algae, such as the germs of various infectious diseases are believed to be.
An opening in the membranes surrounding the ovum, by which nutrition is assisted and the entrance of the spermatozoa permitted.
An opening in the outer coat of a seed, through which the fecundating pollen enters the ovule.
Pertaining to microscopy, or to the use of the microscope.
An optical instrument, consisting of a lens, or combination of lenses, for making an enlarged image of an object which is too minute to be viewed by the naked eye.
Microscopic.
Alt. of Microscopical
Of or pertaining to the microscope or to microscopy; made with a microscope; as, microscopic observation.
Able to see extremely minute objects.
Very small; visible only by the aid of a microscope; as, a microscopic insect.
By the microscope; with minute inspection; in a microscopic manner.
One skilled in, or given to, microscopy.
The use of the microscope; investigation with the microscope.
Having the orbital index relatively small; having the orbits broad transversely; -- opposed to megaseme.
A spectroscope arranged for attachment to a microscope, for observation of the spectrum of light from minute portions of any substance.
A sporangium or conceptacle containing only very minute spores.  Cf. Macrosporangium.
One of the exceedingly minute spores found in certain flowerless plants, as Selaginella and Isoetes, which bear two kinds of spores, one very much smaller than the other.  Cf. Macrospore.
Of or pertaining to microspores.
One of a group of mammals having a small size as a typical characteristic. It includes the lower orders, as the Insectivora, Cheiroptera, Rodentia, and Edentata.
Having a typically small size; of or pertaining to the microsthenes.
A tasimeter, especially when arranged for measuring very small extensions. See Tasimeter.
An instrument for making very thin sections for microscopical examination.
One who is skilled in or practices microtomy.
The art of using the microtome; investigation carried on with the microtome.
A measure of electro-motive force; the millionth part of one volt.
The millionth part of one weber.
The Infusoria.
A small motile spore furnished with two vibratile cilia, found in certain green algae.
A microorganism which is supposed to act like a ferment in causing or propagating certain infectious or contagious diseases; a pathogenic bacterial organism.
The act of voiding urine; also, a morbidly frequent passing of the urine, in consequence of disease.
Denoting the middle part; as, in mid ocean.
Occupying a middle position; middle; as, the mid finger; the mid hour of night.
Made with a somewhat elevated position of some certain part of the tongue, in relation to the palate; midway between the high and the low; -- said of certain vowel sounds; as, a (ale), / (/ll), / (/ld). See Guide to Pronunciation, // 10, 11.
Middle.
See Amid.
The larva of the bean fly.
A genus of longeared South American monkeys, including numerous species of marmosets. See Marmoset.
A pulmonate mollusk (Auricula, / Ellobium, aurismidae); -- so called from resemblance to a human ear.
The middle segment of the brain; the mesencephalon. See Brain.
The middle part of the day; noon.
Of or pertaining to noon; meridional; as, the midday sun.
A dunghill.
An accumulation of refuse about a dwelling place; especially, an accumulation of shells or of cinders, bones, and other refuse on the supposed site of the dwelling places of prehistoric tribes, -- as on the shores of the Baltic Sea and in many other places. See Kitchen middens.
The common European crow.
Situated most nearly in the middle; middlemost; midmost.
Midst; middle.
Same as Midden.
Equally distant from the extreme either of a number of things or of one thing; mean; medial; as, the middle house in a row; a middle rank or station in life; flowers of middle summer; men of middle age.
Intermediate; intervening.
The point or part equally distant from the extremities or exterior limits, as of a line, a surface, or a solid; an intervening point or part in space, time, or order of series; the midst; central portion
the waist.
Of or pertaining to the Middle Ages; mediaeval.
Being about the middle of the ordinary age of man; between 30 and 50 years old.
The world, considered as lying between heaven and hell.
That part of a picture between the foreground and the background.
of Middleman
An agent between two parties; a broker; a go-between; any dealer between the producer and the consumer; in Ireland, one who takes land of the proprietors in large tracts, and then rents it out in small portions to the peasantry.
A person of intermediate rank; a commoner.
The man who occupies a central position in a file of soldiers.
Being in the middle, or nearest the middle; midmost.
One of a middle or intermediate class in some schools and seminaries.
Of middle rank, state, size, or quality; about equally distant from the extremes; medium; moderate; mediocre; ordinary.
A combination of the coarser parts of ground wheat the finest bran, separated from the fine flour and coarse bran in bolting; -- formerly regarded as valuable only for feed; but now, after separation of the bran, used for making the best quality of flour. Middlings contain a large proportion of gluten.
In the southern and western parts of the United States, the portion of the hog between the ham and the shoulder; bacon; -- called also middles.
of Middy
A colloquial abbreviation of midshipman.
A vertical water space in a fire box or combustion chamber.
A support for the center of a tunnel.
The middle space or region between heaven and hell; the abode of human beings; the earth.
Any one of many small, delicate, long-legged flies of the Chironomus, and allied genera, which do not bite. Their larvae are usually aquatic.
A very small fly, abundant in many parts of the United States and Canada, noted for the irritating quality of its bite.
A minute bloodsucking fly.
A very diminutive person.
The middle part of the alimentary canal from the stomach, or entrance of the bile duct, to, or including, the large intestine.
The midst or middle of heaven or the sky.
The meridian, or middle line of the heavens; the point of the ecliptic on the meridian.
Being in the interior country; distant from the coast or seashore; as, midland towns or inhabitants.
Surrounded by the land; mediterranean.
The interior or central region of a country; -- usually in the plural.
The middle part of the main or sea.
Middle; middlemost.
The middle of the night; twelve o'clock at night.
Being in, or characteristic of, the middle of the night; as, midnight studies; midnight gloom.
of Midrash
of Midrash
A talmudic exposition of the Hebrew law, or of some part of it.
A continuation of the petiole, extending from the base to the apex of the lamina of a leaf.
See Diaphragm, n., 2.
Alt. of Mid-sea
The middle part of the sea or ocean.
Of or pertaining to, or being in, the middle of a ship.
of Midshipman
Formerly, a kind of naval cadet, in a ship of war, whose business was to carry orders, messages, reports, etc., between the officers of the quarter-deck and those of the forecastle, and render other services as required.
In the English naval service, the second rank attained by a combatant officer after a term of service as naval cadet. Having served three and a half years in this rank, and passed an examination, he is eligible to promotion to the rank of lieutenant.
In the United States navy, the lowest grade of officers in line of promotion, being graduates of the Naval Academy awaiting promotion to the rank of ensign.
An American marine fish of the genus Porichthys, allied to the toadfish.
In the middle of a ship; -- properly amidships.
The timbers at the broadest part of the vessel.
The interior or central part or place; the middle; -- used chiefly in the objective case after in; as, in the midst of the forest.
Hence, figuratively, the condition of being surrounded or beset; the press; the burden; as, in the midst of official duties; in the midst of secular affairs.
In the midst of; amidst.
In the middle.
The middle of summer.
Situated in the middle.
In or toward the midst.
The middle of the way or distance; a middle way or course.
Being in the middle of the way or distance; as, the midway air.
In the middle of the way or distance; half way.
The middle of the week. Also used adjectively.
of Midwife
A woman who assists other women in childbirth; a female practitioner of the obstetric art.
To assist in childbirth.
To perform the office of midwife.
The art or practice of assisting women in childbirth; obstetrics.
Assistance at childbirth; help or cooperation in production.
The middle of winter.
To midwife.
Aspect; air; manner; demeanor; carriage; bearing.
A petty falling out; a tiff; a quarrel; offense.
To offend slightly.
imp. of May.
Force or power of any kind, whether of body or mind; energy or intensity of purpose, feeling, or action; means or resources to effect an object; strength; force; power; ability; capacity.
Mighty.
In a mighty manner; with might; with great earnestness; vigorously; powerfully.
To a great degree; very much.
The quality of being mighty; possession of might; power; greatness; high dignity.
Highness; excellency; -- with a possessive pronoun, a title of dignity; as, their high mightinesses.
Without; weak.
Possessing might; having great power or authority.
Accomplished by might; hence, extraordinary; wonderful.
Denoting and extraordinary degree or quality in respect of size, character, importance, consequences, etc.
of Mighty
A warrior of great force and courage.
In a great degree; very.
Soft; dainty.
Delicate fondling.
See 3d Minion.
To flatter.
A plant (Reseda odorata) having greenish flowers with orange-colored stamens, and exhaling a delicious fragrance. In Africa it is a low shrub, but further north it is usually an annual herb.
Same as Megrim.
Migratory.
A migratory bird or other animal.
of Migrate
of Migrate
To remove from one country or region to another, with a view to residence; to change one's place of residence; to remove; as, the Moors who migrated from Africa into Spain; to migrate to the West.
To pass periodically from one region or climate to another for feeding or breeding; -- said of certain birds, fishes, and quadrupeds.
The act of migrating.
Removing regularly or occasionally from one region or climate to another; as, migratory birds.
Hence, roving; wandering; nomad; as, migratory habits; a migratory life.
The popular designation of the hereditary sovereign of Japan.
Same as Micmacs.
Same as Mileage.
Of or pertaining to Milan in Italy, or to its inhabitants.
A native or inhabitant of Milan; people of Milan.
Giving milk; -- now applied only to beasts.
Tender; pitiful; weeping.
Gentle; pleasant; kind; soft; bland; clement; hence, moderate in degree or quality; -- the opposite of harsh, severe, irritating, violent, disagreeable, etc.; -- applied to persons and things; as, a mild disposition; a mild eye; a mild air; a mild medicine; a mild insanity.
To make mild, or milder.
A growth of minute powdery or webby fungi, whitish or of different colors, found on various diseased or decaying substances.
of Mildew
of Mildew
To taint with mildew.
To become tainted with mildew.
In a mild manner.
The quality or state of being mild; as, mildness of temper; the mildness of the winter.
A certain measure of distance, being equivalent in England and the United States to 320 poles or rods, or 5,280 feet.
An allowance for traveling expenses at a certain rate per mile.
Aggregate length or distance in miles; esp., the sum of lengths of tracks or wires of a railroad company, telegraph company, etc.
A post, or one of a series of posts, set up to indicate spaces of a mile each or the distance in miles from a given place.
Of or pertaining to Miletus, a city of Asia Minor, or to its inhabitants.
Descended from King Milesius of Spain, whose two sons are said to have conquered Ireland about 1300 b. c.; or pertaining to the descendants of King Milesius; hence, Irish.
A native or inhabitant of Miletus.
A native or inhabitant of Ireland.
A stone serving the same purpose as a milepost.
A common composite herb (Achillea Millefolium) with white flowers and finely dissected leaves; yarrow.
A fever accompanied by an eruption of small, isolated, red pimples, resembling a millet seed in form or size; miliary fever.
Like millet seeds; as, a miliary eruption.
Accompanied with an eruption like millet seeds; as, a miliary fever.
Small and numerous; as, the miliary tubercles of Echini.
One of the small tubercles of Echini.
Militia.
A genus of Foraminifera, having a porcelanous shell with several longitudinal chambers.
A fossil shell of, or similar to, the genus Miliola.
The same Milliolitic.
Of or pertaining to the genus Miliola; containing miliolites.
The state of being militant; warfare.
A military spirit or system; militarism.
Engaged in warfare; fighting; combating; serving as a soldier.
Military.
In a military manner.
A military state or condition; reliance on military force in administering government; a military system.
The spirit and traditions of military life.
A military man.
Of or pertaining to soldiers, to arms, or to war; belonging to, engaged in, or appropriate to, the affairs of war; as, a military parade; military discipline; military bravery; military conduct; military renown.
Performed or made by soldiers; as, a military election; a military expedition.
The whole body of soldiers; soldiery; militia; troops; the army.
of Militate
of Militate
To make war; to fight; to contend; -- usually followed by against and with.
In the widest sense, the whole military force of a nation, including both those engaged in military service as a business, and those competent and available for such service; specifically, the body of citizens enrolled for military instruction and discipline, but not subject to be called into actual service except in emergencies.
Military service; warfare.
of Militiaman
One who belongs to the militia.
To carry on, or prepare for, war.
A white fluid secreted by the mammary glands of female mammals for the nourishment of their young, consisting of minute globules of fat suspended in a solution of casein, albumin, milk sugar, and inorganic salts.
A kind of juice or sap, usually white in color, found in certain plants; latex. See Latex.
An emulsion made by bruising seeds; as, the milk of almonds, produced by pounding almonds with sugar and water.
The ripe, undischarged spat of an oyster.
of Milk
of Milk
To draw or press milk from the breasts or udder of, by the hand or mouth; to withdraw the milk of.
To draw from the breasts or udder; to extract, as milk; as, to milk wholesome milk from healthy cows.
To draw anything from, as if by milking; to compel to yield profit or advantage; to plunder.
To draw or to yield milk.
Consisting of milk.
One who milks; also, a mechanical apparatus for milking cows.
A cow or other animal that gives milk.
Full of milk; abounding with food.
In a milky manner.
State or quality of being milky.
White-livered; cowardly; timorous.
A woman who milks cows or is employed in the dairy.
of Milkman
A man who sells milk or delivers is to customers.
A piece of bread sopped in milk; figuratively, an effeminate or weak-minded person.
A leguminous herb (Astragalus glycyphyllos) of Europe and Asia, supposed to increase the secretion of milk in goats.
Any plant of the genera Asclepias and Acerates, abounding in a milky juice, and having its seed attached to a long silky down; silkweed. The name is also applied to several other plants with a milky juice, as to several kinds of spurge.
A genus of plants (Polygala) of many species. The common European P. vulgaris was supposed to have the power of producing a flow of milk in nurses.
Consisting of, or containing, milk.
Like, or somewhat like, milk; whitish and turbid; as, the water is milky. "Milky juice."
Yielding milk.
Mild; tame; spiritless.
A money of account of the United States, having the value of the tenth of a cent, or the thousandth of a dollar.
A machine for grinding or comminuting any substance, as grain, by rubbing and crushing it between two hard, rough, or intented surfaces; as, a gristmill, a coffee mill; a bone mill.
A machine used for expelling the juice, sap, etc., from vegetable tissues by pressure, or by pressure in combination with a grinding, or cutting process; as, a cider mill; a cane mill.
A machine for grinding and polishing; as, a lapidary mill.
A common name for various machines which produce a manufactured product, or change the form of a raw material by the continuous repetition of some simple action; as, a sawmill; a stamping mill, etc.
A building or collection of buildings with machinery by which the processes of manufacturing are carried on; as, a cotton mill; a powder mill; a rolling mill.
A hardened steel roller having a design in relief, used for imprinting a reversed copy of the design in a softer metal, as copper.
An excavation in rock, transverse to the workings, from which material for filling is obtained.
A passage underground through which ore is shot.
A milling cutter. See Illust. under Milling.
A pugilistic.
of Mill
of Mill
To reduce to fine particles, or to small pieces, in a mill; to grind; to comminute.
To shape, finish, or transform by passing through a machine; specifically, to shape or dress, as metal, by means of a rotary cutter.
To make a raised border around the edges of, or to cut fine grooves or indentations across the edges of, as of a coin, or a screw head; also, to stamp in a coining press; to coin.
To pass through a fulling mill; to full, as cloth.
To beat with the fists.
To roll into bars, as steel.
To swim under water; -- said of air-breathing creatures.
A kind of stout pasteboard.
The incorporated materials for gunpowder, in the form of a dense mass or cake, ready to be subjected to the process of granulation.
A dam or mound to obstruct a water course, and raise the water to a height sufficient to turn a mill wheel.
Having been subjected to some process of milling.
Slender rods or tubes of colored glass fused together and embedded in clear glass; -- used for paperweights and other small articles.
Consisting of a thousand years; of or pertaining to the millennium, or to the Millenarians.
One who believes that Christ will personally reign on earth a thousand years; a Chiliast.
Alt. of Millenarism
The doctrine of Millenarians.
Consisting of a thousand; millennial.
The space of a thousand years; a millennium; also, a Millenarian.
Of or pertaining to the millennium, or to a thousand years; as, a millennial period; millennial happiness.
One who believes that Christ will reign personally on earth a thousand years; a Chiliast; also, a believer in the universal prevalence of Christianity for a long period.
Alt. of Millenniarism
Belief in, or expectation of, the millennium; millenarianism.
One who believes in the millennium.
A thousand years; especially, the thousand years mentioned in the twentieth chapter in the twentieth chapter of Revelation, during which holiness is to be triumphant throughout the world. Some believe that, during this period, Christ will reign on earth in person with his saints.
A myriapod with many legs, esp. a chilognath, as the galleyworm.
A genus of Hydrocorallia, which includes the millipores.
Any coral of the genus Millepora, having the surface nearly smooth, and perforated with very minute unequal pores, or cells. The animals are hydroids, not Anthozoa. See Hydrocorallia.
A fossil millepore.
One who keeps or attends a flour mill or gristmill.
A milling machine.
A moth or lepidopterous insect; -- so called because the wings appear as if covered with white dust or powder, like a miller's clothes. Called also moth miller.
The eagle ray.
The hen harrier.
A believer in the doctrine of William Miller (d. 1849), who taught that the end of the world and the second coming of Christ were at hand.
A sulphide of nickel, commonly occurring in delicate capillary crystals, also in incrustations of a bronze yellow; -- sometimes called hair pyrites.
Thousandth; consisting of thousandth parts; as, millesimal fractions.
The name of several cereal and forage grasses which bear an abundance of small roundish grains. The common millets of Germany and Southern Europe are Panicum miliaceum, and Setaria Italica.
A prefix denoting a thousandth part of; as, millimeter, milligram, milliampere.
The thousandth part of one ampere.
A thousand millions; -- called also billion.  See Billion.
Of or pertaining to a mile, or to distance by miles; denoting a mile or miles.
of Milliary
A milestone.
A weight of the metric system, being one million grams; a metric ton.
Thousandfold.
Alt. of Milligramme
A measure of weight, in the metric system, being the thousandth part of a gram, equal to the weight of a cubic millimeter of water, or .01543 of a grain avoirdupois.
Alt. of Millilitre
A measure of capacity in the metric system, containing the thousandth part of a liter. It is a cubic centimeter, and is equal to .061 of an English cubic inch, or to .0338 of an American fluid ounce.
Alt. of Millimetre
A lineal measure in the metric system, containing the thousandth part of a meter; equal to .03937 of an inch. See 3d Meter.
Formerly, a man who imported and dealt in small articles of a miscellaneous kind, especially such as please the fancy of women.
A person, usually a woman, who makes, trims, or deals in hats, bonnets, headdresses, etc., for women.
The articles made or sold by milliners, as headdresses, hats or bonnets, laces, ribbons, and the like.
The business of work of a milliner.
A stiff cotton fabric used by milliners for lining bonnets.
The act or employment of grinding or passing through a mill; the process of fulling; the process of making a raised or intented edge upon coin, etc.; the process of dressing surfaces of various shapes with rotary cutters. See Mill.
The number of ten hundred thousand, or a thousand thousand, -- written 1,000, 000. See the Note under Hundred.
A very great number; an indefinitely large number.
The mass of common people; -- with the article the.
One whose wealth is counted by millions of francs, dollars, or pounds; a very rich person; a person worth a million or more.
A woman who is a millionaire, or the wife of a millionaire.
Of or pertaining to millions; consisting of millions; as, the millionary chronology of the pundits.
Multiplied by millions; innumerable.
Millionaire.
Being the last one of a million of units or objects counted in regular order from the first of a series or succession; being one of a million.
The quotient of a unit divided by one million; one of a million equal parts.
The same Milleped.
A liter, or cubic decimeter.
The thousandth part of one weber.
Alt. of Millreis
Alt. of Millreis
See Milreis.
Alt. of Millrynd
A figure supposed to represent the iron which holds a millstone by being set into its center.
A milled sixpence; -- the sixpence being one of the first English coins milled (1561).
One of two circular stones used for grinding grain or other substance.
The shafting, gearing, and other driving machinery of mills.
The business of setting up or of operating mill machinery.
A mechanic whose occupation is to build mills, or to set up their machinery.
A Portuguese money of account rated in the treasury department of the United States at one dollar and eight cents; also, a Brazilian money of account rated at fifty-four cents and six mills.
The spleen.
The spermatic fluid of fishes.
The testes, or spermaries, of fishes when filled with spermatozoa.
To impregnate (the roe of a fish) with milt.
A male fish.
Miltonic.
Of, pertaining to, or resembling, Milton, or his writings; as, Miltonic prose.
A small European fern (Asplenium Ceterach) formerly used in medicine.
Of or resembling birds of the kite kind.
A bird related to the kite.
A genus of raptorial birds, including the European kite.
A kind of drama in which real persons and events were generally represented in a ridiculous manner.
An actor in such representations.
To mimic.
An autographic stencil copying device invented by Edison.
Imitation; mimicry.
See Mimetite.
Alt. of Mimetical
Apt to imitate; given to mimicry; imitative.
Characterized by mimicry; -- applied to animals and plants; as, mimetic species; mimetic organisms. See Mimicry.
Same as Mimicry.
A mineral occurring in pale yellow or brownish hexagonal crystals. It is an arseniate of lead.
Alt. of Mimical
Imitative; mimetic.
Consisting of, or formed by, imitation; imitated; as, mimic gestures.
Imitative; characterized by resemblance to other forms; -- applied to crystals which by twinning resemble simple forms of a higher grade of symmetry.
One who imitates or mimics, especially one who does so for sport; a copyist; a buffoon.
of Mimic
of Mimic
To imitate or ape for sport; to ridicule by imitation.
To assume a resemblance to (some other organism of a totally different nature, or some surrounding object), as a means of protection or advantage.
In an imitative manner.
One who mimics; a mimic.
An animal which imitates something else, in form or habits.
The act or practice of one who mimics; ludicrous imitation for sport or ridicule.
Protective resemblance; the resemblance which certain animals and plants exhibit to other animals and plants or to the natural objects among which they live, -- a characteristic which serves as their chief means of protection against enemies; imitation; mimesis; mimetism.
A writer of mimes.
A genus of leguminous plants, containing many species, and including the sensitive plants (Mimosa sensitiva, and M. pudica).
Pertaining to, or designating, a variety of tannin or tannic acid found in Acacia, Mimosa, etc.
of Mina
of Mina
An ancient weight or denomination of money, of varying value. The Attic mina was valued at a hundred drachmas.
See Myna.
Such as can be mined; as, minable earth.
Threatening; menacing.
Disposition to threaten.
A slender, lofty tower attached to a mosque and surrounded by one or more projecting balconies, from which the summon to prayer is cried by the muezzin.
An alloy consisting of copper, nickel, tungsten, and aluminium; -- used by jewelers.
Alt. of Minatorily
In a minatory manner; with threats.
Threatening; menacing.
Same as Manul.
of Mince
of Mince
To cut into very small pieces; to chop fine; to hash; as, to mince meat.
To suppress or weaken the force of; to extenuate; to palliate; to tell by degrees, instead of directly and frankly; to clip, as words or expressions; to utter half and keep back half of.
To affect; to make a parade of.
To walk with short steps; to walk in a prim, affected manner.
To act or talk with affected nicety; to affect delicacy in manner.
A short, precise step; an affected manner.
Minced meat; meat chopped very fine; a mixture of boiled meat, suet, apples, etc., chopped very fine, to which spices and raisins are added; -- used in making mince pie.
A pie made of mince-meat.
One who minces.
That minces; characterized by primness or affected nicety.
In a mincing manner; not fully; with affected nicety.
The intellectual or rational faculty in man; the understanding; the intellect; the power that conceives, judges, or reasons; also, the entire spiritual nature; the soul; -- often in distinction from the body.
The state, at any given time, of the faculties of thinking, willing, choosing, and the like; psychical activity or state; as: (a) Opinion; judgment; belief.
Choice; inclination; liking; intent; will.
Courage; spirit.
Memory; remembrance; recollection; as, to have or keep in mind, to call to mind, to put in mind, etc.
of Mind
of Mind
To fix the mind or thoughts on; to regard with attention; to treat as of consequence; to consider; to heed; to mark; to note.
To occupy one's self with; to employ one's self about; to attend to; as, to mind one's business.
To obey; as, to mind parents; the dog minds his master.
To have in mind; to purpose.
To put in mind; to remind.
To give attention or heed; to obey; as, the dog minds well.
Disposed; inclined; having a mind.
One who minds, tends, or watches something, as a child, a machine, or cattle; as, a minder of a loom.
One to be attended; specif., a pauper child intrusted to the care of a private person.
Bearing in mind; regardful; attentive; heedful; observant.
Regard; mindfulness.
Not indued with mind or intellectual powers; stupid; unthinking.
Unmindful; inattentive; heedless; careless.
See Mien.
Belonging to me; my. Used as a pronominal to me; my. Used as a pronominal adjective in the predicate; as, "Vengeance is mine; I will repay." Rom. xii. 19. Also, in the old style, used attributively, instead of my, before a noun beginning with a vowel.
To dig a mine or pit in the earth; to get ore, metals, coal, or precious stones, out of the earth; to dig in the earth for minerals; to dig a passage or cavity under anything in order to overthrow it by explosives or otherwise.
To form subterraneous tunnel or hole; to form a burrow or lodge in the earth; as, the mining cony.
of Mine
of Mine
To dig away, or otherwise remove, the substratum or foundation of; to lay a mine under; to sap; to undermine; hence, to ruin or destroy by slow degrees or secret means.
To dig into, for ore or metal.
To get, as metals, out of the earth by digging.
A subterranean cavity or passage
A pit or excavation in the earth, from which metallic ores, precious stones, coal, or other mineral substances are taken by digging; -- distinguished from the pits from which stones for architectural purposes are taken, and which are called quarries.
A cavity or tunnel made under a fortification or other work, for the purpose of blowing up the superstructure with some explosive agent.
Any place where ore, metals, or precious stones are got by digging or washing the soil; as, a placer mine.
Fig.: A rich source of wealth or other good.
One who mines; a digger for metals, etc.; one engaged in the business of getting ore, coal, or precious stones, out of the earth; one who digs military mines; as, armies have sappers and miners.
Any of numerous insects which, in the larval state, excavate galleries in the parenchyma of leaves. They are mostly minute moths and dipterous flies.
The chattering, or garrulous, honey eater of Australia (Myzantha garrula).
An inorganic species or substance occurring in nature, having a definite chemical composition and usually a distinct crystalline form. Rocks, except certain glassy igneous forms, are either simple minerals or aggregates of minerals.
A mine.
Anything which is neither animal nor vegetable, as in the most general classification of things into three kingdoms (animal, vegetable, and mineral).
Of or pertaining to minerals; consisting of a mineral or of minerals; as, a mineral substance.
Impregnated with minerals; as, mineral waters.
One versed in minerals; mineralogist.
The process of mineralizing, or forming a mineral by combination of a metal with another element; also, the process of converting into a mineral, as a bone or a plant.
The act of impregnating with a mineral, as water.
The conversion of a cell wall into a material of a stony nature.
of Mineralize
of Mineralize
To transform into a mineral.
To impregnate with a mineral; as, mineralized water.
To go on an excursion for observing and collecting minerals; to mineralogize.
An element which is combined with a metal, thus forming an ore. Thus, in galena, or lead ore, sulphur is a mineralizer; in hematite, oxygen is a mineralizer.
Of or pertaining to mineralogy; as, a mineralogical table.
According to the principles of, or with reference to, mineralogy.
One versed in mineralogy; one devoted to the study of minerals.
A carrier shell (Phorus).
To study mineralogy by collecting and examining minerals.
of Mineralogy
The science which treats of minerals, and teaches how to describe, distinguish, and classify them.
A treatise or book on this science.
The goddess of wisdom, of war, of the arts and sciences, of poetry, and of spinning and weaving; -- identified with the Grecian Pallas Athene.
The smallest of regular sizes of portrait photographs.
Same as Miniver.
To mingle; to mix.
A small biting fly; a midge.
of Mingle
of Mingle
To mix; intermix; to combine or join, as an individual or part, with other parts, but commonly so as to be distinguishable in the product; to confuse; to confound.
To associate or unite in society or by ties of relationship; to cause or allow to intermarry; to intermarry.
To deprive of purity by mixture; to contaminate.
To put together; to join.
To make or prepare by mixing the ingredients of.
To become mixed or blended.
A mixture.
That can be mingled.
Confusedly.
To mix in a disorderly way; to make a mess of.
A hotchpotch.
The act of mingling, or the state of being mixed.
One who mingles.
In a mingling manner.
Of the color of minium or red lead; miniate.
Migniard.
To render delicate or dainty.
of Miniate
of Miniate
To paint or tinge with red lead or vermilion; also, to decorate with letters, or the like, painted red, as the page of a manuscript.
Of or pertaining to the color of red lead or vermilion; painted with vermilion.
Originally, a painting in colors such as those in mediaeval manuscripts; in modern times, any very small painting, especially a portrait.
Greatly diminished size or form; reduced scale.
Lettering in red; rubric distinction.
A particular feature or trait.
Being on a small; much reduced from the reality; as, a miniature copy.
To represent or depict in a small compass, or on a small scale.
A painter of miniatures.
A kind of light passenger vehicle, carrying four persons.
A conical rifle bullet, with a cavity in its base plugged with a piece of iron, which, by the explosion of the charge, is driven farther in, expanding the sides to fit closely the grooves of the barrel.
A rifle adapted to minie balls.
of Minify
of Minify
To make small, or smaller; to diminish the apparent dimensions of; to lessen.
To degrade by speech or action.
A little darling; a favorite; a minion.
A little pin.
Small; diminutive.
Anything very minute; as, the minims of existence; -- applied to animalcula; and the like.
The smallest liquid measure, equal to about one drop; the sixtieth part of a fluid drachm.
A small fish; a minnow.
A little man or being; a dwarf.
One of an austere order of mendicant hermits of friars founded in the 15th century by St. Francis of Paola.
A time note, formerly the shortest in use; a half note, equal to half a semibreve, or two quarter notes or crotchets.
A short poetical encomium.
Minute.
A trifle; a trinket; a token.
The act or process of minimizing.
of Minimize
of Minimize
To reduce to the smallest part or proportion possible; to reduce to a minimum.
of Minimum
The least quantity assignable, admissible, or possible, in a given case; hence, a thing of small consequence; -- opposed to maximum.
of Minimus
A being of the smallest size.
The little finger; the fifth digit, or that corresponding to it, in either the manus or pes.
The act or business of making mines or of working them.
Of or pertaining to mines; as, mining engineer; mining machinery; a mining region.
Minimum.
A loved one; one highly esteemed and favored; -- in a good sense.
An obsequious or servile dependent or agent of another; a fawning favorite.
A small kind of type, in size between brevier and nonpareil.
An ancient form of ordnance, the caliber of which was about three inches.
Fine; trim; dainty.
Small; delicate.
A size of type between nonpareil and minion; -- used in ornamental borders, etc.
Kind treatment.
To flavor.
Alt. of Minionly
Like a minion; daintily.
State of being a minion.
Of the color of red or vermilion.
To diminish; to lessen.
The act of diminishing, or the state of being diminished; diminution.
A servant; a subordinate; an officer or assistant of inferior rank; hence, an agent, an instrument.
An officer of justice.
One to whom the sovereign or executive head of a government intrusts the management of affairs of state, or some department of such affairs.
A representative of a government, sent to the court, or seat of government, of a foreign nation to transact diplomatic business.
One who serves at the altar; one who performs sacerdotal duties; the pastor of a church duly authorized or licensed to preach the gospel and administer the sacraments.
of Minister
of Minister
To furnish or apply; to afford; to supply; to administer.
To act as a servant, attendant, or agent; to attend and serve; to perform service in any office, sacred or secular.
To supply or to things needful; esp., to supply consolation or remedies.
Of or pertaining to ministry or service; serving; attendant.
Of or pertaining to the office of a minister or to the ministry as a body, whether civil or sacerdotal.
Tending to advance or promote; contributive.
A supporter of the ministers, or the party in power.
In a ministerial manner; in the character or capacity of a minister.
See Ministry.
Ministration.
Ministerial.
Performing service as a minister; attendant on service; acting under command; subordinate.
One who ministers.
The act of ministering; service; ministry.
Serving to aid; ministering.
A woman who ministers.
The act of ministering; ministration; service.
Agency; instrumentality.
The office, duties, or functions of a minister, servant, or agent; ecclesiastical, executive, or ambassadorial function or profession.
The body of ministers of state; also, the clergy, as a body.
Administration; rule; term in power; as, the ministry of Pitt.
The office of a minister.
A heavy, brilliant red pigment, consisting of an oxide of lead, Pb3O4, obtained by exposing lead or massicot to a gentle and continued heat in the air. It is used as a cement, as a paint, and in the manufacture of flint glass. Called also red lead.
A fur esteemed in the Middle Ages as a part of costume. It is uncertain whether it was the fur of one animal only or of different animals.
A singing bird of India of the family Campephagidae.
A carnivorous mammal of the genus Putorius, allied to the weasel. The European mink is Putorius lutreola. The common American mink (P. vison) varies from yellowish brown to black.  Its fur is highly valued.  Called also minx, nurik, and vison.
A love-singer; specifically, one of a class of German poets and musicians who flourished from about the middle of the twelfth to the middle of the fourteenth century. They were chiefly of noble birth, and made love and beauty the subjects of their verses.
A small European fresh-water cyprinoid fish (Phoxinus laevis, formerly Leuciscus phoxinus); sometimes applied also to the young of larger kinds; -- called also minim and minny. The name is also applied to several allied American species, of the genera Phoxinus, Notropis, or Minnilus, and Rhinichthys.
Any of numerous small American cyprinodont fishes of the genus Fundulus, and related genera. They live both in fresh and in salt water. Called also killifish, minny, and mummichog.
A minnow.
An Asiatic bird (Gracula musica), allied to the starlings. It is black, with a white spot on the wings, and a pair of flat yellow wattles on the head. It is often tamed and taught to pronounce words.
Inferior in bulk, degree, importance, etc.; less; smaller; of little account; as, minor divisions of a body.
Less by a semitone in interval or difference of pitch; as, a minor third.
A person of either sex who has not attained the age at which full civil rights are accorded; an infant; in England and the United States, one under twenty-one years of age.
The minor term, that is, the subject of the conclusion; also, the minor premise, that is, that premise which contains the minor term; in hypothetical syllogisms, the categorical premise. It is the second proposition of a regular syllogism, as in the following: Every act of injustice partakes of meanness; to take money from another by gaming is an act of injustice; therefore, the taking of money from another by gaming partakes of meanness.
A Minorite; a Franciscan friar.
To diminish.
A diminution.
See Franciscan Nuns, under Franciscan, a.
A Franciscan friar.
of Minority
The state of being a minor, or under age.
State of being less or small.
The smaller number; -- opposed to majority; as, the minority must be ruled by the majority.
A king and lawgiver of Crete, fabled to be the son of Jupiter and Europa.  After death he was made a judge in the Lower Regions.
A fabled monster, half man and half bull, confined in the labyrinth constructed by Daedalus in Crete.
See Minnow.
A church of a monastery.  The name is often retained and applied to the church after the monastery has ceased to exist (as Beverly Minster, Southwell Minster, etc.), and is also improperly used for any large church.
In the Middle Ages, one of an order of men who subsisted by the arts of poetry and music, and sang verses to the accompaniment of a harp or other instrument; in modern times, a poet; a bard; a singer and harper; a musician.
The arts and occupation of minstrels; the singing and playing of a minstrel.
Musical instruments.
A collective body of minstrels, or musicians; also, a collective body of minstrels' songs.
The name of several aromatic labiate plants, mostly of the genus Mentha, yielding odoriferous essential oils by distillation. See Mentha.
A place where money is coined by public authority.
Any place regarded as a source of unlimited supply; the supply itself.
of Mint
of Mint
To make by stamping, as money; to coin; to make and stamp into money.
To invent; to forge; to fabricate; to fashion.
The coin, or other production, made in a mint.
The duty paid to the mint for coining.
One who mints.
of Mintman
One skilled in coining, or in coins; a coiner.
The master or superintendent of a mint. Also used figuratively.
The number from which another number is to be subtracted.
A slow graceful dance consisting of a coupee, a high step, and a balance.
A tune or air to regulate the movements of the dance so called; a movement in suites, sonatas, symphonies, etc., having the dance form, and commonly in 3-4, sometimes 3-8, measure.
A small kind of printing type; minion.
A minim.
Less; requiring to be subtracted; negative; as, a minus quantity.
Any very small, minute object.
A small Roman letter which is neither capital nor uncial; a manuscript written in such letters.
Of the size and style of minuscules; written in minuscules.
Pertaining to, or consisting of, minutes.
The sixtieth part of an hour; sixty seconds. (Abbrev. m.; as, 4 h. 30 m.)
The sixtieth part of a degree; sixty seconds (Marked thus ('); as, 10¡ 20').
A nautical or a geographic mile.
A coin; a half farthing.
A very small part of anything, or anything very small; a jot; a tittle.
A point of time; a moment.
The memorandum; a record; a note to preserve the memory of anything; as, to take minutes of a contract; to take minutes of a conversation or debate.
A fixed part of a module. See Module.
Of or pertaining to a minute or minutes; occurring at or marking successive minutes.
To set down a short sketch or note of; to jot down; to make a minute or a brief summary of.
Very small; little; tiny; fine; slight; slender; inconsiderable.
Attentive to small things; paying attention to details; critical; particular; precise; as, a minute observer; minute observation.
A figure which strikes the hour on the bell of some fanciful clocks; -- called also jack of the clock house.
A timeserver; an inconstant person.
In a minute manner; with minuteness; exactly; nicely.
Happening every minute; continuing; unceasing.
At intervals of a minute; very often and regularly.
of Minuteman
A militiaman who was to be ready to march at a moment's notice; -- a term used in the American Revolution.
The quality of being minute.
of Minutia
A minute particular; a small or minor detail; -- used chiefly in the plural.
A pert or a wanton girl.
A she puppy; a pet dog.
The mink; -- called also minx otter.
Abounding with mines; like a mine.
Of or pertaining to the middle division of the Tertiary.
The Miocene period. See Chart of Geology.
An extinct Miocene mammal of the Horse family, closely related to the genus Anhithecrium, and having three usable hoofs on each foot.
An irregular or partisan soldier; a bandit.
A Russian village community.
Same as Emir.
A remarkable variable star in the constellation Cetus (/ Ceti).
of Mirabilary
One who, or a work which, narrates wonderful things; one who writes of wonders.
A genus of plants. See Four-o'clock.
Native sodium sulphate; Glauber's salt.
Wonderful; admirable.
A wonder or wonderful thing.
Specifically: An event or effect contrary to the established constitution and course of things, or a deviation from the known laws of nature; a supernatural event, or one transcending the ordinary laws by which the universe is governed.
A miracle play.
A story or legend abounding in miracles.
To make wonderful.
To cause to seem to be a miracle.
Of the nature of a miracle; performed by supernatural power; effected by the direct agency of almighty power, and not by natural causes.
Supernatural; wonderful.
Wonder-working.
Same as Belvedere.
An optical effect, sometimes seen on the ocean, but more frequently in deserts, due to total reflection of light at the surface common to two strata of air differently heated. The reflected image is seen, commonly in an inverted position, while the real object may or may not be in sight. When the surface is horizontal, and below the eye, the appearance is that of a sheet of water in which the object is seen reflected; when the reflecting surface is above the eye, the image is seen projected against the sky. The fata Morgana and looming are species of mirage.
See Nitrobenzene.
An ant.
Deep mud; wet, spongy earth.
of Mire
of Mire
To cause or permit to stick fast in mire; to plunge or fix in mud; as, to mire a horse or wagon.
To soil with mud or foul matter.
To stick in mire.
Alt. of Mirifical
Working wonders; wonderful.
Wonderful.
The quality of being miry.
Dark; gloomy; murky.
Darkness; gloom; murk.
Dark; gloomy; murky.
Dark; gloomy. See Murky.
A looking-glass or a speculum; any glass or polished substance that forms images by the reflection of rays of light.
That which gives a true representation, or in which a true image may be seen; hence, a pattern; an exemplar.
See Speculum.
of Mirror
of Mirror
To reflect, as in a mirror.
Merriment; gayety accompanied with laughter; jollity.
That which causes merriment.
Full of mirth or merriment; merry; as, mirthful children.
Indicating or inspiring mirth; as, a mirthful face.
Without mirth.
Abounding with deep mud; full of mire; muddy; as, a miry road.
The common title of honor in Persia, prefixed to the surname of an individual. When appended to the surname, it signifies Prince.
A prefix used adjectively and adverbially in the sense of amiss, wrong, ill, wrongly, unsuitably; as, misdeed, mislead, mischief, miscreant.
Wrong; amiss.
Wrong acceptation; understanding in a wrong sense.
To account or reckon wrongly.
To adjust wrongly of unsuitably; to throw of adjustment.
Wrong adjustment; unsuitable arrangement.
Mischance; misfortune; ill lick; unlucky accident; ill adventure.
Unfortunate.
Unfortunate.
Inadvertence.
Bad advice.
To give bad counsel to.
Ill advised.
To dislike.
Ill disposed.
An evil or wrong affection; the state of being ill affected.
To affirm incorrectly.
Not rightly aimed.
A erroneous statement or allegation.
To state erroneously.
A marriage with a person of inferior rank or social station; an improper alliance; a mesalliance.
Wrongly allied or associated.
A wrong allotment.
To alter wrongly; esp., to alter for the worse.
A hater of mankind; a misanthropist.
Alt. of Misanthropical
Hating or disliking mankind.
A misanthrope.
A misanthrope.
Hatred of, or dislike to, mankind; -- opposed to philanthropy.
A wrong application.
of Misapply
of Misapply
To apply wrongly; to use for a wrong purpose; as, to misapply a name or title; to misapply public money.
Improperly appreciated.
To take in a wrong sense; to misunderstand.
A mistaking or mistake; wrong apprehension of one's meaning of a fact; misconception; misunderstanding.
By, or with, misapprehension.
To appropriate wrongly; to use for a wrong purpose.
Wrong appropriation; wrongful use.
of Misarrange
of Misarrange
To place in a wrong order, or improper manner.
Wrong arrangement.
To ascribe wrongly.
To assay, or attempt, improperly or unsuccessfully.
To assign wrongly.
To misunderstand; to disregard.
Misadventure.
To misadvise.
To carry improperly; to carry (one's self) wrongly; to misbehave.
Not to become; to suit ill; not to befit or be adapted to.
Unbecoming.
of Misbede
of Misbede
To wrong; to do injury to.
No befitting.
Alt. of Misbegotten
Unlawfully or irregularly begotten; of bad origin; pernicious.
of Misbehave
of Misbehave
To behave ill; to conduct one's self improperly; -- often used with a reciprocal pronoun.
Guilty of ill behavior; illbred; rude.
Improper, rude, or uncivil behavior; ill conduct.
Erroneous or false belief.
To believe erroneously, or in a false religion.
One who believes wrongly; one who holds a false religion.
To suit ill.
To bestow improperly.
The act of misbestowing.
Misbelief; unbelief; suspicion.
imp. of Misbede.
p. p. of Misbede.
Born to misfortune.
To calculate erroneously; to judge wrongly.
To call by a wrong name; to name improperly.
To call by a bad name; to abuse.
Unfortunate event or issue of an undertaking; failure to attain a desired result or reach a destination.
Ill conduct; evil or improper behavior; as, the failings and miscarriages of the righteous.
The act of bringing forth before the time; premature birth.
Capable of miscarrying; liable to fail.
of Miscarry
of Miscarry
To carry, or go, wrong; to fail of reaching a destination, or fail of the intended effect; to be unsuccessful; to suffer defeat.
To bring forth young before the proper time.
To cast or reckon wrongly.
An erroneous cast or reckoning.
A mixing of races; amalgamation, as by intermarriage of black and white.
Of or pertaining to miscellanies.
A writer of miscellanies.
A mixture of two or more sorts of grain; -- now called maslin and meslin.
A collection of miscellaneous matters; matters of various kinds.
Mixed; mingled; consisting of several things; of diverse sorts; promiscuous; heterogeneous; as, a miscellaneous collection.
A writer of miscellanies; miscellanarian.
of Miscellany
A mass or mixture of various things; a medley; esp., a collection of compositions on various subjects.
Miscellaneous; heterogeneous.
To misjudge.
Erroneous judgment.
Ill luck; ill fortune; mishap.
To happen by mischance.
Unlucky.
To characterize falsely or erroneously; to give a wrong character to.
To charge erroneously, as in account.
A mistake in charging.
Harm; damage; esp., disarrangement of order; trouble or vexation caused by human agency or by some living being, intentionally or not; often, calamity, mishap; trivial evil caused by thoughtlessness, or in sport.
Cause of trouble or vexation; trouble.
To do harm to.
Mischievous.
Mischievous.
One who makes mischief; one who excites or instigates quarrels or enmity.
Causing harm; exciting enmity or quarrels.
The act or practice of making mischief, inciting quarrels, etc.
Causing mischief; harmful; hurtful; -- now often applied where the evil is done carelessly or in sport; as, a mischievous child.
See Mishna.
See Mishnic.
of Mischoose
of Mischoose
of Mischoose
To choose wrongly.
To make a wrong choice.
To christen wrongly.
Capability of being mixed.
Capable of being mixed; mixable; as, water and alcohol are miscible in all proportions.
Erroneous citation.
To cite erroneously.
A mistaken claim.
Not cognizant; ignorant; not knowing.
To fail to apprehend; to misunderstand.
Wrong collocation.
To give a wrong color to; figuratively, to set forth erroneously or unfairly; as, to miscolor facts.
Discomfort.
To get a wrong idea of or about; to misunderstand.
Erroneous computation; false reckoning.
To compute erroneously.
Misconception.
of Misconceive
of Misconceive
To conceive wrongly; to interpret incorrectly; to receive a false notion of; to misjudge; to misapprehend.
One who misconceives.
Erroneous conception; false opinion; wrong understanding.
An erroneous inference or conclusion.
Wrong conduct; bad behavior; mismanagement.
To conduct amiss; to mismanage.
To behave amiss.
Having a mistaken confidence; wrongly trusting.
A wrong conjecture or guess.
To conjecture wrongly.
To consecrate amiss.
Wrong consecration.
A wrong consequence; a false deduction.
Such as can be misconstrued, as language or conduct.
To construct wrongly; to construe or interpret erroneously.
Erroneous construction; wrong interpretation.
of Misconstrue
of Misconstrue
To construe wrongly; to interpret erroneously.
One who misconstrues.
Discontent.
Discontinuance; also, continuance by undue process.
To copy amiss.
A mistake in copying.
To fail or err in attempting to correct.
To counsel or advise wrongly.
To count erroneously.
An erroneous counting.
To covet wrongfully.
Alt. of Miscreancy
The quality of being miscreant; adherence to a false religion; false faith.
One who holds a false religious faith; a misbeliever.
One not restrained by Christian principles; an unscrupulous villain; a while wretch.
Holding a false religious faith.
Destitute of conscience; unscrupulous.
Miscreated; illegitimate; forged; as, miscreate titles.
To create badly or amiss.
Formed unnaturally or illegitimately; deformed.
Creating amiss.
A miscreant, or believer in a false religious doctrine.
Wrong credulity or belief; misbelief.
A false stroke with a billiard cue, the cue slipping from the ball struck without impelling it as desired.
of Misdate
of Misdate
To date erroneously.
of Misdeal
of Misdeal
To deal or distribute wrongly, as cards; to make a wrong distribution.
The act of misdealing; a wrong distribution of cards to the players.
An evil deed; a wicked action.
To misjudge.
To behave ill; -- with a reflexive pronoun; as, to misdemean one's self.
One guilty of a misdemeanor.
Ill behavior; evil conduct; fault.
A crime less than a felony.
p. p. of Misdeem.
To distribute wrongly.
To turn or divert improperly; to misdirect.
To derive erroneously.
To describe wrongly.
Ill desert.
Mistaken devotion.
Improper.
To diet improperly.
Arrayed, prepared, or furnished, unsuitably.
To give a wrong direction to; as, to misdirect a passenger, or a letter; to misdirect one's energies.
The act of directing wrongly, or the state of being so directed.
An error of a judge in charging the jury on a matter of law.
Erroneous disposal or application.
To make wrong distinctions in or concerning.
To divide wrongly.
Wrong division.
of Misdo
of Misdo
of Misdo
To do wrongly.
To do wrong to; to illtreat.
To do wrong; to commit a fault.
A wrongdoer.
A wrong done; a fault or crime; an offense; as, it was my misdoing.
To be suspicious of; to have suspicion.
Suspicion.
Irresolution; hesitation.
Misgiving; hesitating.
Dread of evil.
The issue in a writ of right.
Expense; cost; disbursement.
A tax or tallage; in Wales, an honorary gift of the people to a new king or prince of Wales; also, a tribute paid, in the country palatine of Chester, England, at the change of the owner of the earldom.
Want of ease; discomfort; misery.
Having discomfort or misery; troubled.
Not easy; painful.
An incorrect or spurious edition.
To educate in a wrong manner.
To employ amiss; as, to misemploy time, advantages, talents, etc.
Wrong or mistaken employment.
To enter or insert wrongly, as a charge in an account.
To treat wrongfully.
An erroneous entry or charge, as of an account.
A wretched person; a person afflicted by any great misfortune.
A despicable person; a wretch.
A covetous, grasping, mean person; esp., one having wealth, who lives miserably for the sake of saving and increasing his hoard.
A kind of large earth auger.
Very unhappy; wretched.
Causing unhappiness or misery.
Worthless; mean; despicable; as, a miserable fellow; a miserable dinner.
Avaricious; niggardly; miserly.
A miserable person.
The state or quality of being miserable.
In a miserable; unhappily; calamitously; wretchedly; meanly.
Commiseration.
The psalm usually appointed for penitential acts, being the 50th psalm in the Latin version. It commences with the word miserere.
A musical composition adapted to the 50th psalm.
A small projecting boss or bracket, on the under side of the hinged seat of a church stall (see Stall). It was intended, the seat being turned up, to give some support to a worshiper when standing. Called also misericordia.
Same as Ileus.
Compassion; pity; mercy.
Same as Misericordia, 2.
An amercement.
A thin-bladed dagger; so called, in the Middle Ages, because used to give the death wound or "mercy" stroke to a fallen adversary.
An indulgence as to food or dress granted to a member of a religious order.
Like a miser; very covetous; sordid; niggardly.
of Misery
Great unhappiness; extreme pain of body or mind; wretchedness; distress; woe.
Cause of misery; calamity; misfortune.
Covetousness; niggardliness; avarice.
Want of esteem; disrespect.
To estimate erroneously.
An erroneous explanation.
Wrong explication.
Wrong exposition.
To expound erroneously.
Wrong expression.
Want of faith; distrust.
of Misfall
of Misfall
of Misfall
To befall, as ill luck; to happen to unluckily.
To fare ill.
Misfortune.
To form wrongly.
A trespass; a wrong done; the improper doing of an act which a person might lawfully do.
Ill feature.
Insensate.
To feign with an evil design.
The act or the state of fitting badly; as, a misfit in making a coat; a ludicrous misfit.
Something that fits badly, as a garment.
of Misform
of Misform
To make in an ill form.
Malformation.
Producing misfortune.
Bad fortune or luck; calamity; an evil accident; disaster; mishap; mischance.
To happen unluckily or unfortunately; to miscarry; to fail.
Unfortunate.
To frame wrongly.
To get wrongfully.
See Misgye.
of Misgive
of Misgive
of Misgive
To give or grant amiss.
Specifically: To give doubt and apprehension to, instead of confidence and courage; to impart fear to; to make irresolute; -- usually said of the mind or heart, and followed by the objective personal pronoun.
To suspect; to dread.
To give out doubt and apprehension; to be fearful or irresolute.
Evil premonition; doubt; distrust.
To go astray.
Unjustly gotten.
To govern ill; as, to misgovern a country.
Misgovernment; misconduct; misbehavior.
Ill governed, as a people; ill directed.
Bad government; want of government.
Not gracious.
To misgraft.
To graft wrongly.
To found erroneously.
Bad growth; an unnatural or abnormal growth.
To guess wrongly.
Wrong guidance.
To guide wrongly; to lead astray; as, to misguide the understanding.
Misguidance; error.
Misleading.
To misguide.
To handle ill or wrongly; to maltreat.
Evil accident; ill luck; misfortune; mischance.
To happen unluckily; -- used impersonally.
To happen ill or unluckily.
Unhappy.
The scup.
To hear incorrectly.
A hotchpotch.
A collection or digest of Jewish traditions and explanations of Scripture, forming the text of the Talmud.
Of or pertaining to the Mishna.
Wrong imagination; delusion.
To use for a bad purpose; to abuse; to misuse; as, to misimprove time, talents, advantages, etc.
Ill use or employment; use for a bad purpose.
To cause to have a wrong inclination or tendency; to affect wrongly.
To infer incorrectly.
To give untrue information to; to inform wrongly.
To give untrue information; (with against) to calumniate.
A misinformer.
Untrue or incorrect information.
One who gives or incorrect information.
To instruct amiss.
Wrong or improper instruction.
Wrong information; misinformation.
Disagreement; misunderstanding.
To aim amiss.
To interpret erroneously; to understand or to explain in a wrong sense.
Capable of being misinterpreted; liable to be misunderstood.
The act of interpreting erroneously; a mistaken interpretation.
One who interprets erroneously.
To join unfitly or improperly.
An incorrect union of parties or of causes of action in a procedure, criminal or civil.
To judge erroneously or unjustly; to err in judgment; to misconstrue.
A wrong or unjust judgment.
To keep wrongly.
Not to know.
A little bagpipe.
To kindle amiss; to inflame to a bad purpose; to excite wrongly.
To have a mistaken notion of or about.
Defective flow or vitiated condition of the milk.
of Mislay
of Mislay
To lay in a wrong place; to ascribe to a wrong source.
To lay in a place not recollected; to lose.
One who mislays.
of Misle
of Misle
To rain in very fine drops, like a thick mist; to mizzle.
A fine rain; a thick mist; mizzle.
of Mislead
of Mislead
To lead into a wrong way or path; to lead astray; to guide into error; to cause to mistake; to deceive.
One who leads into error.
Leading astray; delusive.
To learn wrongly.
imp. & p. p. of Mislead.
See Maslin.
See Mistletoe.
To deceive or lead astray with a false light.
of Mislike
of Mislike
To dislike; to disapprove of; to have aversion to; as, to mislike a man.
Dislike; disapprobation; aversion.
One who dislikes.
Dislike; aversion.
See Maslin.
To live amiss.
To lodge amiss.
Ill luck; misfortune.
Raining in very small drops.
To make or form amiss; to spoil in making.
To manage ill or improperly; as, to mismanage public affairs.
Wrong or bad management; as, he failed through mismagement.
One who manages ill.
To mark wrongly.
To match unsuitably.
To mate wrongly or unsuitably; as, to mismate gloves or shoes; a mismated couple.
To measure or estimate incorrectly.
Wrong measurement.
To give the wrong meter to, as to a line of verse.
To call by the wrong name; to give a wrong or inappropriate name to.
The misnaming of a person in a legal instrument, as in a complaint or indictment; any misnaming of a person or thing; a wrong or inapplicable name or title.
To misname.
To number wrongly.
To nurture or train wrongly; as, to misnurture children.
Mistaken obedience; disobedience.
To observe inaccurately; to mistake in observing.
One who misobserves; one who fails to observe properly.
A hater of marriage.
Hatre/ of marriage.
A woman hater.
Hating women.
Hatred of women.
Hatred of argument or discussion; hatred of enlightenment.
Wrong opinion.
To order ill; to manage erroneously; to conduct badly.
Irregularity; disorder.
Irregular; disorderly.
Wrong ordination.
Hatred of God.
To paint ill, or wrongly.
Wrong passion or feeling.
To dissatisfy.
Alt. of Mispend
See Misspell, Misspend, etc.
See Misspense.
Erroneous perception.
To persuade amiss.
A false persuasion; wrong notion or opinion.
Arsenical iron pyrites; arsenopyrite.
of Misplace
of Misplace
To put in a wrong place; to set or place on an improper or unworthy object; as, he misplaced his confidence.
The act of misplacing, or the state of being misplaced.
To err in pleading.
An error in pleading.
To point improperly; to punctuate wrongly.
Wrong policy; impolicy.
Wrong practice.
To praise amiss.
To print wrong.
A mistake in printing; a deviation from the copy; as, a book full of misprints.
See Misprize.
To mistake.
The act of misprising; misapprehension; misconception; mistake.
Neglect; undervaluing; contempt.
A neglect, negligence, or contempt.
To slight or undervalue.
Wrong or irregular proceding.
To make a false profession; to make pretensions to skill which is not possessed.
To make a false profession of.
of Mispronounce
of Mispronounce
To pronounce incorrectly.
Wrong or improper pronunciation.
To give wrong proportions to; to join without due proportion.
Viciously proud.
To punctuate wrongly or incorrectly.
Erroneous or inaccurate quotation.
To quote erroneously or incorrectly.
To raise or exite unreasonable.
To rate erroneously.
of Misread
of Misread
To read amiss; to misunderstand in reading.
To receive wrongly.
An inaccurate recital.
To recite erroneously.
To reckon wrongly; to miscalculate.
An erroneous computation.
To have an erroneous remembrance of; to suppose erroneously that one recollects.
Erroneous or inaccurate recollection.
To reform wrongly or imperfectly.
Wrong understanding; misconstruction.
To regulate wrongly or imperfectly; to fail to regulate.
To rehearse or quote incorrectly.
To relate inaccurately.
Erroneous relation or narration.
False religion.
To mistake in remembering; not to remember correctly.
To render wrongly; to translate or recite wrongly.
To repeat wrongly; to give a wrong version of.
To report erroneously; to give an incorrect account of.
An erroneous report; a false or incorrect account given.
To represent incorrectly (almost always, unfacorably); to give a false erroneous representation of, either maliciously, ignirantly, or carelessly.
To make an incorrect or untrue representation.
Untrue representation; false or incorrect statement or account; -- usually unfavorable to the thing represented; as, a misrepresentation of a person's motives.
Tending to convey a wrong impression; misrepresenting.
One who misrepresents.
To have in wrong estimation; to repute or estimate erroneously.
To rule badly; to misgovern.
The act, or the result, of misruling.
Disorder; confusion; tumult from insubordination.
Unruly.
of Miss
A title of courtesy prefixed to the name of a girl or a woman who has not been married. See Mistress, 5.
A young unmarried woman or a girl; as, she is a miss of sixteen.
A kept mistress. See Mistress, 4.
In the game of three-card loo, an extra hand, dealt on the table, which may be substituted for the hand dealt to a player.
of Miss
of Miss
To fail of hitting, reaching, getting, finding, seeing, hearing, etc.; as, to miss the mark one shoots at; to miss the train by being late; to miss opportunites of getting knowledge; to miss the point or meaning of something said.
To omit; to fail to have or to do; to get without; to dispense with; -- now seldom applied to persons.
To discover the absence or omission of; to feel the want of; to mourn the loss of; to want.
To fail to hit; to fly wide; to deviate from the true direction.
To fail to obtain, learn, or find; -- with of.
To go wrong; to err.
To be absent, deficient, or wanting.
The act of missing; failure to hit, reach, find, obtain, etc.
Loss; want; felt absence.
Mistake; error; fault.
Harm from mistake.
of Missa
The service or sacrifice of the Mass.
The book containing the service of the Mass for the entire year; a Mass book.
Of or pertaining to the Mass, or to a missal or Mass book.
To say wrongly.
To speak evil of; to slander.
To speak ill.
To seek for wrongly.
To make a false appearance.
To misbecome; to be misbecoming.
Mistletoe.
The mistletoe.
See Mistletoe.
False resemblance or semblance.
To send amiss or incorrectly.
To serve unfaithfully.
To set pr place wrongly.
To shape ill; to give an ill or unnatural from to; to deform.
Having a bad or ugly form.
Sheathed by mistake; wrongly sheathed; sheathed in a wrong place.
To perform Mass.
Capable of being thrown; adapted for hurling or to be projected from the hand, or from any instrument or rngine, so as to strike an object at a distance.
A weapon thrown or projected or intended to be projcted, as a lance, an arrow, or a bullet.
Absent from the place where it was expected to be found; lost; wanting; not present when called or looked for.
With a sense of loss.
The act of sending, or the state of being sent; a being sent or delegated by authority, with certain powers for transacting business; comission.
That with which a messenger or agent is charged; an errand; business or duty on which one is sent; a commission.
Persons sent; any number of persons appointed to perform any service; a delegation; an embassy.
An assotiation or organization of missionaries; a station or residence of missionaries.
An organization for worship and work, dependent on one or more churches.
A course of extraordinary sermons and services at a particular place and time for the special purpose of quickening the faith and zeal participants, and of converting unbelievers.
Dismission; discharge from service.
To send on a mission.
of Missionary
One who is sent on a mission; especially, one sent to propagate religion.
Of or pertaining to missions; as, a missionary meeting; a missionary fund.
A missionary; an envoy; one who conducts a mission. See Mission, n., 6.
A mistress; a wife; -- so used by the illiterate.
Like a miss; prim; affected; sentimental.
To sit badly or imperfectly upon; to misbecome.
Specially sent; intended or prepared to be sent; as, a letter missive.
Missile.
That which is sent; a writing containing a message.
One who is sent; a messenger.
To sound wrongly; to utter or pronounce incorrectly.
To err in speaking.
To utter wrongly.
Wrong speech.
of Misspell
of Misspell
of Misspell
To spell incorrectly.
A wrong spelling.
of Misspend
of Misspend
To spend amiss or for wrong purposes; to aquander; to waste; as, to misspend time or money.
One who misspends.
A spending improperly; a wasting.
imp. & p. p. of Misspend.
To state wrongly; as, to misstate a question in debate.
An incorrect statement.
Having missed stays; -- said of a ship.
A wrong step; an error of conduct.
To take a wrong step; to go astray.
Failure.
Wrong or evil suggestion.
Wrong summation.
To swear falsely.
See Misy.
An affectionate, or contemptuous, form of miss; a young girl; a miss.
Like a miss, or girl.
Visible watery vapor suspended in the atmosphere, at or near the surface of the earth; fog.
Coarse, watery vapor, floating or falling in visible particles, approaching the form of rain; as, Scotch mist.
Hence, anything which dims or darkens, and obscures or intercepts vision.
of Mist
of Mist
To cloud; to cover with mist; to dim.
To rain in very fine drops; as, it mists.
Liable to be mistaken; capable of being misconceived.
of Mistake
of Mistake
of Mistake
To take or choose wrongly.
To take in a wrong sense; to misunderstand misapprehend, or misconceive; as, to mistake a remark; to mistake one's meaning.
To substitute in thought or perception; as, to mistake one person for another.
To have a wrong idea of in respect of character, qualities, etc.; to misjudge.
To err in knowledge, perception, opinion, or judgment; to commit an unintentional error.
An apprehending wrongly; a misconception; a misunderstanding; a fault in opinion or judgment; an unintentional error of conduct.
Misconception, error, which when non-negligent may be ground for rescinding a contract, or for refusing to perform it.
Being in error; judging wrongly; having a wrong opinion or a misconception; as, a mistaken man; he is mistaken.
Erroneous; wrong; as, a mistaken notion.
By mistake.
Erroneousness.
One who mistakes.
An error; a mistake.
Erroneously.
Wrongly taught; as, a mistaught youth.
of Misteach
of Misteach
To teach wrongly; to instruct erroneously.
of Mistell
of Mistell
To tell erroneously.
To temper ill; to disorder; as, to mistemper one's head.
A title of courtesy prefixed to the name of a man or youth. It is usually written in the abbreviated form Mr.
To address or mention by the title Mr.; as, he mistered me in a formal way.
A trade, art, or occupation.
Manner; kind; sort.
Need; necessity.
To be needful or of use.
To call by a wrong name; to miscall.
See Mystery, a trade.
Clouded with, or as with, mist.
To think wrongly.
To have erroneous thoughts or judgment of; to think ill of.
Erroneous thought; mistaken opinion; error.
To thrive poorly; to be not thrifty or prosperous.
To throw wrongly.
Alt. of Mistico
A kind of small sailing vessel used in the Mediterranean. It is rigged partly like a xebec, and partly like a felucca.
To happen or come to pass unfortunately; also, to suffer evil fortune.
Alt. of Mistigri
A variety of the game of poker in which the joker is used, and called mistigris or mistigri.
Mistiness.
With mist; darkly; obscurely.
To time wrongly; not to adapt to the time.
State of being misty.
Mixture.
To call by a wrong title.
To fall in very fine drops, as rain.
A parasitic evergreen plant of Europe (Viscum album), bearing a glutinous fruit. When found upon the oak, where it is rare, it was an object of superstitious regard among the Druids. A bird lime is prepared from its fruit.
The American badger.
imp. & obs. p. p. of Mistake.
A wrong tradition.
To train amiss.
A violent and cold northwest wind experienced in the Mediterranean provinces of France, etc.
To translate erroneously.
Wrong translation.
To carry away or mislead wrongfully, as by passion.
Misstep; misbehavior.
To treat amiss; to abuse.
Wrong treatment.
A woman having power, authority, or ownership; a woman who exercises authority, is chief, etc.; the female head of a family, a school, etc.
A woman well skilled in anything, or having the mastery over it.
A woman regarded with love and devotion; she who has command over one's heart; a beloved object; a sweetheart.
A woman filling the place, but without the rights, of a wife; a concubine; a loose woman with whom one consorts habitually.
A title of courtesy formerly prefixed to the name of a woman, married or unmarried, but now superseded by the contracted forms, Mrs., for a married, and Miss, for an unmarried, woman.
A married woman; a wife.
The old name of the jack at bowls.
To wait upon a mistress; to be courting.
Female rule or dominion.
Ladyship, a style of address; -- with the personal pronoun.
A false or erroneous trial; a trial which has no result.
To mistrust.
To think wrongly.
Want of confidence or trust; suspicion; distrust.
To regard with jealousy or suspicion; to suspect; to doubt the integrity of; to distrust.
To forebode as near, or likely to occur; to surmise.
One who mistrusts.
Having or causing mistrust, suspicions, or forebodings.
With distrust or suspicion.
Having no mistrust or suspicion.
To tune wrongly.
A mingled compound in which different ingredients are contained in a liquid state; a mixture. See Mixture, n., 4.
Sometimes, a liquid medicine containing very active substances, and which can only be administered by drops.
To turn amiss; to pervert.
To instruct amiss.
Accompained with mist; characterized by the presence of mist; obscured by, or overspread with, mist; as, misty weather; misty mountains; a misty atmosphere.
Obscured as if by mist; dim; obscure; clouded; as, misty sight.
of Misunderstand
of Misunderstand
To misconceive; to mistake; to miscomprehend; to take in a wrong sense.
One who misunderstands.
Mistake of the meaning; error; misconception.
Disagreement; difference of opinion; dissension; quarrel.
Measured; -- a direction to perform a passage in strict or measured time.
Bad treatment; abuse.
To treat or use improperly; to use to a bad purpose; to misapply; as, to misuse one's talents.
To abuse; to treat ill.
Wrong use; misapplication; erroneous or improper use.
Violence, or its effects.
Misuse.
One who misuses.
Unlawful use of a right; use in excess of, or varying from, one's right.
To value wrongly or too little; to undervalue.
To vouch falsely.
To wander in a wrong path; to stray; to go astray.
A wrong way.
To wear ill.
To wed improperly.
To ween amiss; to misjudge; to distrust; to be mistaken.
To go wrong; to go astray.
To word wrongly; as, to misword a message, or a sentence.
A word wrongly spoken; a cross word.
Wrong or false worship; mistaken practices in religion.
To worship wrongly.
One who worships wrongly.
To write incorrectly.
Badly wrought.
An impure yellow sulphate of iron; yellow copperas or copiapite.
To yoke improperly.
Mistakenly zealous.
A minute arachnid, of the order Acarina, of which there are many species; as, the cheese mite, sugar mite, harvest mite, etc. See Acarina.
A small coin formerly circulated in England, rated at about a third of a farthing. The name is also applied to a small coin used in Palestine in the time of Christ.
A small weight; one twentieth of a grain.
Anything very small; a minute object; a very little quantity or particle.
Alt. of Mitre
A covering for the head, worn on solemn occasions by church dignitaries. It has been made in many forms, the present form being a lofty cap with two points or peaks.
The surface forming the beveled end or edge of a piece where a miter joint is made; also, a joint formed or a junction effected by two beveled ends or edges; a miter joint.
A sort of base money or coin.
of Mitre
of Mitre
of Mitre
of Mitre
Alt. of Mitre
To place a miter upon; to adorn with a miter.
To match together, as two pieces of molding or brass rule on a line bisecting the angle of junction; to bevel the ends or edges of, for the purpose of matching together at an angle.
Alt. of Mitre
To meet and match together, as two pieces of molding, on a line bisecting the angle of junction.
Any plant of the genus Mitella, -- slender, perennial herbs with a pod slightly resembling a bishop's miter; bishop's cap.
See Mythic.
The sun god of the Persians.
An antidote against poison, or a composition in form of an electuary, supposed to serve either as a remedy or a preservative against poison; an alexipharmic; -- so called from King Mithridates, its reputed inventor.
Of or pertaining to King Mithridates, or to a mithridate.
Admitting of mitigation; that may be mitigated.
Tending to mitigate; mitigating; lentitive.
of Mitigate
of Mitigate
To make less severe, intense, harsh, rigorous, painful, etc.; to soften; to meliorate; to alleviate; to diminish; to lessen; as, to mitigate heat or cold; to mitigate grief.
To make mild and accessible; to mollify; -- applied to persons.
The act of mitigating, or the state of being mitigated; abatement or diminution of anything painful, harsh, severe, afflictive, or calamitous; as, the mitigation of pain, grief, rigor, severity, punishment, or penalty.
Tending to mitigate; alleviating.
One who, or that which, mitigates.
Tending to mitigate or alleviate; mitigative.
A little one; -- used as a term of endearment.
The denser part of the protoplasm of a cell.
See Karyokinesis.
Shot or bits of iron used sometimes in loading cannon.
One who serves a mitrailleuse.
A breech-loading machine gun consisting of a number of barrels fitted together, so arranged that the barrels can be fired simultaneously, or successively, and rapidly.
Pertaining to a miter; resembling a miter; as, the mitral valve between the left auricle and left ventricle of the heart.
See Miter.
Having the form of a miter, or a peaked cap; as, a mitriform calyptra.
A mitten; also, a covering for the wrist and hand and not for the fingers.
A covering for the hand, worn to defend it from cold or injury. It differs from a glove in not having a separate sheath for each finger.
A cover for the wrist and forearm.
Covered with a mitten or mittens.
Sending forth; emitting.
A precept or warrant granted by a justice for committing to prison a party charged with crime; a warrant of commitment to prison.
A writ for removing records from one court to another.
A pigment of a green color, the chief constituent of which is oxide of chromium.
The stormy petrel.
A South American curassow of the genus Mitua.
Having, or abounding with, mites.
of Mix
of Mix
of Mix
To cause a promiscuous interpenetration of the parts of, as of two or more substances with each other, or of one substance with others; to unite or blend into one mass or compound, as by stirring together; to mingle; to blend; as, to mix flour and salt; to mix wines.
To unite with in company; to join; to associate.
To form by mingling; to produce by the stirring together of ingredients; to compound of different parts.
To become united into a compound; to be blended promiscuously together.
To associate; to mingle.
Capable of being mixed.
Formed by mixing; united; mingled; blended. See Mix, v. t. & i.
In a mixed or mingled manner.
A compost heap; a dunghill.
One who, or that which, mixes.
Pairing with several males; -- said of certain fishes of which several males accompany each female during spawning.
The seventh ecclesiastical mode, whose scale commences on G.
Alt. of Mixtilinear
Containing, or consisting of, lines of different kinds, as straight, curved, and the like; as, a mixtilinear angle, that is, an angle contained by a straight line and a curve.
Mixture.
A kind of cement made of mastic, amber, etc., used as a mordant for gold leaf.
With mixture; in a mixed manner; mixedly.
The act of mixing, or the state of being mixed; as, made by a mixture of ingredients.
That which results from mixing different ingredients together; a compound; as, to drink a mixture of molasses and water; -- also, a medley.
An ingredient entering into a mixed mass; an additional ingredient.
A kind of liquid medicine made up of many ingredients; esp., as opposed to solution, a liquid preparation in which the solid ingredients are not completely dissolved.
A mass of two or more ingredients, the particles of which are separable, independent, and uncompounded with each other, no matter how thoroughly and finely commingled; -- contrasted with a compound; thus, gunpowder is a mechanical mixture of carbon, sulphur, and niter.
An organ stop, comprising from two to five ranges of pipes, used only in combination with the foundation and compound stops; -- called also furniture stop. It consists of high harmonics, or overtones, of the ground tone.
A maze or labyrinth.
Hindmost; nearest the stern; as, the mizzen shrouds, sails, etc.
The hindmost of the fore and aft sails of a three-masted vessel; also, the spanker.
The hindmost mast of a three-masted vessel, or of a yawl-rigged vessel.
of Mizzle
of Mizzle
To rain in very fine drops.
To take one's self off; to go.
Mist; fine rain.
A bog or quagmire.
Alt. of Mnemonical
Assisting in memory.
One who instructs in the art of improving or using the memory.
The art of memory; a system of precepts and rules intended to assist the memory; artificial memory.
The goddess of memory and the mother of the Muses.
Mnemonics.
More; -- usually, more in number.
A suffix added to the names of certain numerals or to the numerals themselves, to indicate the number of leaves made by folding a sheet of paper; as, sixteenmo or 16mo; eighteenmo or 18mo. It is taken from the Latin forms similarly used; as, duodecimo, sextodecimo, etc.  A small circle, placed after the number and near its top, is often used for -mo; as, 16¡, 18¡, etc.
Any one of several very large extinct species of wingless birds belonging to Dinornis, and other related genera, of the suborder Dinornithes, found in New Zealand. They are allied to the apteryx and the ostrich. They were probably exterminated by the natives before New Zealand was discovered by Europeans. Some species were much larger than the ostrich.
One of the posterity of Moab, the son of Lot. (Gen. xix. 37.) Also used adjectively.
A female Moabite.
Moabite.
of Moan
of Moan
To make a low prolonged sound of grief or pain, whether articulate or not; to groan softly and continuously.
To emit a sound like moan; -- said of things inanimate; as, the wind moans.
To bewail audibly; to lament.
To afflict; to distress.
A low prolonged sound, articulate or not, indicative of pain or of grief; a low groan.
A low mournful or murmuring sound; -- of things.
Full of moaning; expressing sorrow.
A deep trench around the rampart of a castle or other fortified place, sometimes filled with water; a ditch.
To surround with a moat.
To void the excrement, as a bird; to mute.
A mobcap.
To wrap up in, or cover with, a cowl.
The lower classes of a community; the populace, or the lowest part of it.
A throng; a rabble; esp., an unlawful or riotous assembly; a disorderly crowd.
of Mob
of Mob
To crowd about, as a mob, and attack or annoy; as, to mob a house or a person.
Like a mob; tumultuous; lawless; as, a mobbish act.
A plain cap or headdress for women or girls; especially, one tying under the chin by a very broad band, generally of the same material as the cap itself.
Capable of being moved; not fixed in place or condition; movable.
Characterized by an extreme degree of fluidity; moving or flowing with great freedom; as, benzine and mercury are mobile liquids; -- opposed to viscous, viscoidal, or oily.
Easily moved in feeling, purpose, or direction; excitable; changeable; fickle.
Changing in appearance and expression under the influence of the mind; as, mobile features.
Capable of being moved, aroused, or excited; capable of spontaneous movement.
The mob; the populace.
The quality or state of being mobile; as, the mobility of a liquid, of an army, of the populace, of features, of a muscle.
The mob; the lower classes.
The act of mobilizing.
of Mobilize
of Mobilize
To put in a state of readiness for active service in war, as an army corps.
To wrap the head of in a hood.
See Moebles.
A condition in which the lower classes of a nation control public affairs without respect to law, precedents, or vested rights.
One who favors a form of government in which the unintelligent populace rules without restraint.
Of, or relating to, a mobocracy.
A shoe made of deerskin, or other soft leather, the sole and upper part being one piece. It is the customary shoe worn by the American Indians.
A poisonous snake of the Southern United States. The water moccasin (Ancistrodon piscivorus) is usually found in or near water. Above, it is olive brown, barred with black; beneath, it is brownish yellow, mottled with darker. The upland moccasin is Ancistrodon atrofuscus. They resemble rattlesnakes, but are without rattles.
Covered with, or wearing, a moccasin or moccasins.
A seaport town of Arabia, on the Red Sea.
A variety of coffee brought from Mocha.
An Abyssinian weight, equivalent to a Troy grain.
A bale of raw silk.
Much.
Much.
A large leather flap which covers the saddletree.
of Mock
of Mock
To imitate; to mimic; esp., to mimic in sport, contempt, or derision; to deride by mimicry.
To treat with scorn or contempt; to deride.
To disappoint the hopes of; to deceive; to tantalize; as, to mock expectation.
To make sport contempt or in jest; to speak in a scornful or jeering manner.
An act of ridicule or derision; a scornful or contemptuous act or speech; a sneer; a jibe; a jeer.
Imitation; mimicry.
Imitating reality, but not real; false; counterfeit; assumed; sham.
Such as can be mocked.
A stuff made in imitation of velvet; -- probably the same as mock velvet.
See Mokadour.
Mockery.
The European sedge warbler (Acrocephalus phragmitis).
One who, or that which, mocks; a scorner; a scoffer; a derider.
A deceiver; an impostor.
A mocking bird.
of Mockery
The act of mocking, deriding, and exposing to contempt, by mimicry, by insincere imitation, or by a false show of earnestness; a counterfeit appearance.
Insulting or contemptuous action or speech; contemptuous merriment; derision; ridicule.
Subject of laughter, derision, or sport.
Imitating, esp. in derision, or so as to cause derision; mimicking; derisive.
By way of derision; in a contemptuous or mocking manner.
A butt of sport; an object of derision.
Mock; counterfeit; sham.
See Mickle.
A South American rodent (Cavia rupestris), allied to the Guinea pig, but larger; -- called also rock cavy.
Of or pertaining to a mode or mood; consisting in mode or form only; relating to form; having the form without the essence or reality.
Indicating, or pertaining to, some mode of conceiving existence, or of expressing thought.
One who regards Father, Son, and Spirit as modes of being, and not as persons, thus denying personal distinction in the Trinity.
The quality or state of being modal.
A modal relation or quality; a mode or point of view under which an object presents itself to the mind. According to Kant, the quality of propositions, as assertory, problematical, or apodeictic.
In a modal manner.
Manner of doing or being; method; form; fashion; custom; way; style; as, the mode of speaking; the mode of dressing.
Prevailing popular custom; fashion, especially in the phrase the mode.
Variety; gradation; degree.
Any combination of qualities or relations, considered apart from the substance to which they belong, and treated as entities; more generally, condition, or state of being; manner or form of arrangement or manifestation; form, as opposed to matter.
The form in which the proposition connects the predicate and subject, whether by simple, contingent, or necessary assertion; the form of the syllogism, as determined by the quantity and quality of the constituent proposition; mood.
Same as Mood.
The scale as affected by the various positions in it of the minor intervals; as, the Dorian mode, the Ionic mode, etc., of ancient Greek music.
A kind of silk. See Alamode, n.
A miniature representation of a thing, with the several parts in due proportion; sometimes, a facsimile of the same size.
Something intended to serve, or that may serve, as a pattern of something to be made; a material representation or embodiment of an ideal; sometimes, a drawing; a plan; as, the clay model of a sculpture; the inventor's model of a machine.
Anything which serves, or may serve, as an example for imitation; as, a government formed on the model of the American constitution; a model of eloquence, virtue, or behavior.
That by which a thing is to be measured; standard.
Any copy, or resemblance, more or less exact.
A person who poses as a pattern to an artist.
Suitable to be taken as a model or pattern; as, a model house; a model husband.
of Model
of Model
of Model
of Model
To plan or form after a pattern; to form in model; to form a model or pattern for; to shape; to mold; to fashion; as, to model a house or a government; to model an edifice according to the plan delineated.
To make a copy or a pattern; to design or imitate forms; as, to model in wax.
One who models; hence, a worker in plastic art.
The act or art of making a model from which a work of art is to be executed; the formation of a work of art from some plastic material. Also, in painting, drawing, etc., the expression or indication of solid form.
To model.
A certain crimsonlike color.
Of or pertaining to Modena or its inhabitants.
A native or inhabitant of Modena; the people of Modena.
A mother.
The principal piece of an astrolabe, into which the others are fixed.
To moderate.
Modeate; temperate.
Moderation.
Kept within due bounds; observing reasonable limits; not excessive, extreme, violent, or rigorous; limited; restrained
Limited in quantity; sparing; temperate; frugal; as, moderate in eating or drinking; a moderate table.
Limited in degree of activity, energy, or excitement; reasonable; calm; slow; as, moderate language; moderate endeavors.
Not extreme in opinion, in partisanship, and the like; as, a moderate Calvinist.
Not violent or rigorous; temperate; mild; gentle; as, a moderate winter.
Limited as to degree of progress; as, to travel at moderate speed.
Limited as to the degree in which a quality, principle, or faculty appears; as, an infusion of moderate strength; a man of moderate abilities.
Limited in scope or effects; as, a reformation of a moderate kind.
One of a party in the Church of Scotland in the 18th century, and part of the 19th, professing moderation in matters of church government, in discipline, and in doctrine.
of Moderate
of Moderate
To restrain from excess of any kind; to reduce from a state of violence, intensity, or excess; to keep within bounds; to make temperate; to lessen; to allay; to repress; to temper; to qualify; as, to moderate rage, action, desires, etc.; to moderate heat or wind.
To preside over, direct, or regulate, as a public meeting; as, to moderate a synod.
To become less violent, severe, rigorous, or intense; as, the wind has moderated.
To preside as a moderator.
In a moderate manner or degree; to a moderate extent.
The quality or state of being moderate; temperateness; moderation.
The act of moderating, or of imposing due restraint.
The state or quality of being mmoderate.
Calmness of mind; equanimity; as, to bear adversity with moderation.
The first public examinations for degrees at the University of Oxford; -- usually contracted to mods.
Moderation in doctrines or opinion, especially in politics or religion.
With a moderate degree of quickness; moderately.
One who, or that which, moderates, restrains, or pacifies.
The officer who presides over an assembly to preserve order, propose questions, regulate the proceedings, and declare the votes.
In the University of Oxford, an examiner for moderations; at Cambridge, the superintendant of examinations for degrees; at Dublin, either the first (senior) or second (junior) in rank in an examination for the degree of Bachelor of Arts.
A mechamical arrangement for regulating motion in a machine, or producing equality of effect.
The office of a moderator.
A female moderator.
A female moderator.
Of or pertaining to the present time, or time not long past; late; not ancient or remote in past time; of recent period; as, modern days, ages, or time; modern authors; modern fashions; modern taste; modern practice.
New and common; trite; commonplace.
A person of modern times; -- opposed to ancient.
Modern practice; a thing of recent date; esp., a modern usage or mode of expression.
One who admires the moderns, or their ways and fashions.
Modernness; something modern.
The act of rendering modern in style; the act or process of causing to conform to modern of thinking or acting.
of Modernize
of Modernize
To render modern; to adapt to modern person or things; to cause to conform to recent or present usage or taste.
One who modernizes.
In modern times.
The quality or state of being modern; recentness; novelty.
Restraining within due limits of propriety; not forward, bold, boastful, or presumptious; rather retiring than pushing one's self forward; not obstructive; as, a modest youth; a modest man.
Observing the proprieties of the sex; not unwomanly in act or bearing; free from undue familiarity, indecency, or lewdness; decent in speech and demeanor; -- said of a woman.
Evincing modestly in the actor, author, or speaker; not showing presumption; not excessive or extreme; moderate; as, a modest request; modest joy.
In a modest manner.
The quality or state of being modest; that lowly temper which accompanies a moderate estimate of one's own worth and importance; absence of self-assertion, arrogance, and presumption; humility respecting one's own merit.
Natural delicacy or shame regarding personal charms and the sexual relation; purity of thought and manners; due regard for propriety in speech or action.
Moderateness; smallness; meanness.
A little; a small quantity; a measured simply.
Capability of being modified; state or quality of being modifiable.
Capable of being modified; liable to modification.
Modifiable.
To qualify.
The act of modifying, or the state of being modified; a modified form or condition; state as modified; a change; as, the modification of an opinion, or of a machine; the various modifications of light.
That which modifies or qualifies, as a word or clause.
Tending or serving to modify; modifying.
One who, or that which, modifies.
of Modify
of Modify
To change somewhat the form or qualities of; to alter somewhat; as, to modify a contrivance adapted to some mechanical purpose; to modify the terms of a contract.
To limit or reduce in extent or degree; to moderate; to qualify; to lower.
The enriched block or horizontal bracket generally found under the cornice of the Corinthian and Composite entablature, and sometimes, less ornamented, in the Ionic and other orders; -- so called because of its arrangement at regulated distances.
Shaped like a bushel measure.
of Modiolus
The central column in the osseous cochlea of the ear.
According to the mode, or customary manner; conformed to the fashion; fashionable; hence, conventional; as, a modish dress; a modish feast.
One who follows the fashion.
A female maker of, or dealer in, articles of fashion, especially of the fashionable dress of ladies; a woman who gives direction to the style or mode of dress.
of Modius
A dry measure, containing about a peck.
A tribe of warlike Indians formerly inhabiting Northern California. They are nearly extinct.
Of or pertaining to mode, modulation, module, or modius; as, modular arrangement; modular accent; modular measure.
of Modulate
of Modulate
To form, as sound, to a certain key, or to a certain portion.
To vary or inflect in a natural, customary, or musical manner; as, the organs of speech modulate the voice in reading or speaking.
To pass from one key into another.
The act of modulating, or the state of being modulated; as, the modulation of the voice.
Sound modulated; melody.
A change of key, whether transient, or until the music becomes established in the new key; a shifting of the tonality of a piece, so that the harmonies all center upon a new keynote or tonic; the art of transition out of the original key into one nearly related, and so on, it may be, by successive changes, into a key quite remote. There are also sudden and unprepared modulations.
One who, or that which, modulates.
A model or measure.
The size of some one part, as the diameter of semi-diameter of the base of a shaft, taken as a unit of measure by which the proportions of the other parts of the composition are regulated. Generally, for columns, the semi-diameter is taken, and divided into a certain number of parts, called minutes (see Minute), though often the diameter is taken, and any dimension is said to be so many modules and minutes in height, breadth, or projection.
To model; also, to modulate.
of Modulus
A quantity or coefficient, or constant, which expresses the measure of some specified force, property, or quality, as of elasticity, strength, efficiency, etc.; a parameter.
of Modus
The arrangement of, or mode of expressing, the terms of a contract or conveyance.
A qualification involving the idea of variation or departure from some general rule or form, in the way of either restriction or enlargement, according to the circumstances of the case, as in the will of a donor, an agreement between parties, and the like.
A fixed compensation or equivalent given instead of payment of tithes in kind, expressed in full by the phrase modus decimandi.
Fashionable.
A wry face or mouth; a mow.
To make faces; to mow.
More. See Mo.
Movables; furniture; -- also used in the singular (moeble).
An unguent for the hair.
Rubble masonry.
Belonging to the Moesogoths, a branch of the Goths who settled in Moesia.
The language of the Moesogoths; -- also called Gothic.
To move.
A thin silk stuff made in Caucasia.
A closely fitting knit sleeve; also, a legging of knitted material.
A person of the Mongolian race.
A heavy locomotive for freight traffic, having three pairs of connected driving wheels and a two-wheeled truck.
A kind of millet (Setaria Italica); German millet.
The long silky hair or wool of the Angora goat of Asia Minor; also, a fabric made from this material, or an imitation of such fabric.
Of or pertaining to Mohammed, or the religion and institutions founded by Mohammed.
A follower of Mohammed, the founder of Islamism; one who professes Mohammedanism or Islamism.
Alt. of Mohammedism
The religion, or doctrines and precepts, of Mohammed, contained in the Koran; Islamism.
Alt. of Mohammedize
To make conformable to the principles, or customs and rites, of Mohammedanism.
One of a tribe of Indians who formed part of the Five Nations. They formerly inhabited the valley of the Mohawk River.
One of certain ruffians who infested the streets of London in the time of Addison, and took the name from the Mohawk Indians.
A tribe of Lenni-Lenape Indians who formerly inhabited Western Connecticut and Eastern New York.
A gallinule (Notornis Mantelli) formerly inhabiting New Zealand, but now supposed to be extinct. It was incapable of flight. See Notornis.
See Mohawk.
See Maholi.
A West African gazelle (Gazella mohr), having horns on which are eleven or twelve very prominent rings. It is one of the species which produce bezoar.
A British Indian gold coin, of the value of fifteen silver rupees, or $7.21.
Alt. of Muharram
The first month of the Mohammedan year.
A festival of the Shiah sect of the Mohammedans held during the first ten days of the month Mohurrum.
To toil.
A gold coin of Portugal, valued at about 27s. sterling.
of Moiety
One of two equal parts; a half; as, a moiety of an estate, of goods, or of profits; the moiety of a jury, or of a nation.
An indefinite part; a small part.
of Moil
of Moil
To daub; to make dirty; to soil; to defile.
To soil one's self with severe labor; to work with painful effort; to labor; to toil; to drudge.
A spot; a defilement.
A kind of high shoe anciently worn.
A small flat bastion, raised in the middle of an overlong curtain.
The deity who assigns to every man his lot.
Originally, a fine textile fabric made of the hair of an Asiatic goat; afterwards, any textile fabric to which a watered appearance is given in the process of calendering.
A watered, clouded, or frosted appearance produced upon either textile fabrics or metallic surfaces.
A crystalline or frosted appearance produced by some acids on tin plate; also, the tin plate thus treated.
Moderately wet; damp; humid; not dry; as, a moist atmosphere or air.
Fresh, or new.
To moisten.
of Moisten
of Moisten
To make damp; to wet in a small degree.
To soften by making moist; to make tender.
One who, or that which, moistens.
Full of moisture.
Without moisture; dry.
The quality or state of being moist.
A moderate degree of wetness.
That which moistens or makes damp or wet; exuding fluid; liquid in small quantity.
Without moisture.
Moist.
To perplex; to confuse.
To toil; to labor.
A handkerchief.
A donkey.
A mesh of a net, or of anything resembling a net.
Misty; dark; murky; muggy.
See Sunfish, 1.
Of or pertaining to a mass of matter; -- said of the properties or motions of masses, as distinguished from those of molecules or atoms.
Having power to grind; grinding; as, the molar teeth; also, of or pertaining to the molar teeth.
Any one of the teeth back of the incisors and canines. The molar which replace the deciduous or milk teeth are designated as premolars, and those which are not preceded by deciduous teeth are sometimes called true molars. See Tooth.
Same as 2d Molar.
A soft Tertiary sandstone; -- applied to a rock occurring in Switzerland. See Chart of Geology.
The thick, brown or dark colored, viscid, uncrystallizable sirup which drains from sugar, in the process of manufacture; any thick, viscid, sweet sirup made from vegetable juice or sap, as of the sorghum or maple. See Treacle.
A spot; a blemish; a mole.
Alt. of Mould
Crumbling, soft, friable earth; esp., earth containing the remains or constituents of organic matter, and suited to the growth of plants; soil.
Earthy material; the matter of which anything is formed; composing substance; material.
of Mould
of Mould
of Mould
of Mould
Alt. of Mould
To cover with mold or soil.
Alt. of Mould
A growth of minute fungi of various kinds, esp. those of the great groups Hyphomycetes, and Physomycetes, forming on damp or decaying organic matter.
Alt. of Mould
To cause to become moldy; to cause mold to grow upon.
Alt. of Mould
To become moldy; to be covered or filled, in whole or in part, with a mold.
Alt. of Mould
The matrix, or cavity, in which anything is shaped, and from which it takes its form; also, the body or mass containing the cavity; as, a sand mold; a jelly mold.
That on which, or in accordance with which, anything is modeled or formed; anything which serves to regulate the size, form, etc., as the pattern or templet used by a shipbuilder, carpenter, or mason.
Cast; form; shape; character.
A group of moldings; as, the arch mold of a porch or doorway; the pier mold of a Gothic pier, meaning the whole profile, section, or combination of parts.
A fontanel.
A frame with a wire cloth bottom, on which the pump is drained to form a sheet, in making paper by hand.
Alt. of Mould
To form into a particular shape; to shape; to model; to fashion.
To ornament by molding or carving the material of; as, a molded window jamb.
To knead; as, to mold dough or bread.
To form a mold of, as in sand, in which a casting may be made.
Alt. of Mouldable
Capable of being molded or formed.
Alt. of Mouldboard
A curved plate of iron (originally of wood) back of the share of a plow, which turns over the earth in plowing.
A follow board.
Alt. of Moulder
One who, or that which, molds or forms into shape; specifically (Founding), one skilled in the art of making molds for castings.
of Moulder
of Moulder
of Moulder
of Moulder
Alt. of Moulder
To crumble into small particles; to turn to dust by natural decay; to lose form, or waste away, by a gradual separation of the component particles, without the presence of water; to crumble away.
Alt. of Moulder
To turn to dust; to cause to crumble; to cause to waste away.
Alt. of Mouldery
Covered or filled with mold; consisting of, or resembling, mold.
Alt. of Mouldiness
The state of being moldy.
Alt. of Moulding
The act or process of shaping in or on a mold, or of making molds; the art or occupation of a molder.
Anything cast in a mold, or which appears to be so, as grooved or ornamental bars of wood or metal.
A plane, or curved, narrow surface, either sunk or projecting, used for decoration by means of the lights and shades upon its surface. Moldings vary greatly in pattern, and are generally used in groups, the different members of each group projecting or retreating, one beyond another. See Cable, n., 3, and Crenelated molding, under Crenelate, v. t.
Alt. of Moulding
Used in making a mold or moldings; used in shaping anything according to a pattern.
Alt. of Mouldwarp
See Mole the animal.
Alt. of Mouldy
Overgrown with, or containing, mold; as, moldy cheese or bread.
A spot; a stain; a mark which discolors or disfigures.
A spot, mark, or small permanent protuberance on the human body; esp., a spot which is dark-colored, from which commonly issue one or more hairs.
A mass of fleshy or other more or less solid matter generated in the uterus.
A mound or massive work formed of masonry or large stones, etc., laid in the sea, often extended either in a right line or an arc of a circle before a port which it serves to defend from the violence of the waves, thus protecting ships in a harbor; also, sometimes, the harbor itself.
Any insectivore of the family Talpidae. They have minute eyes and ears, soft fur, and very large and strong fore feet.
A plow of peculiar construction, for forming underground drains.
of Mole
of Mole
To form holes in, as a mole; to burrow; to excavate; as, to mole the earth.
To clear of molehills.
The sunfish (Orthagoriscus, or Mola).
A little elevation of earth made by a mole; a molehill.
The fire god of the Ammonites, to whom human sacrifices were offered; Moloch.
Pertaining to, connected with, produced by, or consisting of, molecules; as, molecular forces; molecular groups of atoms, etc.
The state of consisting of molecules; the state or quality of being molecular.
With molecules; in the manner of molecules.
One of the very small invisible particles of which all matter is supposed to consist.
The smallest part of any substance which possesses the characteristic properties and qualities of that substance, and which can exist alone in a free state.
A group of atoms so united and combined by chemical affinity that they form a complete, integrated whole, being the smallest portion of any particular compound that can exist in a free state; as, a molecule of water consists of two atoms of hydrogen and one of oxygen.  Cf. Atom.
Having eyes like those of the mole; having imperfect sight.
A little hillock of earth thrown up by moles working under ground; hence, a very small hill, or an insignificant obstacle or difficulty.
Alt. of Molendinarious
Resembling the sails of a windmill.
Any fabric having a thick soft shag, like the fur of a mole; esp., a kind of strong twilled fustian.
of Molest
of Molest
To trouble; to disturb; to render uneasy; to interfere with; to vex.
Molestation.
The act of molesting, or the state of being molested; disturbance; annoyance.
One who molests.
Troublesome; vexatious.
Alt. of Molesty
Molestation.
See Moldwarp.
Of great bulk or consequence; very important.
The crossed iron that supports the upper millstone by resting on the spindle; a millrind.
The doctrines of the Molinists, somewhat resembling the tenets of the Arminians.
A follower of the opinions of Molina, a Spanish Jesuit (in respect to grace); an opposer of the Jansenists.
Minor; in the minor mode; as, A moll, that is, A minor.
One of the higher order of Turkish judges; also, a Turkish title of respect for a religious and learned man.
Lower by a semitone; flat; as, E molle, that is, E flat.
An agricultural implement used in Flanders, consisting of a kind of large shovel drawn by a horse and guided by a man.
Any one of several species of large pelagic petrels and fulmars, as Fulmarus glacialis, of the North Atlantic, and several species of Aestrelata, of the Southern Ocean. See Fulmar.
Serving to soften; assuaging; emollient.
Assuagingly.
Capable of being mollified.
The act of mollifying, or the state of being mollified; a softening.
One who, or that which, mollifies.
of Mollify
of Mollify
To soften; to make tender; to reduce the hardness, harshness, or asperity of; to qualify; as, to mollify the ground.
To assuage, as pain or irritation, to appease, as excited feeling or passion; to pacify; to calm.
A little mill.
Having soft hairs; downy.
Unnatural softness of any organ or part.
Softness; effeminacy; weakness.
Same as Mollusk.
One of the grand divisions of the animal kingdom, including the classes Cephalopoda, Gastropoda, PteropodaScaphopoda, and Lamellibranchiata, or Conchifera. These animals have an unsegmented bilateral body, with most of the organs and parts paired, but not repeated longitudinally. Most of them develop a mantle, which incloses either a branchial or a pulmonary cavity. They are generally more or less covered and protected by a calcareous shell, which may be univalve, bivalve, or multivalve.
Of or pertaining to mollusks.
A mollusk; one of the Mollusca.
Resembling the true mollusks; belonging to the Molluscoidea.
One of the Molluscoidea.
Molluscoid.
A division of Invertebrata which includes the classes Brachiopoda and Bryozoa; -- called also Anthoid Mollusca.
Molluscan.
A cutaneous disease characterized by numerous tumors, of various forms, filled with a thick matter; -- so called from the resemblance of the tumors to some molluscous animals.
One of the Mollusca.
Same as Mollemoke.
A pet or colloquial name for Mary.
See Mollemoke.
The fire god of the Ammonites in Canaan, to whom human sacrifices were offered; Molech. Also applied figuratively.
A spiny Australian lizard (Moloch horridus). The horns on the head and numerous spines on the body give it a most formidable appearance.
See Molossus.
Molasses.
A bat of the genus Molossus, as the monk bat.
A foot of three long syllables.
imp. of Melt.
of Moult
of Moult
of Moult
of Moult
Alt. of Moult
To shed or cast the hair, feathers, skin, horns, or the like, as an animal or a bird.
Alt. of Moult
To cast, as the hair, skin, feathers, or the like; to shed.
Alt. of Moult
The act or process of changing the feathers, hair, skin, etc.; molting.
Capable of assuming a molten state; meltable; fusible.
Melted; being in a state of fusion, esp. when the liquid state is produced by a high degree of heat; as, molten iron.
Made by melting and casting the substance or metal of which the thing is formed; as, a molten image.
Much; very; as, molto adagio, very slow.
A fabulous herb of occult power, having a black root and white blossoms, said by Homer to have been given by Hermes to Ulysses to counteract the spells of Circe.
A kind of garlic (Allium Moly) with large yellow flowers; -- called also golden garlic.
A salt of molybdic acid.
See Molybdenite.
A mineral occurring in soft, lead-gray, foliated masses or scales, resembling graphite; sulphide of molybdenum.
See Molybdous.
A rare element of the chromium group, occurring in nature in the minerals molybdenite and wulfenite, and when reduced obtained as a hard, silver-white, difficulty fusible metal. Symbol Mo. Atomic weight 95.9.
Of, pertaining to, or containing, molybdenum; specif., designating those compounds in which the element has a higher valence, as contrasted with molybdous compounds; as, molybdic oxide.
Molybdic ocher.
Of, pertaining to, or containing, molybdenum; specif., designating those compounds in which molybdenum has a lower valence as contrasted with molybdic compounds.
A dull, silent person; a blockhead.
A minute portion of time; a point of time; an instant; as, at thet very moment.
Impulsive power; force; momentum.
Importance, as in influence or effect; consequence; weight or value; consideration.
An essential element; a deciding point, fact, or consideration; an essential or influential circumstance.
An infinitesimal change in a varying quantity; an increment or decrement.
Tendency, or measure of tendency, to produce motion, esp. motion about a fixed point or axis.
Lasting but a moment; brief.
Important; momentous.
Of or pertaining to moment or momentum.
For a moment.
Alt. of Momentany
Momentary.
Every moment; from moment to moment.
The state or quality of being momentary; shortness of duration.
Done in a moment; continuing only a moment; lasting a very short time; as, a momentary pang.
For a moment.
In a moment; every moment; momentarily.
Of moment or consequence; very important; weighty; as, a momentous decision; momentous affairs.
of Momentum
of Momentum
The quantity of motion in a moving body, being always proportioned to the quantity of matter multiplied into the velocity; impetus.
Essential element, or constituent element.
A name given in contempt to strict Calvinists in Switzerland, France, and some parts of Germany, in the early part of the 19th century.
See Mummery.
See Motmot.
The god of mockery and censure.
Same as Mono-.
A small, handsome, long-tailed West American monkey (Cercopithecus mona). The body is dark olive, with a spot of white on the haunches.
Of or pertaining to monks or a monastic life; monastic.
The system and influences of a monastic life; monasticism.
Having one hydrogen atom replaceable by a negative or acid atom or radical; capable of neutralizing a monobasic acid; -- said of bases, and of certain metals.
An ultimate atom, or simple, unextended point; something ultimate and indivisible.
The elementary and indestructible units which were conceived of as endowed with the power to produce all the changes they undergo, and thus determine all physical and spiritual phenomena.
One of the smallest flangellate Infusoria; esp., the species of the genus Monas, and allied genera.
A simple, minute organism; a primary cell, germ, or plastid.
An atom or radical whose valence is one, or which can combine with, be replaced by, or exchanged for, one atom of hydrogen.
The Infusoria.
A Linnaean class of plants having the stamens united into a tube, or ring, by the filaments, as in the Mallow family.
Alt. of Monadelphous
Of or pertaining to the Monadelphia; having the stamens united in one body by the filaments.
Alt. of Monadical
Of, pertaining to, or like, a monad, in any of its senses. See Monad, n.
Having the form of a monad; resembling a monad in having one or more filaments of vibratile protoplasm; as, monadiform young.
The doctrine or theory of monads.
Any Asiatic pheasant of the genus Lophophorus, as the Impeyan pheasant.
An amido compound with only one amido group.
A basic compound containing one amido group; as, methyl amine is a monamine.
One of the Monandria.
A Linnaean class of plants embracing those having but a single stamen.
Same as Monandrous.
Of or pertaining to monandry; practicing monandry as a system of marriage.
Of or pertaining to the monandria; having but one stamen.
The possession by a woman of only one husband at the same time; -- contrasted with polyandry.
Having but one flower; one-flowered.
A sole or supreme ruler; a sovereign; the highest ruler; an emperor, king, queen, prince, or chief.
One superior to all others of the same kind; as, an oak is called the monarch of the forest.
A patron deity or presiding genius.
A very large red and black butterfly (Danais Plexippus); -- called also milkweed butterfly.
Superior to others; preeminent; supreme; ruling.
Pertaining to a monarch; suiting a monarch; sovoreign; regal; imperial.
A female monarch.
Monarchic.
One of a sect in the early Christian church which rejected the doctrine of the Trinity; -- called also patripassian.
Alt. of Monarchical
Of or pertaining to a monarch, or to monarchy.
The principles of, or preference for, monarchy.
An advocate of, or believer in, monarchy.
of Monarchize
of Monarchize
To play the sovereign; to act the monarch.
To rule; to govern.
One who monarchizes; also, a monarchist.
The nickname of a crackbrained Italian who fancied himself an emperor.
of Monarchy
A state or government in which the supreme power is lodged in the hands of a monarch.
A system of government in which the chief ruler is a monarch.
The territory ruled over by a monarch; a kingdom.
A genus of minute flagellate Infusoria of which there are many species, both free and attached. See Illust. under Monad.
Of or pertaining to monastery, or to monastic life.
of Monastery
A house of religious retirement, or of secusion from ordinary temporal concerns, especially for monks; -- more rarely applied to such a house for females.
A monk.
Alt. of Monastical
Of or pertaining to monasteries, or to their occupants, rules, etc., as, monastic institutions or rules.
Secluded from temporal concerns and devoted to religion; recluse.
In a monastic manner.
The monastic life, system, or condition.
A book giving an account of monasteries.
Consisting of, or containing, one atom; as, the molecule of mercury is monatomic.
Having the equivalence or replacing power of an atom of hydrogen; univalent; as, the methyl radical is monatomic.
Having only one axis; developing along a single line or plane; as, monaxial development.
A mineral occurring usually in small isolated crystals, -- a phosphate of the cerium metals.
The second day of the week; the day following Sunday.
The world; a globe as an ensign of royalty.
The moon.
A moan.
Alt. of Monecious
See Monoecian, and Monoecious.
The condition of an ovule having but a single embryo.
One of the Monera.
The lowest division of rhizopods, including those which resemble the amoebas, but are destitute of a nucleus.
Of or pertaining to the Monera.
Of or pertaining to the Monera.
One of the Monera.
of Moneron
of Moneron
One of the Monera.
A germ in that stage of development in which its form is simply that of a non-nucleated mass of protoplasm. It precedes the one-celled germ. So called from its likeness to a moner.
The bark, or a vegetable extract brought in solid cakes from South America and believed to be derived from the bark, of the tree Chrysophyllum glycyphloeum. It is used as an alterative and astringent.
The acrid principle of Monesia, sometimes used as a medicine.
To warn; to admonish; to advise.
Of or pertaining to money, or consisting of money; pecuniary.
A month.
The act or process of converting into money, or of adopting as money; as, the monetization of silver.
To convert into money; to adopt as current money; as, to monetize silver.
of Money
A piece of metal, as gold, silver, copper, etc., coined, or stamped, and issued by the sovereign authority as a medium of exchange in financial transactions between citizens and with government; also, any number of such pieces; coin.
Any written or stamped promise, certificate, or order, as a government note, a bank note, a certificate of deposit, etc., which is payable in standard coined money and is lawfully current in lieu of it; in a comprehensive sense, any currency usually and lawfully employed in buying and selling.
In general, wealth; property; as, he has much money in land, or in stocks; to make, or lose, money.
To supply with money.
A tax paid to the first two Norman kings of England to prevent them from debashing the coin.
Mintage; coinage.
Supplied with money; having money; wealthy; as, moneyey men.
Converted into money; coined.
Consisting in, or composed of, money.
A person who deals in money; banker or broker.
An authorized coiner of money.
Destitute of money; penniless; impecunious.
One who coins or prints money; also, a counterfeiter of money.
One who accumulates money or wealth; specifically, one who makes money-getting his governing motive.
The act or process of making money; the acquisition and accumulation of wealth.
Affording profitable returns; lucrative; as, a money-making business.
Sussessful in gaining money, and devoted to that aim; as, a money-making man.
A trailing plant (Lysimachia Nummularia), with rounded opposite leaves and solitary yellow flowers in their axils.
See Mangcorn.
A trader; a dealer; -- now used chiefly in composition; as, fishmonger, ironmonger, newsmonger.
A small merchant vessel.
To deal in; to make merchandise of; to traffic in; -- used chiefly of discreditable traffic.
One of the Mongols.
Of or pertaining to Mongolia or the Mongols.
Of or pertaining to Mongolia or the Mongols.
One of the Mongols.
See Mongolian.
Resembling a Mongol or the Mongols; having race characteristics, such as color, hair, and features, like those of the Mongols.
Alt. of Mongolians
One of the great races of man, including the greater part of the inhabitants of China, Japan, and the interior of Asia, with branches in Northern Europe and other parts of the world. By some American Indians are considered a branch of the Mongols. In a more restricted sense, the inhabitants of Mongolia and adjacent countries, including the Burats and the Kalmuks.
Alt. of Mongoos
A species of ichneumon (Herpestes griseus), native of India. Applied also to other allied species, as the African banded mongoose (Crossarchus fasciatus).
The progeny resulting from a cross between two breeds, as of domestic animals; anything of mixed breed.
Not of a pure breed.
Of mixed kinds; as, mongrel language.
To cause to be mongrel; to cross breeds, so as to produce mongrels.
See Amongst.
See Moneyed.
A fossil fish.
Joined or constricted, at regular intervals, so as to resemble a string of beads; as, a moniliform root; a moniliform antenna.  See Illust. of Antenna.
Something to preserve memory; a reminder; a monument; hence, a mark; an image; a superscription; a record.
To admonish; to warn. See Admonish.
One who monishes; an admonisher.
Admonition.
That doctrine which refers all phenomena to a single ultimate constituent or agent; -- the opposite of dualism.
See Monogenesis, 1.
A believer in monism.
Of, pertaining to, or involving, monism.
Instruction or advice given by way of caution; an admonition; a warning; a caution.
Information; indication; notice; advice.
A process in the nature of a summons to appear and answer.
An order monishing a party complained against to obey under pain of the law.
Conveying admonition; admonitory.
One who admonishes; one who warns of faults, informs of duty, or gives advice and instruction by way of reproof or caution.
Hence, specifically, a pupil selected to look to the school in the absence of the instructor, to notice the absence or faults of the scholars, or to instruct a division or class.
Any large Old World lizard of the genus Varanus; esp., the Egyptian species (V. Niloticus), which is useful because it devours the eggs and young of the crocodile. It is sometimes five or six feet long.
An ironclad war vessel, very low in the water, and having one or more heavily-armored revolving turrets, carrying heavy guns.
A tool holder, as for a lathe, shaped like a low turret, and capable of being revolved on a vertical pivot so as to bring successively the several tools in holds into proper position for cutting.
Of or pertaining to a monitor or monitors.
Done or performed by a monitor; as, monitorial work; conducted or taught by monitors; as, a monitorial school; monitorial instruction.
In a monitorial manner.
The post or office of a monitor.
Giving admonition; instructing by way of caution; warning.
Admonition; warning; especially, a monition proceeding from an ecclesiastical court, but not addressed to any one person.
Alt. of Monitrix
A female monitor.
A man who retires from the ordinary temporal concerns of the world, and devotes himself to religion; one of a religious community of men inhabiting a monastery, and bound by vows to a life of chastity, obedience, and poverty.
A blotch or spot of ink on a printed page, caused by the ink not being properly distributed. It is distinguished from a friar, or white spot caused by a deficiency of ink.
A piece of tinder made of agaric, used in firing the powder hose or train of a mine.
A South American monkey (Pithecia monachus); also applied to other species, as Cebus xanthocephalus.
The European bullfinch.
of Monkery
The life of monks; monastic life; monastic usage or customs; -- now usually applied by way of reproach.
A collective body of monks.
of Monkey
In the most general sense, any one of the Quadrumana, including apes, baboons, and lemurs.
Any species of Quadrumana, except the lemurs.
Any one of numerous species of Quadrumana (esp. such as have a long tail and prehensile feet) exclusive of apes and baboons.
A term of disapproval, ridicule, or contempt, as for a mischievous child.
The weight or hammer of a pile driver, that is, a very heavy mass of iron, which, being raised on high, falls on the head of the pile, and drives it into the earth; the falling weight of a drop hammer used in forging.
A small trading vessel of the sixteenth century.
To act or treat as a monkey does; to ape; to act in a grotesque or meddlesome manner.
The fruit of the Adansonia digitata; also, the tree. See Adansonia.
See Nepenthes.
The fruit of two South American trees (Lecythis Ollaria, and L. Zabucajo), which have for their fruit large, pot-shaped, woody capsules containing delicious nuts, and opening almost explosively by a circular lid at the top. Vases and pots are made of this capsule.
A lofty coniferous Chilian tree (Araucaria imbricata), the branches of which are so crowded and intertwisted "as to puzzle a monkey to climb." The edible nuts are over an inch long, and are called pi–on by the Chilians.
A short, round iron bar or lever used in naval gunnery.
The angel fish (Squatina).
The angler (Lophius).
A name of certain curious orchids which bear three kinds of flowers formerly referred to three genera, but now ascertained to be sexually different forms of the same genus (Catasetum tridentatum, etc.).
The character or condition of a monk.
Monks, regarded collectively.
Monkish.
Like a monk, or pertaining to monks; monastic; as, monkish manners; monkish dress; monkish solitude.
Like, or suitable to, a monk.
A plant of the genus Aconitum; aconite. See Aconite.
An extra middle seam made at the junction of two breadths of canvas, ordinarily joined by only two rows of stitches.
Alt. of Mon-
A prefix signifying one, single, alone; as, monocarp, monopoly; (Chem.) indicating that a compound contains one atom, radical, or group of that to the name of which it is united; as, monoxide, monosulphide, monatomic, etc.
The black howler of Central America (Mycetes villosus).
Capable of being neutralized by a univalent base or basic radical; having but one acid hydrogen atom to be replaced; -- said of acids; as, acetic, nitric, and hydrochloric acids are monobasic.
Containing one carboxyl group; as, acetic acid is a monocarbonic acid.
Having a single heart, as fishes and amphibians.
An animal having a single heart.
A monocarpic plant.
Consisting of a single carpel, as the fruit of the pea, cherry, and almond.
Alt. of Monocarpous
Bearing fruit but once, and dying after fructification, as beans, maize, mustard, etc.
Having a solitary head; -- said of unbranched composite plants.
A one-horned creature; a unicorn; a sea monster with one horn.
The Unicorn, a constellation situated to the east Orion.
Having a single floral envelope, that is, a calyx without a corolla, or, possibly, in rare cases, a corolla without a calyx.
An instrument for experimenting upon the mathematical relations of musical sounds. It consists of a single string stretched between two bridges, one or both of which are movable, and which stand upon a graduated rule for the purpose of readily changing and measuring the length of the part of the string between them.
Consisting of one color, or presenting rays of light of one color only.
A painting or drawing in a single color; a picture made with a single color.
Made, or done, with a single color; as, a monochromic picture.
The art of painting or drawing in monochrome.
Existing at the same time; contemporaneous.
Having but one cilium.
An eyeglass for one eye.
Having one oblique inclination; -- applied to strata that dip in only one direction from the axis of elevation.
A monoclinal fold.
Having one oblique intersection; -- said of that system of crystallization in which the vertical axis is inclined to one, but at right angles to the other, lateral axis. See Crystallization.
Hermaphrodite, or having both stamens and pistils in every flower.
A group of vertebrates, including the birds and reptiles, or those that have only one occipital condyle; the Sauropsida.
Any monocotyledonous plant.
Monocotyledonous.
A plant with only one cotyledon, or seed lobe.
Having only one cotyledon, seed lobe, or seminal leaf.
Government by a single person; undivided rule.
One who governs alone.
Of, pertaining to, or showing, monocrotism; as, a monocrotic pulse; a pulse of the monocrotic type.
That condition of the pulse in which the pulse curve or sphygmogram shows but a single crest, the dicrotic elevation entirely disappearing.
Having only one eye; with one eye only; as, monocular vision.
Adapted to be used with only one eye at a time; as, a monocular microscope.
A small crustacean with one median eye.
Monocular.
Of or pertaining to a division (Monocystidea) of Gregarinida, in which the body consists of one sac.
Having but one finger or claw.
Alt. of Monodelphian
One of the Monodelphia.
The group that includes all ordinary or placental mammals; the Placentalia. See Mammalia.
Alt. of Monodelphous
Of or pertaining to the Monodelphia.
Alt. of Monodical
Belonging to a monody.
For one voice; monophonic.
Homophonic; -- applied to music in which the melody is confined to one part, instead of being shared by all the parts as in the style called polyphonic.
Dimetric.
A writer of a monody.
Alt. of Monodrame
A drama acted, or intended to be acted, by a single person.
Pertaining to a monodrama.
of Monody
A species of poem of a mournful character, in which a single mourner expresses lamentation; a song for one voice.
Possessing but one capacity or power.
The theory that the various forms of activity in nature are manifestations of the same force.
A Linnaean class of plants, whose stamens and pistils are in distinct flowers in the same plant.
Of or pertaining to the Monoecia; monoecious.
One of the Monoecia.
A monoecious animal, as certain mollusks.
Having the sexes united in one individual, as when male and female flowers grow upon the same individual plant; hermaphrodite; -- opposed to dioecious.
The state or condition of being monoecious.
One of the Monogamia.
A Linnaean order of plants, having solitary flowers with united anthers, as in the genus Lobelia.
Alt. of Monogamic
Pertaining to, or involving, monogamy.
Of or pertaining to the Monogamia; having a simple flower with united anthers.
One who practices or upholds monogamy.
Upholding, or practicing, monogamy.
Same as Monogamian.
Mating with but one of the opposite sex; -- said of birds and mammals.
Single marriage; marriage with but one person, husband or wife, at the same time; -- opposed to polygamy. Also, one marriage only during life; -- opposed to deuterogamy.
State of being paired with a single mate.
Having but a single stomach.
Oneness of origin; esp. (Biol.), development of all beings in the universe from a single cell; -- opposed to polygenesis. Called also monism.
That form of reproduction which requires but one parent, as in reproduction by fission or in the formation of buds, etc., which drop off and form new individuals; asexual reproduction.
The direct development of an embryo, without metamorphosis, into an organism similar to the parent organism; -- opposed to metagenesis.
One in genesis; resulting from one process of formation; -- used of a mountain range.
Relating to, or involving, monogenesis; as, the monogenetic school of physiologists, who admit but one cell as the source of all beings.
Of or pertaining to monogenesis.
Producing only one kind of germs, or young; developing only in one way.
The theory or doctrine that the human races have a common origin, or constitute a single species.
One who maintains that the human races are all of one species; -- opposed to polygenist.
Monogenic.
Of or pertaining to monogenesis; as, monogenous, or asexual, reproduction.
Monogenesis.
The doctrine that the members of the human race have all a common origin.
Having but one brood in a season.
A character or cipher composed of two or more letters interwoven or combined so as to represent a name, or a part of it (usually the initials). Monograms are often used on seals, ornamental pins, rings, buttons, and by painters, engravers, etc., to distinguish their works.
A picture in lines; a sketch.
An arbitrary sign for a word.
See Monogrammic.
Monogrammic.
Of, pertaining to, or resembling, a monogram.
Monogrammic.
A written account or description of a single thing, or class of things; a special treatise on a particular subject of limited range.
A writer of a monograph.
Alt. of Monographical
Of or pertaining to a monograph, or to a monography; as, a monographic writing; a monographic picture.
One who writes a monograph.
Monographic.
Representation by lines without color; an outline drawing.
A monograph.
One of the Monogynia.
A Linnaean order of plants, including those which have only one style or stigma.
Pertaining to the Monogynia; monogynous.
One of the Monogynia.
Of or pertaining to Monogynia; having only one style or stigma.
Marriage with the one woman only.
The state or condition of being monogynous.
Lasting but one day.
Monoecious.
Worship of a single deity.
A single stone, especially one of large size, shaped into a pillar, statue, or monument.
Monolithic.
Of or pertaining to a monolith; consisting of a single stone.
One who soliloquizes; esp., one who monopolizes conversation in company.
A speech uttered by a person alone; soliloquy; also, talk or discourse in company, in the strain of a soliloquy; as, an account in monologue.
A dramatic composition for a single performer.
The habit of soliloquizing, or of monopolizing conversation.
Alt. of Monomachy
A duel; single combat.
One who fights in single combat; a duelist.
A monomaniac.
Derangement of the mind in regard of a single subject only; also, such a concentration of interest upon one particular subject or train of ideas to show mental derangement.
A person affected by monomania.
Alt. of Monomaniacal
Affected with monomania, or partial derangement of intellect; caused by, or resulting from, monomania; as, a monomaniacal delusion.
A monomial.
Composed of solitary parts, as a flower with one sepal, one petal, one stamen, and one pistil.
Having but one joint; -- said of the foot of certain insects.
Consisting of one metal; of or pertaining to monometallism.
The legalized use of one metal only, as gold, or silver, in the standard currency of a country, or as a standard of money values. See Bimetallism.
One who believes in monometallism as opposed to bimetallism, etc.
A rhythmic series, consisting of a single meter.
Same as Isometric.
A single algebraic expression; that is, an expression unconnected with any other by the sign of addition, substraction, equality, or inequality.
Consisting of but a single term or expression.
Alt. of Monomorphous
Having but a single form; retaining the same form throughout the various stages of development; of the same or of an essentially similar type of structure; -- opposed to dimorphic, trimorphic, and polymorphic.
A form of double monster, in which two individuals are united by a common umbilicus.
Alt. of Monomyaria
An order of lamellibranchs having but one muscle for closing the shell, as the oyster.
Alt. of Monomyary
Of or pertaining to the Monomya.
One of the Monomya.
Monomyal.
Alt. of Monoousious
Having but one and the same nature or essence.
Suffering or sensibility in a single organ or function.
Having but one person, or form of existence.
Having only one petal, or the corolla in one piece, or composed of petals cohering so as to form a tube or bowl; gamopetalous.
Having one and the same appearance; having a mutual resemblance.
Single-voiced; having but one part; as, a monophonic composition; -- opposed to polyphonic.
A single uncompounded vowel sound.
A combination of two written vowels pronounced as one; a digraph.
Consisting of, or pertaining to, a monophthong.
Of or pertaining to a single family or stock, or to development from a single common parent form; -- opposed to polyphyletic; as, monophyletic origin.
One-leaved; composed of a single leaf; as, a monophyllous involucre or calyx.
Having but one set of teeth; -- opposed to diphyodont.
One of a sect, in the ancient church, who maintained that the human and divine in Jesus Christ constituted but one composite nature. Also used adjectively.
Of or pertaining to Monophysites, or their doctrines.
A monoplastic element.
That has one form, or retains its primary form, as, a monoplastic element.
Paralysis affecting a single limb.
A suborder of Dipnoi, including the Ceratodus.
One of a fabulous tribe or race of Ethiopians having but one leg and foot.
A monopodium.
Having a monopodium or a single and continuous axis, as a birchen twig or a cornstalk.
of Monopodium
of Monopodium
A single and continuous vegetable axis; -- opposed to sympodium.
A measure of but a single foot.
A monopolist.
One who monopolizes; one who has a monopoly; one who favors monopoly.
Of or pertaining to a monopolist.
A monopolist.
of Monopolize
of Monopolize
To acquire a monopoly of; to have or get the exclusive privilege or means of dealing in, or the exclusive possession of; to engross the whole of; as, to monopolize the coffee trade; to monopolize land.
One who monopolizes.
of Monopoly
The exclusive power, or privilege of selling a commodity; the exclusive power, right, or privilege of dealing in some article, or of trading in some market; sole command of the traffic in anything, however obtained; as, the proprietor of a patented article is given a monopoly of its sale for a limited time; chartered trading companies have sometimes had a monopoly of trade with remote regions; a combination of traders may get a monopoly of a particular product.
Exclusive possession; as, a monopoly of land.
The commodity or other material thing to which the monopoly relates; as, tobacco is a monopoly in France.
An exhibition in which an actor sustains many characters.
The doctrine that there is but one immortal soul or intellect with which all men are endowed.
Round and without a cella; consisting of a single ring of columns supporting a roof; -- said esp. of a temple.
of Monopteron
A circular temple consisting of a roof supported on columns, without a cella.
A noun having only one case.
A noun having only one ending for the oblique cases.
Having but a single stone or kernel.
Belonging to, or affecting, a single organ, or set of organs.
The Marsipobranchiata.
A composition in verse, in which all the lines end with the same rhyme.
Having only one sepal, or the calyx in one piece or composed of the sepals united into one piece; gamosepalous.
A monospermous plant.
Alt. of Monospermous
Having only one seed.
Consisting of one sphere only.
A composition consisting of one verse only.
Arranged in a single row on one side of an axis, as the flowers in grasses of the tribe Chloridae.
A metrical composition consisting of a single strophe.
Having one strophe only; not varied in measure; written in unvaried measure.
A sulphide containing one atom of sulphur, and analogous to a monoxide; -- contrasted with a polysulphide; as, galena is a monosulphide.
See Monosulphide.
Being a monosyllable, or composed of monosyllables; as, a monosyllabic word; a monosyllabic language.
The state of consisting of monosyllables, or having a monosyllabic form; frequent occurrence of monosyllables.
A word of one syllable.
Formed into, or consisting of, monosyllables.
Alt. of Monosymmetrical
Same as Monoclinic.
A single narrative framed from the statements of the four evangelists; a gospel harmony.
A division of Foraminifera including those that have only one chamber.
A foraminifer having but one chamber.
One-chambered.
Formed from one pistil; -- said of fruits.
Having a single loculament.
The doctrine or belief that there is but one God.
One who believes that there is but one God.
Of or pertaining to monotheism.
Alt. of Monothelitism
The doctrine of the Monothelites.
One of an ancient sect who held that Christ had but one will as he had but one nature.  Cf. Monophysite.
Of or pertaining to the Monothelites, or their doctrine.
Bearing fruit but once; monocarpic.
Uniparous; laying a single egg.
Having a distinct cleavage in a single direction only.
A single unvaried tone or sound.
The utterance of successive syllables, words, or sentences, on one unvaried key or line of pitch.
Alt. of Monotonical
Of, pertaining to, or uttered in, a monotone; monotonous.
One who talks in the same strain or on the same subject until weariness is produced.
Uttered in one unvarying tone; continued with dull uniformity; characterized by monotony; without change or variety; wearisome.
A frequent recurrence of the same tone or sound, producing a dull uniformity; absence of variety, as in speaking or singing.
Any irksome sameness, or want of variety.
A subclass of Mammalia, having a cloaca in which the ducts of the urinary, genital, and alimentary systems terminate, as in birds. The female lays eggs like a bird. See Duck mole, under Duck, and Echidna.
Of or pertaining to the Monotremata.
One of the Monotremata.
A kind of intercolumniation in an entablature, in which only one triglyph and two metopes are introduced.
A genus of parasitic or saprophytic plants including the Indian pipe and pine sap. The name alludes to the dropping end of the stem.
Alt. of Monotypic
Having but one type; containing but one representative; as, a monotypic genus, which contains but one species.
Having a valence of one; univalent. See Univalent.
An oxide containing one atom of oxygen in each molecule; as, barium monoxide.
A canoe or boat made from one piece of timber.
Made of one piece of wood.
A division of Radiolaria; -- called also Monocyttaria.
See under Doctrine.
of Monseigneur
My lord; -- a title in France of a person of high birth or rank; as, Monseigneur the Prince, or Monseigneur the Archibishop. It was given, specifically, to the dauphin, before the Revolution of 1789. (Abbrev. Mgr.)
A basic sulphate of iron; -- so named from Monsel, a Frenchman.
An aqueous solution of Monsel's salt, having valuable styptic properties.
of Monsieur
The common title of civility in France in speaking to, or of, a man; Mr. or Sir.
of Monsieur
of Monsieur
The oldest brother of the king of France.
A Frenchman.
of Monsignore
My lord; -- an ecclesiastical dignity bestowed by the pope, entitling the bearer to social and domestic rank at the papal court. (Abbrev. Mgr.)
A wind blowing part of the year from one direction, alternating with a wind from the opposite direction; -- a term applied particularly to periodical winds of the Indian Ocean, which blow from the southwest from the latter part of May to the middle of September, and from the northeast from about the middle of October to the middle of December.
Something of unnatural size, shape, or quality; a prodigy; an enormity; a marvel.
Specifically , an animal or plant departing greatly from the usual type, as by having too many limbs.
Any thing or person of unnatural or excessive ugliness, deformity, wickedness, or cruelty.
Monstrous in size.
To make monstrous.
A transparent pyx, in which the consecrated host is exposed to view.
The act of demonstrating; proof.
of Monstrosity
The state of being monstrous, or out of the common order of nature; that which is monstrous; a monster.
Marvelous; strange.
Having the qualities of a monster; deviating greatly from the natural form or character; abnormal; as, a monstrous birth.
Extraordinary in a way to excite wonder, dislike, apprehension, etc.; -- said of size, appearance, color, sound, etc.; as, a monstrous height; a monstrous ox; a monstrous story.
Extraordinary on account of ugliness, viciousness, or wickedness; hateful; horrible; dreadful.
Abounding in monsters.
Exceedingly; very; very much.
In a monstrous manner; unnaturally; extraordinarily; as, monstrously wicked.
The state or quality of being monstrous, unusual, extraordinary.
Monstrosity.
Monstrous.
Mountain.
A mountain.
Of or pertaining to mountains; consisting of mountains.
A follower of Mintanus, a Phrygian enthusiast of the second century, who claimed that the Holy Spirit, the Paraclete, dwelt in him, and employed him as an instrument for purifying and guiding men in the Christian life.
An upward thrust or blow.
An upright piece in any framework; a mullion or muntin; a stile.
One of certain public pawnbroking establishments which originated in Italy in the 15th century, the object of which was to lend money at a low rate of interest to poor people in need; -- called also mount of piety. The institution has been adopted in other countries, as in Spain and France. See Lombard-house.
A favorite gambling game among Spaniards, played with dice or cards.
An acid elevator, as a tube through which acid is forced to some height in a sulphuric acid manufactory.
See Monteth.
A custom, formerly practiced by the scholars at Eton school, England, of going every third year, on Whittuesday, to a hillock near the Bath road, and exacting money from all passers-by, to support at the university the senior scholar of the school.
An ancient kind of cap worn by horsemen or huntsmen.
Alt. of Monteith
A vessel in which glasses are washed; -- so called from the name of the inventor.
A balloon which ascends by the buoyancy of air heated by a fire; a fire balloon; -- so called from two brothers, Stephen and Joseph Montgolfier, of France, who first constructed and sent up a fire balloon.
One of the twelve portions into which the year is divided; the twelfth part of a year, corresponding nearly to the length of a synodic revolution of the moon, -- whence the name. In popular use, a period of four weeks is often called a month.
That which is a month old, or which lives for a month.
Continued a month, or a performed in a month; as, the monthly revolution of the moon.
Done, happening, payable, published, etc., once a month, or every month; as, a monthly visit; monthly charges; a monthly installment; a monthly magazine.
of Monthly
A publication which appears regularly once a month.
Once a month; in every month; as, the moon changes monthly.
As if under the influence of the moon; in the manner of a lunatic.
A little mount; a hillock; a small elevation or prominence.
Furnished with monticles or little elevations.
See Monticle.
Monticulate.
Resembling a mountain in form.
Produced on a mountain.
A stone used in mounting a horse; a horse block.
A heap of ore; a mass undergoing the process of amalgamation.
See Matross.
That on which anything is mounted; a setting; hence, a saddle horse.
Something which stands, or remains, to keep in remembrance what is past; a memorial.
A building, pillar, stone, or the like, erected to preserve the remembrance of a person, event, action, etc.; as, the Washington monument; the Bunker Hill monument. Also, a tomb, with memorial inscriptions.
A stone or other permanent object, serving to indicate a limit or to mark a boundary.
A saying, deed, or example, worthy of record.
Of, pertaining to, or suitable for, a monument; as, a monumental inscription.
Serving as a monument; memorial; preserving memory.
By way of memorial.
By means of monuments.
Any one of a series of complex nitrogenous substances regarded as derived from one molecule of urea; as, alloxan is a monureid.
See Mo.
of Moo
of Moo
To make the noise of a cow; to low; -- child's word.
The lowing of a cow.
Manner; style; mode; logical form; musical style; manner of action or being. See Mode which is the preferable form).
Manner of conceiving and expressing action or being, as positive, possible, hypothetical, etc., without regard to other accidents, such as time, person, number, etc.; as, the indicative mood; the infinitive mood; the subjunctive mood. Same as Mode.
Temper of mind; temporary state of the mind in regard to passion or feeling; humor; as, a melancholy mood; a suppliant mood.
Mother.
In a moody manner.
The quality or state of being moody; specifically, liability to strange or violent moods.
The governor of a province in Egypt, etc.
Moody.
Moodily.
Subject to varying moods, especially to states of mind which are unamiable or depressed.
Hence: Out of humor; peevish; angry; fretful; also, abstracted and pensive; sad; gloomy; melancholy.
Alt. of Moollah
See Mollah.
Same as Mulley.
The celestial orb which revolves round the earth; the satellite of the earth; a secondary planet, whose light, borrowed from the sun, is reflected to the earth, and serves to dispel the darkness of night. The diameter of the moon is 2,160 miles, its mean distance from the earth is 240,000 miles, and its mass is one eightieth that of the earth. See Lunar month, under Month.
A secondary planet, or satellite, revolving about any member of the solar system; as, the moons of Jupiter or Saturn.
The time occupied by the moon in making one revolution in her orbit; a month.
A crescentlike outwork. See Half-moon.
of Moon
of Moon
To expose to the rays of the moon.
To act if moonstruck; to wander or gaze about in an abstracted manner.
A ray of light from the moon.
Dim-sighted; purblind.
A temporary blindness, or impairment of sight, said to be caused by sleeping in the moonlight; -- sometimes called nyctalopia.
A monster; a false conception; a mass of fleshy matter, generated in the uterus.
A dolt; a stupid fellow.
Culminating, or coming to the meredian, at or about the same time with the moon; -- said of a star or stars, esp. of certain stars selected beforehand, and named in an ephemeris (as the Nautical Almanac), as suitable to be observed in connection with the moon at culmination, for determining terrestrial longitude.
Of or resembling the moon; symbolized by the moon.
One who abstractedly wanders or gazes about, as if moonstruck.
Conduct of one who moons.
A little moon.
A eye affected by the moon; also, a disease in the eye of a horse.
Any species of American fresh-water fishes of the genus Hyodon, esp. H. tergisus of the Great Lakes and adjacent waters.
The cisco.
Having eyes affected by the moon; moonblind; dim-eyed; purblind.
Having a round, full face.
An American marine fish (Vomer setipennis); -- called also bluntnosed shiner, horsefish, and sunfish.
A broad, thin, silvery marine fish (Selene vomer); -- called also lookdown, and silver moonfish.
The mola. See Sunfish, 1.
The oxeye daisy; -- called also moon daisy.
A kind of morning glory (Ipomoea Bona-nox) with large white flowers opening at night.
Same as Mung.
The bright reflection of the moon's light on an expanse of water.
The European goldcrest.
Like the moon; variable.
Being without a moon or moonlight.
The light of the moon.
Occurring during or by moonlight; characterized by moonlight.
A simpleton; a lunatic.
Illumined by the moon.
Same as Moonsail.
The rising of the moon above the horizon; also, the time of its rising.
A sail sometimes carried in light winds, above a skysail.
A climbing plant of the genus Menispermum; -- so called from the crescentlike form of the seeds.
The descent of the moon below the horizon; also, the time when the moon sets.
A Mohammedan professor or teacher of language.
The light of the moon.
Hence, show without substance or reality.
A month.
A preparation of eggs for food.
Moonlight.
A person engaged in illicit distilling; -- so called because the work is largely done at night.
Moonlight.
A nearly pellucid variety of feldspar, showing pearly or opaline reflections from within. It is used as a gem. The best specimens come from Ceylon.
See Moonstruck.
Mentally affected or deranged by the supposed influence of the moon; lunatic.
Produced by the supposed influence of the moon.
Made sick by the supposed influence of the moon, as a human being; made unsuitable for food, as fishes, by such supposed influence.
The herb lunary or honesty. See Honesty.
Any fern of the genus Botrychium, esp. B. Lunaria; -- so named from the crescent-shaped segments of its frond.
Of or pertaining to the moon.
Furnished with a moon; bearing a crescent.
Silly; weakly sentimental.
One of a mixed race inhabiting Morocco, Algeria, Tunis, and Tripoli, chiefly along the coast and in towns.
Any individual of the swarthy races of Africa or Asia which have adopted the Mohammedan religion.
An extensive waste covered with patches of heath, and having a poor, light soil, but sometimes marshy, and abounding in peat; a heath.
A game preserve consisting of moorland.
of Moor
of Moor
To fix or secure, as a vessel, in a particular place by casting anchor, or by fastening with cables or chains; as, the vessel was moored in the stream; they moored the boat to the wharf.
Fig.: To secure, or fix firmly.
To cast anchor; to become fast.
A place for mooring.
A fresh-water alga (Cladophora Aegagropila) which forms a globular mass.
See Moorpan.
A female Moor; a Moorish woman.
The act of confining a ship to a particular place, by means of anchors or fastenings.
That which serves to confine a ship to a place, as anchors, cables, bridles, etc.
The place or condition of a ship thus confined.
Having the characteristics of a moor or heath.
Of or pertaining to Morocco or the Moors; in the style of the Moors.
Land consisting of a moor or moors.
A clayey layer or pan underlying some moors, etc.
A species of English granite, used as a building stone.
A species of cassowary (Casuarius Bennetti) found in New Britain, and noted for its agility in running and leaping. It is smaller and has stouter legs than the common cassowary. Its crest is biloted; the neck and breast are black; the back, rufous mixed with black; and the naked skin of the neck, blue.
Of or pertaining to moors; marshy; fenny; boggy; moorish.
A kind of blue cloth made in India.
A large cervine mammal (Alces machlis, or A. Americanus), native of the Northern United States and Canada. The adult male is about as large as a horse, and has very large, palmate antlers. It closely resembles the European elk, and by many zoologists is considered the same species. See Elk.
The striped maple (Acer Pennsylvanicum).
Leatherwood.
See 1st Mot.
A ring for gauging wooden pins.
of Moot
of Moot
To argue for and against; to debate; to discuss; to propose for discussion.
Specifically: To discuss by way of exercise; to argue for practice; to propound and discuss in a mock court.
To argue or plead in a supposed case.
A meeting for discussion and deliberation; esp., a meeting of the people of a village or district, in Anglo-Saxon times, for the discussion and settlement of matters of common interest; -- usually in composition; as, folk-moot.
A discussion or debate; especially, a discussion of fictitious causes by way of practice.
Subject, or open, to argument or discussion; undecided; debatable; mooted.
Capable of being mooted.
A disputer of a mooted case.
Alt. of Moot-house
A hall for public meetings; a hall of judgment.
A hill of meeting or council; an elevated place in the open air where public assemblies or courts were held by the Saxons; -- called, in Scotland, mute-hill.
of Mootman
One who argued moot cases in the inns of court.
A made-up face; a grimace.
To make a wry mouth.
An implement for washing floors, or the like, made of a piece of cloth, or a collection of thrums, or coarse yarn, fastened to a handle.
A fair where servants are hired.
The young of any animal; also, a young girl; a moppet.
of Mop
of Mop
To rub or wipe with a mop, or as with a mop; as, to mop a floor; to mop one's face with a handkerchief.
A narrow board nailed against the wall of a room next to the floor; skirting board; baseboard. See Baseboard.
of Mope
of Mope
To be dull and spiritless.
To make spiritless and stupid.
A dull, spiritless person.
Shortsighted; purblind.
Mopish.
Dull; spiritless; dejected.
One of a class of Mohammedans in Malabar.
A rag baby; a puppet made of cloth; hence, also, in fondness, a little girl, or a woman.
A long-haired pet dog.
Alt. of Mopsy
A moppet.
A slatternly, untidy woman.
Shortsighted; mope-eyed.
The long handle of a mop.
A mope; a drone.
A kind of carpet having a short velvety pile.
A game of guessing the number of fingers extended in a quick movement of the hand, -- much played by Italians of the lower classes.
A leguminous tree of Guiana and Trinidad (Dimorphandra excelsa); also, its timber, used in shipbuilding and making furniture.
Delay; esp., culpable delay; postponement.
An accumulation of earth and stones carried forward and deposited by a glacier.
Of or pertaining to a moranie.
Relating to duty or obligation; pertaining to those intentions and actions of which right and wrong, virtue and vice, are predicated, or to the rules by which such intentions and actions ought to be directed; relating to the practice, manners, or conduct of men as social beings in relation to each other, as respects right and wrong, so far as they are properly subject to rules.
Conformed to accepted rules of right; acting in conformity with such rules; virtuous; just; as, a moral man. Used sometimes in distinction from religious; as, a moral rather than a religious life.
Capable of right and wrong action or of being governed by a sense of right; subject to the law of duty.
Acting upon or through one's moral nature or sense of right, or suited to act in such a manner; as, a moral arguments; moral considerations. Sometimes opposed to material and physical; as, moral pressure or support.
Supported by reason or probability; practically sufficient; -- opposed to legal or demonstrable; as, a moral evidence; a moral certainty.
Serving to teach or convey a moral; as, a moral lesson; moral tales.
The doctrine or practice of the duties of life; manner of living as regards right and wrong; conduct; behavior; -- usually in the plural.
The inner meaning or significance of a fable, a narrative, an occurrence, an experience, etc.; the practical lesson which anything is designed or fitted to teach; the doctrine meant to be inculcated by a fiction; a maxim.
A morality play. See Morality, 5.
To moralize.
The moral condition, or the condition in other respects, so far as it is affected by, or dependent upon, moral considerations, such as zeal, spirit, hope, and confidence; mental state, as of a body of men, an army, and the like.
A moralizer.
A maxim or saying embodying a moral truth.
One who moralizes; one who teaches or animadverts upon the duties of life; a writer of essays intended to correct vice and inculcate moral duties.
One who practices moral duties; a person who lives in conformity with moral rules; one of correct deportment and dealings with his fellow-creatures; -- sometimes used in contradistinction to one whose life is controlled by religious motives.
of Morality
The relation of conformity or nonconformity to the moral standard or rule; quality of an intention, a character, an action, a principle, or a sentiment, when tried by the standard of right.
The quality of an action which renders it good; the conformity of an act to the accepted standard of right.
The doctrines or rules of moral duties, or the duties of men in their social character; ethics.
The practice of the moral duties; rectitude of life; conformity to the standard of right; virtue; as, we often admire the politeness of men whose morality we question.
A kind of allegorical play, so termed because it consisted of discourses in praise of morality between actors representing such characters as Charity, Faith, Death, Vice, etc. Such plays were occasionally exhibited as late as the reign of Henry VIII.
Intent; meaning; moral.
The act of moralizing; moral reflections or discourse.
Explanation in a moral sense.
of Moralize
of Moralize
To apply to a moral purpose; to explain in a moral sense; to draw a moral from.
To furnish with moral lessons, teachings, or examples; to lend a moral to.
To render moral; to correct the morals of.
To give a moral quality to; to affect the moral quality of, either for better or worse.
To make moral reflections; to regard acts and events as involving a moral.
One who moralizes.
In a moral or ethical sense; according to the rules of morality.
According to moral rules; virtuously.
In moral qualities; in disposition and character; as, one who physically and morally endures hardships.
In a manner calculated to serve as the basis of action; according to the usual course of things and human judgment; according to reason and probability.
A tract of soft, wet ground; a marsh; a fen.
Marshy; fenny.
A salt of moric acid.
A delaying tarrying; delay.
Of or pertaining to Moravia, or to the United Brethren. See Moravian, n.
One of a religious sect called the United Brethren (an offshoot of the Hussites in Bohemia), which formed a separate church of Moravia, a northern district of Austria, about the middle of the 15th century. After being nearly extirpated by persecution, the society, under the name of The Renewed Church of the United Brethren, was reestablished in 1722-35 on the estates of Count Zinzendorf in Saxony. Called also Herrnhuter.
The religious system of the Moravians.
A muraena.
Not sound and healthful; induced by a diseased or abnormal condition; diseased; sickly; as, morbid humors; a morbid constitution; a morbid state of the juices of a plant.
Of or pertaining to disease or diseased parts; as, morbid anatomy.
Delicacy or softness in the representation of flesh.
A term used as a direction in execution, signifying, with extreme delicacy.
The quality or state of being morbid.
Morbid quality; disease; sickness.
Amount of disease; sick rate.
In a morbid manner.
The quality or state of being morbid; morbidity.
Alt. of Morbifical
Causing disease; generating a sickly state; as, a morbific matter.
Pertaining to the measles; partaking of the nature of measels, or resembling the eruptions of that disease; measly.
Proceeding from disease; morbid; unhealthy.
A diseased state; unhealthiness.
A bit; a morsel.
Biting; given to biting; hence, figuratively, sarcastic; severe; scathing.
The quality of being mordacious; biting severity, or sarcastic quality.
Biting; caustic; sarcastic; keen; severe.
Serving to fix colors.
Any corroding substance used in etching.
Any substance, as alum or copperas, which, having a twofold attraction for organic fibers and coloring matter, serves as a bond of union, and thus gives fixity to, or bites in, the dyes.
Any sticky matter by which the gold leaf is made to adhere.
of Mordant
of Mordant
To subject to the action of, or imbue with, a mordant; as, to mordant goods for dyeing.
In the manner of a mordant.
An embellishment resembling a trill.
A biting quality; corrosiveness.
Biting; acrid; as, the mordicant quality of a body.
The act of biting or corroding; corrosion.
Biting; corrosive.
A hill.
A root.
Greater; superior; increased
Greater in quality, amount, degree, quality, and the like; with the singular.
Greater in number; exceeding in numbers; -- with the plural.
Additional; other; as, he wept because there were no more words to conquer.
A greater quantity, amount, or number; that which exceeds or surpasses in any way what it is compared with.
That which is in addition; something other and further; an additional or greater amount.
In a greater quantity; in or to a greater extent or degree.
With a verb or participle.
With an adjective or adverb (instead of the suffix -er) to form the comparative degree; as, more durable; more active; more sweetly.
In addition; further; besides; again.
To make more; to increase.
A thick woolen fabric, watered or with embossed figures; -- used in upholstery, for curtains, etc.
An edible fungus (Morchella esculenta), the upper part of which is covered with a reticulated and pitted hymenium. It is used as food, and for flavoring sauces.
Nightshade; -- so called from its blackish purple berries.
A kind of cherry. See Morello.
Moorland.
Nightshade. See 2d Morel.
A kind of nearly black cherry with dark red flesh and juice, -- used chiefly for preserving.
Dying; a gradual decrescendo at the end of a strain or cadence.
Greatness.
Beyond what has been said; further; besides; in addition; furthermore; also; likewise.
The Australian crested goatsucker (Aegotheles Novae-Hollandiae). Also applied to other allied birds, as Podargus Cuveiri.
Moresque.
Of or pertaining to, or in the manner or style of, the Moors; Moorish.
The Moresque style of architecture or decoration. See Moorish architecture, under Moorish.
Pertaining to, in the manner of, or designating, a kind of marriage, called also left-handed marriage, between a man of superior rank and a woman of inferior, in which it is stipulated that neither the latter nor her children shall enjoy the rank or inherit the possessions of her husband.
The European small-spotted dogfish, or houndfish. See the Note under Houndfish.
A sword.
A place where the bodies of persons found dead are exposed, that they may be identified, or claimed by their friends; a deadhouse.
Idiocy; imbecility; fatuity; foolishness.
A Moor.
In a dying state; dying; at the point of death.
A dying person.
Pertaining to, or derived from, fustic (see Morin); as, moric acid.
See Morisco.
Obedient.
Obsequiousness; obedience.
Obedient; obsequious.
An edible fungus. Same as 1st Morel.
A yellow crystalline substance of acid properties extracted from fustic (Maclura tinctoria, formerly called Morus tinctoria); -- called also moric acid.
A genus of rubiaceous trees and shrubs, mostly East Indian, many species of which yield valuable red and yellow dyes. The wood is hard and beautiful, and used for gunstocks.
A yellow dyestuff extracted from the root bark of an East Indian plant (Morinda citrifolia).
The dotterel.
A genus of trees of Southern India and Northern Africa. One species (Moringa pterygosperma) is the horse-radish tree, and its seeds, as well as those of M. aptera, are known in commerce as ben or ben nuts, and yield the oil called oil of ben.
Designating an organic acid obtained from oil of ben. See Moringa.
Pertaining to, or designating, a variety of tannic acid extracted from fustic (Maclura, formerly Morus, tinctoria) as a yellow crystalline substance; -- called also maclurin.
A kind of open helmet, without visor or beaver, and somewhat resembling a hat.
A dark variety of smoky quartz.
The restoration of lost parts of the body.
Moresque.
A thing of Moorish origin; as: (a) The Moorish language. (b) A Moorish dance, now called morris dance. Marston. (c) One who dances the Moorish dance. Shak. (d) Moresque decoration or architecture.
Same as Morisco.
A beast that has died of disease or by mischance.
Moorland.
Mortling.
A bad sore; a gangrene; a cancer.
A bugbear; false terror.
A genus of sea birds, having a large, thick bill; the puffin.
The mandrill.
One of a sect in the United States, followers of Joseph Smith, who professed to have found an addition to the Bible, engraved on golden plates, called the Book of Mormon, first published in 1830. The Mormons believe in polygamy, and their hierarchy of apostles, etc., has control of civil and religious matters.
Of or pertaining to the Mormons; as, the Mormon religion; Mormon practices.
The country inhabited by the Mormons; the Mormon people.
The doctrine, system, and practices of the Mormons.
A Mormon.
Mormon.
The first part of the day; the morning; -- used chiefly in poetry.
Of or pertaining to the morn; morning.
A ring fitted upon the head of a lance to prevent wounding an adversary in tilting.
Without teeth, tongue, or claws; -- said of a lion represented heraldically.
The first or early part of the day, variously understood as the earliest hours of light, the time near sunrise; the time from midnight to noon, from rising to noon, etc.
The first or early part; as, the morning of life.
The goddess Aurora.
Pertaining to the first part or early part of the day; being in the early part of the day; as, morning dew; morning light; morning service.
A climbing plant (Ipomoea purpurea) having handsome, funnel-shaped flowers, usually red, pink, purple, white, or variegated, sometimes pale blue. See Dextrorsal.
Morning time.
Towards the morn.
A small abscess or tumor having a resemblance to a mulberry.
Of or pertaining to Morocco, or its inhabitants.
A fine kind of leather, prepared commonly from goatskin (though an inferior kind is made of sheepskin), and tanned with sumac and dyed of various colors; -- said to have been first made by the Moors.
Foolish talk; nonsense; folly.
Maroon; the color of an unripe black mulberry.
An extinct genus of large herbivorous dinosaurs, found in Jurassic strata in America.
Of a sour temper; sullen and austere; ill-humored; severe.
Lascivious; brooding over evil thoughts.
Sourly; with sullen austerity.
Sourness of temper; sulenness.
Idiocy; fatuity; stupidity.
Moroseness.
A philosophical or learned fool.
Morose.
A variety of apatite of a greenish blue color.
A morate.
Of, pertaining to, or derived from, the mulberry; moric.
Of or relating to Morpheus, to dreams, or to sleep.
The god of dreams.
A scurfy eruption.
To cover with a morphew.
Morphine.
A bitter white crystalline alkaloid found in opium, possessing strong narcotic properties, and much used as an anodyne; -- called also morphia, and morphina.
A morbid condition produced by the excessive or prolonged use of morphine.
Any one of numerous species of large, handsome, tropical American butterflies, of the genus Morpho. They are noted for the very brilliant metallic luster and bright colors (often blue) of the upper surface of the wings. The lower surface is usually brown or gray, with eyelike spots.
History of the evolution of forms; that part of ontogeny that deals with the germ history of forms; -- distinguished from physiogeny.
Alt. of Morphological
Of, pertaining to, or according to, the principles of morphology.
One who is versed in the science of morphology.
That branch of biology which deals with the structure of animals and plants, treating of the forms of organs and describing their varieties, homologies, and metamorphoses. See Tectology, and Promorphology.
A morphological individual, characterized by definiteness of form bion, a physiological individual. See Tectology.
The laws of organic formation.
The tribal history of forms; that part of phylogeny which treats of the tribal history of forms, in distinction from the tribal history of functions.
The order or mode of development of an organ or part.
Connected with, or becoming an integral part of, a living unit or of the morphological framework; as, morphotic, or tissue, proteids.
A combining form denoting form, shape; as, isomorphous.
A louse.
Same as 1st Morris.
Dancing the morrice; dancing.
A morris dancer.
See Mormal.
A Moorish dance, usually performed by a single dancer, who accompanies the dance with castanets.
A dance formerly common in England, often performed in pagenats, processions, and May games. The dancers, grotesquely dressed and ornamented, took the parts of Robin Hood, Maidmarian, and other fictious characters.
An old game played with counters, or men, which are placed angles of a figure drawn on a board or on the ground; also, the board or ground on which the game is played.
A marine fish having a very slender, flat, transparent body. It is now generally believed to be the young of the conger eel or some allied fish.
A Moorish pike.
See Marrot.
Morning.
The next following day; the day subsequent to any day specified or understood.
The day following the present; to-morrow.
The walrus. See Walrus.
A clasp for fastening garments in front.
A telegraphic alphabet in very general use, inventing by Samuel F.B.Morse, the inventor of Morse's telegraph. The letters are represented by dots and dashes impressed or printed on paper, as, .- (A), - . . . (B), -.. (D), . (E), .. (O), . . . (R), -- (T), etc., or by sounds, flashes of light, etc., with greater or less intervals between them.
A little bite or bit of food.
A small quantity; a little piece; a fragment.
A horn or flask for holding powder, as for priming.
The act of biting or gnawing.
The act of biting.
A great quantity or number.
A woman; a female.
A salmon in its third year.
Death; esp., the death of game in the chase.
A note or series of notes sounded on a horn at the death of game.
The skin of a sheep or lamb that has died of disease.
Subject to death; destined to die; as, man is mortal.
Destructive to life; causing or occasioning death; terminating life; exposing to or deserving death; deadly; as, a mortal wound; a mortal sin.
Fatally vulnerable; vital.
Of or pertaining to the time of death.
Affecting as if with power to kill; deathly.
Human; belonging to man, who is mortal; as, mortal wit or knowledge; mortal power.
Very painful or tedious; wearisome; as, a sermon lasting two mortal hours.
A being subject to death; a human being; man.
The condition or quality of being mortal; subjection to death or to the necessity of dying.
Human life; the life of a mortal being.
Those who are, or that which is, mortal; the human cace; humanity; human nature.
Death; destruction.
The whole sum or number of deaths in a given time or a given community; also, the proportion of deaths to population, or to a specific number of the population; death rate; as, a time of great, or low, mortality; the mortality among the settlers was alarming.
of Mortalize
of Mortalize
To make mortal.
In a mortal manner; so as to cause death; as, mortally wounded.
In the manner of a mortal or of mortal beings.
In an extreme degree; to the point of dying or causing death; desperately; as, mortally jealous.
Quality of being mortal; mortality.
A strong vessel, commonly in form of an inverted bell, in which substances are pounded or rubbed with a pestle.
A short piece of ordnance, used for throwing bombs, carcasses, shells, etc., at high angles of elevation, as 45¡, and even higher; -- so named from its resemblance in shape to the utensil above described.
A building material made by mixing lime, cement, or plaster of Paris, with sand, water, and sometimes other materials; -- used in masonry for joining stones, bricks, etc., also for plastering, and in other ways.
To plaster or make fast with mortar.
A chamber lamp or light.
A conveyance of property, upon condition, as security for the payment of a debt or the preformance of a duty, and to become void upon payment or performance according to the stipulated terms; also, the written instrument by which the conveyance is made.
State of being pledged; as, lands given in mortgage.
of Mortgage
of Mortgage
To grant or convey, as property, for the security of a debt, or other engagement, upon a condition that if the debt or engagement shall be discharged according to the contract, the conveyance shall be void, otherwise to become absolute, subject, however, to the right of redemption.
Hence: To pledge, either literally or figuratively; to make subject to a claim or obligation.
The person to whom property is mortgaged, or to whom a mortgage is made or given.
Alt. of Mortgagor
One who gives a mortgage.
gives a mortgage.
Bringing or producing death; deadly; destructive; as, a mortiferous herb.
The act of mortifying, or the condition of being mortified
The death of one part of an animal body, while the rest continues to live; loss of vitality in some part of a living animal; gangrene.
Destruction of active qualities; neutralization.
Subjection of the passions and appetites, by penance, absistence, or painful severities inflicted on the body.
Hence: Deprivation or depression of self-approval; abatement or pride; humiliation; chagrin; vexation.
That which mortifies; the cause of humiliation, chagrin, or vexation.
A gift to some charitable or religious institution; -- nearly synonymous with mortmain.
imp. & p. p. of Mortify.
The state of being mortified; humiliation; subjection of the passions.
One who, or that which, mortifies.
of Mortify
of Mortify
To destroy the organic texture and vital functions of; to produce gangrene in.
To destroy the active powers or essential qualities of; to change by chemical action.
To deaden by religious or other discipline, as the carnal affections, bodily appetites, or worldly desires; to bring into subjection; to abase; to humble.
To affect with vexation, chagrin, or humiliation; to humble; to depress.
To lose vitality and organic structure, as flesh of a living body; to gangrene.
To practice penance from religious motives; to deaden desires by religious discipline.
To be subdued; to decay, as appetites, desires, etc.
Tending to mortify; affected by, or having symptoms of, mortification; as, a mortifying wound; mortifying flesh.
Subduing the appetites, desires, etc.; as, mortifying penances.
Tending to humble or abase; humiliating; as, a mortifying repulse.
In a mortifying manner.
A cavity cut into a piece of timber, or other material, to receive something (as the end of another piece) made to fit it, and called a tenon.
of Mortise
of Mortise
To cut or make a mortisein.
To join or fasten by a tenon and mortise; as, to mortise a beam into a post, or a joist into a girder.
An animal, as a sheep, dead of disease or privation; a mortling.
Wool plucked from a dead sheep; morling.
Possession of lands or tenements in, or conveyance to, dead hands, or hands that cannot alienate.
See Mormal.
Dead pay; the crime of taking pay for the service of dead soldiers, or for services not actually rendered by soldiers.
Alt. of Mortrew
A dish of meats and other ingredients, cooked together; an ollapodrida.
of Mortuary
A sort of ecclesiastical heriot, a customary gift claimed by, and due to, the minister of a parish on the death of a parishioner. It seems to have been originally a voluntary bequest or donation, intended to make amends for any failure in the payment of tithes of which the deceased had been guilty.
A burial place; a place for the dead.
A place for the reception of the dead before burial; a deadhouse; a morgue.
Of or pertaining to the dead; as, mortuary monuments.
of Morula
The sphere or globular mass of cells (blastomeres), formed by the clevage of the ovum or egg in the first stages of its development; -- called also mulberry mass, segmentation sphere, and blastosphere. See Segmentation.
The process of cleavage, or segmentation, of the ovum, by which a morula is formed.
A genus of trees, some species of which produce edible fruit; the mulberry. See Mulberry.
See Morrow.
Morning.
A surface decoration made by inlaying in patterns small pieces of variously colored glass, stone, or other material; -- called also mosaic work.
A picture or design made in mosaic; an article decorated in mosaic.
Of or pertaining to the style of work called mosaic; formed by uniting pieces of different colors; variegated; tessellated; also, composed of various materials or ingredients.
Of or pertaining to Moses, the leader of the Israelites, or established through his agency; as, the Mosaic law, rites, or institutions.
Mosaic (in either sense).
In the manner of a mosaic.
Attachment to the system or doctrines of Moses; that which is peculiar to the Mosaic system or doctrines.
Alt. of Mosasaurian
One of an extinct order of reptiles, including Mosasaurus and allied genera. See Mosasauria.
An order of large, extinct, marine reptiles, found in the Cretaceous rocks, especially in America. They were serpentlike in form and in having loosely articulated and dilatable jaws, with large recurved tteth, but they had paddlelike feet. Some of them were over fifty feet long. They are, essentially, fossil sea serpents with paddles. Called also Pythonomarpha, and Mosasauria.
A genus of extinct marine reptiles allied to the lizards, but having the body much elongated, and the limbs in the form of paddles. The first known species, nearly fifty feet in length, was discovered in Cretaceous beds near Maestricht, in the Netherlands.
A plant of the genus Adoxa (A. moschatellina), the flowers of which are pale green, and have a faint musky smell. It is found in woods in all parts of Europe, and is called also hollow root and musk crowfoot.
Of or pertaining to Moschus, a genus including the musk deer.
See Muzzle.
A light wine, usually white, produced in the vicinity of the river Moselle.
A large flatboat, used in the West Indies for taking freight from shore to ship.
See Mosque.
of Moslem
of Moslem
A Mussulman; an orthodox Mohammedan. [Written also muslim.]
Of or pertaining to the Mohammedans; Mohammedan; as, Moslem lands; the Moslem faith.
Thin shreds of leather shaved off in dressing skins.
Same as Mosasaurus.
A Mohammedan church or place of religious worship.
of Mosquito
Any one of various species of gnats of the genus Culex and allied genera. The females have a proboscis containing, within the sheathlike labium, six fine, sharp, needlelike organs with which they puncture the skin of man and animals to suck the blood. These bites, when numerous, cause, in many persons, considerable irritation and swelling, with some pain. The larvae and pupae, called wigglers, are aquatic.
A cryptogamous plant of a cellular structure, with distinct stem and simple leaves. The fruit is a small capsule usually opening by an apical lid, and so discharging the spores. There are many species, collectively termed Musci, growing on the earth, on rocks, and trunks of trees, etc., and a few in running water.
A bog; a morass; a place containing peat; as, the mosses of the Scottish border.
of Moss
of Moss
To cover or overgrow with moss.
A veteran partisan; one who is so conservative in opinion that he may be likened to a stone or old tree covered with moss.
Alt. of Mossbunker
The menhaded.
Overgrown with moss.
The state of being mossy.
One of a class of marauders or bandits that formerly infested the border country between England and Scotland; -- so called in allusion to the mossy or boggy character of much of the border country.
Overgrown with moss; abounding with or edged with moss; as, mossy trees; mossy streams.
Resembling moss; as, mossy green.
Consisting of the greatest number or quantity; greater in number or quantity than all the rest; nearly all.
Greatest in degree; as, he has the most need of it.
Highest in rank; greatest.
In the greatest or highest degree.
See Mustaiba.
imp. of Mote.
Alt. of Mostick
A painter's maul-stick.
For the greatest part; for the most part; chiefly; in the main.
See Direct, n.
For the most part.
of Mot
of Mot
of Mot
of Mot
of Mot
of Mot
of Mot
of Mot
May; must; might.
A word; hence, a motto; a device.
A pithy or witty saying; a witticism.
A note or brief strain on a bugle.
Any singing bird of the genus Motacilla; a wagtail.
The act of moving; motion.
See 1st Mot.
A meeting of persons for discussion; as, a wardmote in the city of London.
A body of persons who meet for discussion, esp. about the management of affairs; as, a folkmote.
A place of meeting for discussion.
The flourish sounded on a horn by a huntsman. See Mot, n., 3, and Mort.
A small particle, as of floating dust; anything proverbially small; a speck.
Filled with motes, or fine floating dust; as, the air.
A composition adapted to sacred words in the elaborate polyphonic church style; an anthem.
A mote.
of Moth
Any nocturnal lepidopterous insect, or any not included among the butterflies; as, the luna moth; Io moth; hawk moth.
Any lepidopterous insect that feeds upon garments, grain, etc.; as, the clothes moth; grain moth; bee moth. See these terms under Clothes, Grain, etc.
Any one of various other insects that destroy woolen and fur goods, etc., esp. the larvae of several species of beetles of the genera Dermestes and Anthrenus. Carpet moths are often the larvae of Anthrenus. See Carpet beetle, under Carpet, Dermestes, Anthrenus.
Anything which gradually and silently eats, consumes, or wastes any other thing.
To eat or prey upon, as a moth eats a garment.
Full of moths.
A female parent; especially, one of the human race; a woman who has borne a child.
That which has produced or nurtured anything; source of birth or origin; generatrix.
An old woman or matron.
The female superior or head of a religious house, as an abbess, etc.
Hysterical passion; hysteria.
Received by birth or from ancestors; native, natural; as, mother language; also acting the part, or having the place of a mother; producing others; originating.
of Mother
of Mother
To adopt as a son or daughter; to perform the duties of a mother to.
A film or membrane which is developed on the surface of fermented alcoholic liquids, such as vinegar, wine, etc., and acts as a means of conveying the oxygen of the air to the alcohol and other combustible principles of the liquid, thus leading to their oxidation.
To become like, or full of, mother, or thick matter, as vinegar.
Thick, like mother; viscid.
The state of being a mother; the character or office of a mother.
A rural custom in England, of visiting one's parents on Midlent Sunday, -- supposed to have been originally visiting the mother church to make offerings at the high altar.
The mother of one's husband or wife.
The country of one's ancestors; -- same as fatherland.
Destitute of a mother; having lost a mother; as, motherless children.
The state or quality of being motherly.
Of or pertaining to a mother; like, or suitable for, a mother; tender; maternal; as, motherly authority, love, or care.
In a manner of a mother.
Naked as when born.
The hard pearly internal layer of several kinds of shells, esp. of pearl oysters, river mussels, and the abalone shells; nacre. See Pearl.
An aromatic plant (Thymus Serphyllum); -- called also wild thyme.
A labiate herb (Leonurus Cardiaca), of a bitter taste, used popularly in medicine; lion's tail.
The mugwort. See Mugwort.
Consisting of, containing, or resembling, mother (in vinegar).
Infested with moths; moth-eaten.
Motive.
Producing motion.
Having powers of self-motion, though unconscious; as, the motile spores of certain seaweeds.
Producing motion; as, motile powers.
Capability of motion; contractility.
The act, process, or state of changing place or position; movement; the passing of a body from one place or position to another, whether voluntary or involuntary; -- opposed to rest.
Power of, or capacity for, motion.
Direction of movement; course; tendency; as, the motion of the planets is from west to east.
Change in the relative position of the parts of anything; action of a machine with respect to the relative movement of its parts.
Movement of the mind, desires, or passions; mental act, or impulse to any action; internal activity.
A proposal or suggestion looking to action or progress; esp., a formal proposal made in a deliberative assembly; as, a motion to adjourn.
An application made to a court or judge orally in open court. Its object is to obtain an order or rule directing some act to be done in favor of the applicant.
Change of pitch in successive sounds, whether in the same part or in groups of parts.
A puppet show or puppet.
of Motion
of Motion
To make a significant movement or gesture, as with the hand; as, to motion to one to take a seat.
To make proposal; to offer plans.
To direct or invite by a motion, as of the hand or head; as, to motion one to a seat.
To propose; to move.
One who makes a motion; a mover.
A mover.
Without motion; being at rest.
That which moves; a mover.
That which incites to action; anything prompting or exciting to choise, or moving the will; cause; reason; inducement; object.
The theme or subject; a leading phrase or passage which is reproduced and varied through the course of a comor a movement; a short figure, or melodic germ, out of which a whole movement is develpoed. See also Leading motive, under Leading.
That which produces conception, invention, or creation in the mind of the artist in undertaking his subject; the guiding or controlling idea manifested in a work of art, or any part of one.
Causing motion; having power to move, or tending to move; as, a motive argument; motive power.
To prompt or incite by a motive or motives; to move.
Destitute of a motive; not incited by a motive.
The power of moving or producing motion.
The quality of being influenced by motives.
See Motive, n., 3, 4.
Variegated in color; consisting of different colors; dappled; party-colored; as, a motley coat.
Wearing motley or party-colored clothing. See Motley, n., 1.
Composed of different or various parts; heterogeneously made or mixed up; discordantly composite; as, motley style.
A combination of distinct colors; esp., the party-colored cloth, or clothing, worn by the professional fool.
Hence, a jester, a fool.
Having a mind of a jester; foolish.
Any one of several species of long-tailed, passerine birds of the genus Momotus, having a strong serrated beak. In most of the species the two long middle tail feathers are racket-shaped at the tip, when mature. The bird itself is said by some writers to trim them into this shape. They feed on insects, reptiles, and fruit, and are found from Mexico to Brazil. The name is derived from its note.
Movement; manner of movement; particularly, movement with increased rapidity; -- used especially in the phrase con moto, directing to a somewhat quicker movement; as, andante con moto, a little more rapidly than andante, etc.
A small plate covering the armpit in armor of the 14th century and later.
One who, or that which, imparts motion; a source of mechanical power.
A prime mover; a machine by means of which a source of power, as steam, moving water, electricity, etc., is made available for doing mechanical work.
Alt. of Motorial
Alt. of Motorial
Causing or setting up motion; pertaining to organs of motion; -- applied especially in physiology to those nerves or nerve fibers which only convey impressions from a nerve center to muscles, thereby causing motion.
A man who controls a motor.
Of or pertaining to motorpathy.
Kinesiatrics.
A clump of trees in a prairie.
of Mottle
of Mottle
To mark with spots of different color, or shades of color, as if stained; to spot; to maculate.
A mottled appearance.
Marked with spots of different colors; variegated; spotted; as, mottled wood.
of Motto
A sentence, phrase, or word, forming part of an heraldic achievment.
A sentence, phrase, or word, prefixed to an essay, discourse, chapter, canto, or the like, suggestive of its subject matter; a short, suggestive expression of a guiding principle; a maxim.
Bearing or having a motto; as, a mottoed coat or device.
Full of, or consisting of, motes.
A handkerchief.
See Muezzin.
A wild sheep (Ovis musimon), inhabiting the mountains of Sardinia, Corsica, etc. Its horns are very large, with a triangular base and rounded angles. It is supposed by some to be the original of the domestic sheep. Called also musimon or musmon.
Might.
The act of uttering the sound of a mouille letter.
Applied to certain consonants having a "liquid" or softened sound; e.g., in French, l or ll and gn (like the lli in million and ni in minion); in Italian, gl and gn; in Spanish, ll and –; in Portuguese, lh and nh.
Alt. of Mouldy
Alt. of Mouldy
See Mold, Molder, Moldy, etc.
To contract mold; to grow moldy; to mold.
Alt. of Moulinet
The drum upon which the rope is wound in a capstan, crane, or the like.
A machine formerly used for bending a crossbow by winding it up.
In sword and saber exercises, a circular swing of the weapon.
See Molt.
Having molted.
pl. of Mow, may.
To munch.
A ball or globe forming part of the regalia of an emperor or other sovereign. It is encircled with bands, enriched with precious stones, and surmounted with a cross; -- called also globe.
An artificial hill or elevation of earth; a raised bank; an embarkment thrown up for defense; a bulwark; a rampart; also, a natural elevation appearing as if thrown up artificially; a regular and isolated hill, hillock, or knoll.
of Mound
of Mound
To fortify or inclose with a mound.
A mass of earth, or earth and rock, rising considerably above the common surface of the surrounding land; a mountain; a high hill; -- used always instead of mountain, when put before a proper name; as, Mount Washington; otherwise, chiefly in poetry.
A bulwark for offense or defense; a mound.
A bank; a fund.
of Mount
of Mount
To rise on high; to go up; to be upraised or uplifted; to tower aloft; to ascend; -- often with up.
To get up on anything, as a platform or scaffold; especially, to seat one's self on a horse for riding.
To attain in value; to amount.
To get upon; to ascend; to climb.
To place one's self on, as a horse or other animal, or anything that one sits upon; to bestride.
To cause to mount; to put on horseback; to furnish with animals for riding; to furnish with horses.
Hence: To put upon anything that sustains and fits for use, as a gun on a carriage, a map or picture on cloth or paper; to prepare for being worn or otherwise used, as a diamond by setting, or a sword blade by adding the hilt, scabbard, etc.
To raise aloft; to lift on high.
That upon which a person or thing is mounted
A horse.
The cardboard or cloth on which a drawing, photograph, or the like is mounted; a mounting.
Such as can be mounted.
A large mass of earth and rock, rising above the common level of the earth or adjacent land; earth and rock forming an isolated peak or a ridge; an eminence higher than a hill; a mount.
A range, chain, or group of such elevations; as, the White Mountains.
A mountainlike mass; something of great bulk.
Of or pertaining to a mountain or mountains; growing or living on a mountain; found on or peculiar to mountains; among mountains; as, a mountain torrent; mountain pines; mountain goats; mountain air; mountain howitzer.
Like a mountain; mountainous; vast; very great.
An inhabitant of a mountain; one who lives among mountains.
A rude, fierce person.
To lie or act as a mountaineer; to climb mountains.
A mountaineer.
A small mountain.
Full of, or containing, mountains; as, the mountainous country of the Swiss.
Inhabiting mountains.
Large as, or resembling, a mountain; huge; of great bulk; as, a mountainous heap.
The state or quality of being mountainous.
Amount; sum; quantity; extent.
Raised; high.
One who mounts a bench or stage in the market or other public place, boasts of his skill in curing diseases, and vends medicines which he pretends are infalliable remedies; a quack doctor.
Any boastful or false pretender; a charlatan; a quack.
To cheat by boasting and false pretenses; to gull.
To play the mountebank.
The practices of a mountebank; quackery; boastful and vain pretenses.
Like a mountebank or his quackery.
The practices of a mountebank; mountebankery.
Seated or serving on horseback or similarly; as, mounted police; mounted infantry.
Placed on a suitable support, or fixed in a setting; as, a mounted gun; a mounted map; a mounted gem.
Mountance.
One who mounts.
An animal mounted; a monture.
The act of one that mounts.
That by which anything is prepared for use, or set off to advantage; equipment; embellishment; setting; as, the mounting of a sword or diamond.
In an ascending manner.
A small or low mountain.
The rise of a hawk after prey.
of Mourn
of Mourn
To express or to feel grief or sorrow; to grieve; to be sorrowful; to lament; to be in a state of grief or sadness.
To wear the customary garb of a mourner.
To grieve for; to lament; to deplore; to bemoan; to bewail.
To utter in a mournful manner or voice.
The armed or feruled end of a staff; in a sheephook, the end of the staff to which the hook is attached.
One who mourns or is grieved at any misfortune, as the death of a friend.
One who attends a funeral as a hired mourner.
Full of sorrow; expressing, or intended to express, sorrow; mourning; grieving; sad; also, causing sorrow; saddening; grievous; as, a mournful person; mournful looks, tones, loss.
The act of sorrowing or expressing grief; lamentation; sorrow.
Garb, drapery, or emblems indicative of grief, esp. clothing or a badge of somber black.
Grieving; sorrowing; lamenting.
Employed to express sorrow or grief; worn or used as appropriate to the condition of one bereaved or sorrowing; as, mourning garments; a mourning ring; a mourning pin, and the like.
In a mourning manner.
See Murnival.
of Mouse
Any one of numerous species of small rodents belonging to the genus Mus and various related genera of the family Muridae.  The common house mouse (Mus musculus) is found in nearly all countries. The American white-footed, or deer, mouse (Hesperomys leucopus) sometimes lives in houses. See Dormouse, Meadow mouse, under Meadow, and Harvest mouse, under Harvest.
A knob made on a rope with spun yarn or parceling to prevent a running eye from slipping.
Same as 2d Mousing, 2.
A familiar term of endearment.
A dark-colored swelling caused by a blow.
A match used in firing guns or blasting.
of Mouse
of Mouse
To watch for and catch mice.
To watch for or pursue anything in a sly manner; to pry about, on the lookout for something.
To tear, as a cat devours a mouse.
To furnish with a mouse; to secure by means of a mousing. See Mouse, n., 2.
The forget-me-not (Myosotis palustris) and other species of the same genus.
A European species of hawkweed (Hieracium Pilosella).
See Frogfish.
A hole made by a mouse, for passage or abode, as in a wall; hence, a very small hole like that gnawed by a mouse.
A little mouse.
A cat that catches mice.
One who pries about on the lookout for something.
A genus of ranunculaceous plants (Myosurus), in which the prolonged receptacle is covered with imbricating achenes, and so resembles the tail of a mouse.
Diminutive for Mouse.
Impertinently inquisitive; prying; meddlesome.
The act of hunting mice.
A turn or lashing of spun yarn or small stuff, or a metallic clasp or fastening, uniting the point and shank of a hook to prevent its unhooking or straighening out.
A ratchet movement in a loom.
To sport with roughly; to rumple.
Muslin.
Mustache.
Infested with mice; smelling of mice.
The Chinese tree peony (Paeonia Mountan), a shrub with large flowers of various colors.
of Mouth
The opening through which an animal receives food; the aperture between the jaws or between the lips; also, the cavity, containing the tongue and teeth, between the lips and the pharynx; the buccal cavity.
An opening affording entrance or exit; orifice; aperture;
The opening of a vessel by which it is filled or emptied, charged or discharged; as, the mouth of a jar or pitcher; the mouth of the lacteal vessels, etc.
The opening or entrance of any cavity, as a cave, pit, well, or den.
The opening of a piece of ordnance, through which it is discharged.
The opening through which the waters of a river or any stream are discharged.
The entrance into a harbor.
The crosspiece of a bridle bit, which enters the mouth of an animal.
A principal speaker; one who utters the common opinion; a mouthpiece.
Cry; voice.
Speech; language; testimony.
A wry face; a grimace; a mow.
of Mouth
of Mouth
To take into the mouth; to seize or grind with the mouth or teeth; to chew; to devour.
To utter with a voice affectedly big or swelling; to speak in a strained or unnaturally sonorous manner.
To form or cleanse with the mouth; to lick, as a bear her cub.
To make mouths at.
To speak with a full, round, or loud, affected voice; to vociferate; to rant.
To put mouth to mouth; to kiss.
To make grimaces, esp. in ridicule or contempt.
Furnished with a mouth.
Having a mouth of a particular kind; using the mouth, speech, or voice in a particular way; -- used only in composition; as, wide-mouthed; hard-mouthed; foul-mouthed; mealy-mouthed.
One who mouths; an affected speaker.
Having the basal joints of the legs converted into jaws.
of Mouthful
As much as is usually put into the mouth at one time.
Hence, a small quantity.
Destitute of a mouth.
Spoken without sincerity; not heartfelt.
The part of a musical or other instrument to which the mouth is applied in using it; as, the mouthpiece of a bugle, or of a tobacco pipe.
An appendage to an inlet or outlet opening of a pipe or vessel, to direct or facilitate the inflow or outflow of a fluid.
One who delivers the opinion of others or of another; a spokesman; as, the mouthpiece of his party.
Movableness.
Capable of being moved, lifted, carried, drawn, turned, or conveyed, or in any way made to change place or posture; susceptible of motion; not fixed or stationary; as, a movable steam engine.
Changing from one time to another; as, movable feasts, i. e., church festivals, the date of which varies from year to year.
of Movable
An article of wares or goods; a commodity; a piece of property not fixed, or not a part of real estate; generally, in the plural, goods; wares; furniture.
Property not attached to the soil.
The quality or state of being movable; mobility; susceptibility of motion.
In a movable manner or condition.
of Move
of Move
To cause to change place or posture in any manner; to set in motion; to carry, convey, draw, or push from one place to another; to impel; to stir; as, the wind moves a vessel; the horse moves a carriage.
To transfer (a piece or man) from one space or position to another, according to the rules of the game; as, to move a king.
To excite to action by the presentation of motives; to rouse by representation, persuasion, or appeal; to influence.
To arouse the feelings or passions of; especially, to excite to tenderness or compassion; to touch pathetically; to excite, as an emotion.
To propose; to recommend; specifically, to propose formally for consideration and determination, in a deliberative assembly; to submit, as a resolution to be adopted; as, to move to adjourn.
To apply to, as for aid.
To change place or posture; to stir; to go, in any manner, from one place or position to another; as, a ship moves rapidly.
To act; to take action; to stir; to begin to act; as, to move in a matter.
To change residence; to remove, as from one house, town, or state, to another.
To change the place of a piece in accordance with the rules of the game.
The act of moving; a movement.
The act of moving one of the pieces, from one position to another, in the progress of the game.
An act for the attainment of an object; a step in the execution of a plan or purpose.
Motionless; fixed.
The act of moving; change of place or posture; transference, by any means, from one situation to another; natural or appropriate motion; progress; advancement; as, the movement of an army in marching or maneuvering; the movement of a wheel or a machine; the party of movement.
Motion of the mind or feelings; emotion.
Manner or style of moving; as, a slow, or quick, or sudden, movement.
The rhythmical progression, pace, and tempo of a piece.
One of the several strains or pieces, each complete in itself, with its own time and rhythm, which make up a larger work; as, the several movements of a suite or a symphony.
A system of mechanism for transmitting motion of a definite character, or for transforming motion; as, the wheelwork of a watch.
Moving.
That which moves anything.
A person or thing that moves, stirs, or changes place.
A person or thing that imparts motion, or causes change of place; a motor.
One who, or that which, excites, instigates, or causes movement, change, etc.; as, movers of sedition.
A proposer; one who offers a proposition, or recommends anything for consideration or adoption; as, the mover of a resolution in a legislative body.
Changing place or posture; causing motion or action; as, a moving car, or power.
Exciting movement of the mind; adapted to move the sympathies, passions, or affections; touching; pathetic; as, a moving appeal.
The act of changing place or posture; esp., the act of changing one's dwelling place or place of business.
In a moving manner.
The power of moving.
A wry face.
To make mouths.
Same as Mew, a gull.
of Mow
of Mow
of Mow
of Mow
May; can.
of Mow
of Mow
of Mow
of Mow
To cut down, as grass, with a scythe or machine.
To cut the grass from; as, to mow a meadow.
To cut down; to cause to fall in rows or masses, as in mowing grass; -- with down; as, a discharge of grapeshot mows down whole ranks of men.
To cut grass, etc., with a scythe, or with a machine; to cut grass for hay.
A heap or mass of hay or of sheaves of grain stowed in a barn.
The place in a barn where hay or grain in the sheaf is stowed.
To lay, as hay or sheaves of grain, in a heap or mass in a barn; to pile and stow away.
To heat and ferment in the mow, as hay when housed too green.
See 4th Mow.
See 1st & 2d Mow.
One who, or that which, mows; a mowing machine; as, a lawn mower.
The act of one who, or the operation of that which, mows.
Land from which grass is cut; meadow land.
Cut down by mowing, as grass; deprived of grass by mowing; as, a mown field.
A mower.
A soft woolly mass prepared from the young leaves of Artemisia Chinensis, and used as a cautery by burning it on the skin; hence, any substance used in a like manner, as cotton impregnated with niter, amadou.
A plant from which this substance is obtained, esp.  Artemisia Chinensis, and A. moxa.
energy; pep.
courage, determination.
Know-how, expertise.
Mud poured out from volcanoes during eruptions; -- so called in South America.
See Moil, and Moile.
Alt. of Mozarabic
Same as Muzarab, Muzarabic.
Alt. of Mozzetta
A cape, with a small hood; -- worn by the pope and other dignitaries of the Roman Catholic Church.
The customary abbreviation of Mister in writing and printing. See Master, 4.
The customary abbreviation of Mistress when used as a title of courtesy, in writing and printing.
The acid amide of mucic acid, obtained as a white crystalline substance.
A salt of mucic acid.
See Muse, and Muset.
A yellowish white, amorphous, nitrogenous substance found in wheat, rye, etc., and resembling gluten; -- formerly called also mucin.
Great in quantity; long in duration; as, much rain has fallen; much time.
Many in number.
High in rank or position.
A great quantity; a great deal; also, an indefinite quantity; as, you have as much as I.
A thing uncommon, wonderful, or noticeable; something considerable.
To a great degree or extent; greatly; abundantly; far; nearly.
Much.
Greatness; extent.
Nearly; almost; much.
Pertaining to, or derived from, gums and micilaginous substances; specif., denoting an acid obtained by the oxidation of gums, dulcite, etc., as a white crystalline substance isomeric with saccharic acid.
Musty; moldy; slimy; mucous.
Inducing or stimulating the secretion of mucus; blennogenous.
Secreting mucus.
Resembling mucus; having the character or appearance of mucus.
A substance which is formed in mucous epithelial cells, and gives rise to mucin.
Connected with the formation of mucin; resembling mucin.
A gummy or gelatinous substance produced in certain plants by the action of water on the cell wall, as in the seeds of quinces, of flax, etc.
An aqueous solution of gum, or of substances allied to it; as, medicinal mucilage; mucilage for fastening envelopes.
Partaking of the nature of, or resembling, mucilage; moist, soft, and viscid; slimy; ropy; as, a mucilaginous liquid.
Of, pertaining to, or secreting, mucilage; as, the mucilaginous glands.
Soluble in water, but not in alcohol; yielding mucilage; as, mucilaginous gums or plants.
See Mucedin.
An albuminoid substance which is contained in mucus, and gives to the latter secretion its peculiar ropy character. It is found in all the secretions from mucous glands, and also between the fibers of connective tissue, as in tendons. See Illust. of Demilune.
Same as Mucigen.
Secreting, or producing, mucus or mucin.
An insect which feeds on mucus, or the sap of plants, as certain Diptera, of the tribe Mucivora.
abbreviation of Amuck.
Dung in a moist state; manure.
Vegetable mold mixed with earth, as found in low, damp places and swamps.
Anything filthy or vile.
Money; -- in contempt.
Like muck; mucky; also, used in collecting or distributing muck; as, a muck fork.
To manure with muck.
A handkerchief.
A term of reproach for a low or vulgar labor person.
To scrape together, as money, by mean labor or shifts.
A miser; a niggard.
The quality of being mucky.
Much.
A dunghill.
Somewhat mucky; soft, sticky, and dirty; muxy.
A larva or grub that lives in muck or manure; -- applied to the larvae of the tumbledung and allied beetles.
One who scrapes together money by mean labor and devices; a miser.
Filthy with muck; miry; as, a mucky road.
Vile, in a moral sense; sordid.
An enlargement or protrusion of the mucous membrane of the lachrymal passages, or dropsy of the lachrymal sac, dependent upon catarrhal inflammation of the latter.
Resembling mucus.
A salt of muconic acid.
Of, pertaining to, or designating, an organic acid, obtained indirectly from mucic acid, and somewhat resembling itaconic acid.
Having the character or appearance of both mucus and pus.
A genus of minute fungi. The plants consist of slender threads with terminal globular sporangia; mold.
The quality or state of being mucous or slimy; mucousness.
Of, pertaining to, or resembling, mucus; slimy, ropy, or stringy, and lubricous; as, a mucous substance.
Secreting a slimy or mucigenous substance; as, the mucous membrane.
The quality or state of being mucous; sliminess.
A minute abrupt point, as of a leaf; any small, sharp point or process, terminating a larger part or organ.
Alt. of Mucronated
Ending abruptly in a sharp point; abruptly tipped with a short and sharp point; as, a mucronate leaf.
Having, or tipped with, a small point or points.
Slimy; moist, and moderately viscous.
A viscid fluid secreted by mucous membranes, which it serves to moisten and protect. It covers the lining membranes of all the cavities which open externally, such as those of the mouth, nose, lungs, intestinal canal, urinary passages, etc.
Any other animal fluid of a viscid quality, as the synovial fluid, which lubricates the cavities of the joints; -- improperly so used.
A gelatinous or slimy substance found in certain algae and other plants.
Mucin.
Earth and water mixed so as to be soft and adhesive.
To bury in mud.
To make muddy or turbid.
Either one of two asclepiadaceous shrubs (Calotropis gigantea, and C. procera), which furnish a strong and valuable fiber. The acrid milky juice is used medicinally.
A brown, amorphous, bitter substance having a strong emetic action, extracted from the root of the mudar.
In a muddy manner; turbidly; without mixture; cloudily; obscurely; confusedly.
The condition or quality of being muddy; turbidness; foulness caused by mud, dirt, or sediment; as, the muddiness of a stream.
Obscurity or confusion, as in treatment of a subject; intellectual dullness.
of Muddle
of Muddle
To make turbid, or muddy, as water.
To cloud or stupefy; to render stupid with liquor; to intoxicate partially.
To waste or misuse, as one does who is stupid or intoxicated.
To mix confusedly; to confuse; to make a mess of; as, to muddle matters; also, to perplex; to mystify.
To dabble in mud.
To think and act in a confused, aimless way.
A state of being turbid or confused; hence, intellectual cloudiness or dullness.
A stupid person.
One who, or that which, muddles.
Abounding in mud; besmeared or dashed with mud; as, a muddy road or path; muddy boots.
Turbid with mud; as, muddy water.
Consisting of mud or earth; gross; impure.
Confused, as if turbid with mud; cloudy in mind; dull; stupid; also, immethodical; incoherent; vague.
Not clear or bright.
of Muddy
of Muddy
To soil with mud; to dirty; to render turbid.
Fig.: To cloud; to make dull or heavy.
Dull; stupid.
Dull-spirited.
The European loach.
The bowfin.
The South American lipedosiren, and the allied African species (Protopterus annectens). See Lipedosiren.
The mud minnow.
A hole, or hollow place, containing mud, as in a road.
A hole near the bottom, through which the sediment is withdrawn.
Same as Moodir.
The lowest sill of a structure, usually embedded in the soil; the lowest timber of a house; also, that sill or timber of a bridge which is laid at the bottom of the water. See Sill.
A woodcock.
The European bee-eater. See Bee-eater.
A small herbaceous plant growing on muddy shores (Limosella aquatica).
To mew; to molt.
A Mohammedan crier of the hour of prayer.
A soft cover of cylindrical form, usually of fur, worn by women to shield the hands from cold.
A short hollow cylinder surrounding an object, as a pipe.
A blown cylinder of glass which is afterward flattened out to make a sheet.
A stupid fellow; a poor-spirited person.
A failure to hold a ball when once in the hands.
The whitethroat.
of Muff
of Muff
To handle awkwardly; to fumble; to fail to hold, as a ball, in catching it.
A small muff worn over the wrist.
A light, spongy, cylindrical cake, used for breakfast and tea.
A dish for keeping muffins hot.
Stupid; awkward.
The bare end of the nose between the nostrils; -- used esp. of ruminants.
of Muffle
of Muffle
To wrap up in something that conceals or protects; to wrap, as the face and neck, in thick and disguising folds; hence, to conceal or cover the face of; to envelop; to inclose; -- often with up.
To prevent seeing, or hearing, or speaking, by wraps bound about the head; to blindfold; to deafen.
To wrap with something that dulls or deadens the sound of; as, to muffle the strings of a drum, or that part of an oar which rests in the rowlock.
To speak indistinctly, or without clear articulation.
Anything with which another thing, as an oar or drum, is muffled; also, a boxing glove; a muff.
An earthenware compartment or oven, often shaped like a half cylinder, used in furnaces to protect objects heated from the direct action of the fire, as in scorification of ores, cupellation of ore buttons, etc.
A small oven for baking and fixing the colors of painted or printed pottery, without exposing the pottery to the flames of the furnace or kiln.
A pulley block containing several sheaves.
Anything used in muffling; esp., a scarf for protecting the head and neck in cold weather; a tippet.
A cushion for terminating or softening a note made by a stringed instrument with a keyboard.
A kind of mitten or boxing glove, esp. when stuffed.
One who muffles.
See Mouflon.
of Mufti
An official expounder of Mohammedan law.
Citizen's dress when worn by a naval or military officer; -- a term derived from the British service in India.
A kind of earthen or metal drinking cup, with a handle, -- usually cylindrical and without a lip.
The face or mouth.
Sullen; displeased.
The small entrails of a calf or a hog.
The condition or quality of being muggy.
See Muggy.
One of an extinct sect, named after Ludovic Muggleton, an English journeyman tailor, who (about 1657) claimed to be inspired.
Moist; damp; moldy; as, muggy straw.
Warm, damp, and close; as, muggy air, weather.
An alehouse; a pothouse.
A bellowing.
Lowing; bellowing.
A genus of fishes including the gray mullets. See Mullet.
Like or pertaining to the genus Mugil, or family Mugilidae.
A slender European weed (Galium Cruciata); -- called also crossweed.
A somewhat aromatic composite weed (Artemisia vulgaris), at one time used medicinally; -- called also motherwort.
A bolter from the Republican party in the national election of 1884; an Independent.
Alt. of Mugwumpism
The acts and views of the mugwumps.
Alt. of Muhammedan
Mohammedan.
Mohammedanism.
A moor.
A drove of mules.
of Mulatto
The offspring of a negress by a white man, or of a white woman by a negro, -- usually of a brownish yellow complexion.
A female mulatto.
of Mulberry
The berry or fruit of any tree of the genus Morus; also, the tree itself. See Morus.
A dark pure color, like the hue of a black mulberry.
Having a face of a mulberry color, or blotched as if with mulberry stains.
Half-rotten straw, or any like substance strewn on the ground, as over the roots of plants, to protect from heat, drought, etc., and to preserve moisture.
of Mulch
of Mulch
To cover or dress with mulch.
A fine or penalty, esp. a pecuniary punishment or penalty.
A blemish or defect.
of Mulct
of Mulct
To punish for an offense or misdemeanor by imposing a fine or forfeiture, esp. a pecuniary fine; to fine.
Hence, to deprive of; to withhold by way of punishment or discipline.
Alt. of Mulctuary
Imposing a pecuniary penalty; consisting of, or paid as, a fine.
A hybrid animal; specifically, one generated between an ass and a mare, sometimes a horse and a she-ass. See Hinny.
A plant or vegetable produced by impregnating the pistil of one species with the pollen or fecundating dust of another; -- called also hybrid.
A very stubborn person.
A machine, used in factories, for spinning cotton, wool, etc., into yarn or thread and winding it into cops; -- called also jenny and mule-jenny.
See Mule, 4.
One who drives mules.
A fern of the genus Hemionitis.
A stiff, long saw, guided at the ends but not stretched in a gate.
See Mulley.
The state of being a woman or of possessing full womanly powers; womanhood; -- correlate of virility.
Hence: Effeminancy; softness.
A woman.
Lawful issue born in wedlock, in distinction from an elder brother born of the same parents before their marriage; a lawful son.
A woman; a wife; a mother.
In the manner or condition of a mulier; in wedlock; legitimately.
Fond of woman.
A fondness for women.
Condition of being a mulier; position of one born in lawful wedlock.
Like a mule; sullen; stubborn.
A thin, soft kind of muslin.
A promontory; as, the Mull of Cantyre.
A snuffbox made of the small end of a horn.
Dirt; rubbish.
To powder; to pulverize.
To work (over) mentally; to cogitate; to ruminate; -- usually with over; as, to mull over a thought or a problem.
An inferior kind of madder prepared from the smaller roots or the peelings and refuse of the larger.
of Mull
of Mull
To heat, sweeten, and enrich with spices; as, to mull wine.
To dispirit or deaden; to dull or blunt.
Same as Mollah.
An East Indian curry soup.
See Mollah.
A die, cut in intaglio, for stamping an ornament in relief, as upon metal.
Any plant of the genus Verbascum. They are tall herbs having coarse leaves, and large flowers in dense spikes. The common species, with densely woolly leaves, is Verbascum Thapsus.
See Mullein.
One who, or that which, mulls.
A vessel in which wine, etc., is mulled over a fire.
A stone or thick lump of glass, or kind of pestle, flat at the bottom, used for grinding pigments or drugs, etc., upon a slab of similar material.
Of, pertaining to, or discovered by, Johannes Muller.
Any one of numerous fishes of the genus Mugil; -- called also gray mullets. They are found on the coasts of both continents, and are highly esteemed as food. Among the most valuable species are Mugil capito of Europe, and M. cephalus which occurs both on the European and American coasts.
Any species of the genus Mullus, or family Mullidae; called also red mullet, and surmullet, esp. the plain surmullet (Mullus barbatus), and the striped surmullet (M. surmulletus) of Southern Europe. The former is the mullet of the Romans. It is noted for the brilliancy of its colors. See Surmullet.
A star, usually five pointed and pierced; -- when used as a difference it indicates the third son.
Small pinchers for curling the hair.
Alt. of Moolley
A mulley or polled animal.
A cow.
Alt. of Moolley
Destitute of horns, although belonging to a species of animals most of which have horns; hornless; polled; as, mulley cattle; a mulley (or moolley) cow.
See Mullagatawny.
A griping of the intestines; colic.
Hence, sullenness; the sulks.
See Duck mole, under Duck.
A slender bar or pier which forms the division between the lights of windows, screens, etc.
An upright member of a framing. See Stile.
To furnish with mullions; to divide by mullions.
Rubbish; refuse; dirt.
Like or pertaining to the genus Mullus, which includes the surmullet, or red mullet.
A fine, soft muslin; mull.
Wine boiled and mingled with honey.
See Multi-.
Having many angles.
Many-minded; many-sided.
Having many articulations or joints.
Multiplicity.
Alt. of Mult-
A prefix signifying much or many; several; more than one; as, multiaxial, multocular.
Having more than one axis; developing in more than a single line or plain; -- opposed to monoaxial.
Having many, or several, capsules.
Many-keeled.
Having many cavities.
Consisting of, or having, many cells or more than one cell.
Having many, or several, centers; as, a multicentral cell.
Having many heads or many stems from one crown or root.
Having many, or several, colors.
Having numerous ribs, or costae, as the leaf of a plant, or as certain shells and corals.
Multicuspidate; -- said of teeth.
Having many cusps or points.
Having many teeth, or toothlike processes.
Having many fingers, or fingerlike processes.
Having many faces.
Having multiplicity; having great diversity or variety; of various kinds; diversified; made up of many differing parts; manifold.
Having parts, as leaves, arranged in many vertical rows.
With great multiplicity and diversity; with variety of modes and relations.
Multiplied diversity.
The fault of improperly uniting in one bill distinct and independent matters, and thereby confounding them.
Bearing or producing much or many.
Having many segments; cleft into several parts by linear sinuses; as, a multifid leaf or corolla.
Having many flowers.
Having many flues; as, a multiflue boiler. See Boiler.
An ornamental foliation consisting of more than five divisions or foils.
Having more than five divisions or foils.
Many times doubled; manifold; numerous.
Having many forms, shapes, or appearances.
The quality of being multiform; diversity of forms; variety of appearances in the same thing.
Multiform.
Having many kinds.
Having, or consisting of, many grains.
Having many pairs of leaflets.
Consisting of many parts.
Same as Multijugate.
Having many sides; many-sided.
Having many lines.
Consisting of, or having, many lobes.
Having many or several cells or compartments; as, a multilocular shell or capsule.
Quality of being multiloquent; use of many words; talkativeness.
Alt. of Multiloquous
Speaking much; very talkative; loquacious.
Excess of words or talk.
Having many knots or nodes.
Same as Multinodate.
Same as Polynomial.
Alt. of Multinominous
Having many names or terms.
Containing many nuclei; as, multinuclear cells.
Alt. of Multinucleated
Multinuclear.
Producing many, or more than one, at a birth.
Divided into many parts; having several parts.
An insect having many feet, as a myriapod.
Having many feet.
Containing more than once, or more than one; consisting of more than one; manifold; repeated many times; having several, or many, parts.
A quantity containing another quantity a number of times without a remainder.
Manifold; multiple.
Capable of being multiplied.
Capable of being multiplied; multipliable.
The number which is to be multiplied by another number called the multiplier. See Note under Multiplication.
Consisting of many, or of more than one; multiple; multifold.
The act or process of multiplying, or of increasing in number; the state of being multiplied; as, the multiplication of the human species by natural generation.
The process of repeating, or adding to itself, any given number or quantity a certain number of times; commonly, the process of ascertaining by a briefer computation the result of such repeated additions; also, the rule by which the operation is performed; -- the reverse of division.
An increase above the normal number of parts, especially of petals; augmentation.
The art of increasing gold or silver by magic, -- attributed formerly to the alchemists.
Tending to multiply; having the power to multiply, or incease numbers.
So as to multiply.
The number by which another number is multiplied; a multiplier.
Manifold.
The quality of being multiple, manifold, or various; a state of being many; a multitude; as, a multiplicity of thoughts or objects.
One who, or that which, multiplies or increases number.
The number by which another number is multiplied. See the Note under Multiplication.
An instrument for multiplying or increasing by repetition or accumulation the intensity of a force or action, as heat or electricity. It is particularly used to render such a force or action appreciable or measurable when feeble. See Thermomultiplier.
of Multiply
of Multiply
To increase in number; to make more numerous; to add quantity to.
To add (any given number or quantity) to itself a certain number of times; to find the product of by multiplication; thus 7 multiplied by 8 produces the number 56; to multiply two numbers. See the Note under Multiplication.
To increase (the amount of gold or silver) by the arts of alchemy.
To become greater in number; to become numerous.
To increase in extent and influence; to spread.
To increase amount of gold or silver by the arts of alchemy.
Having many poles; -- applied especially to those ganglionic nerve cells which have several radiating processes.
Having manifold power, or power to do many things.
The state or power of being multipresent.
Being, or having the power to be, present in two or more places at once.
Having many rays.
Divided into many branches.
Having many branches.
Having much or varied knowledge.
Divided into many similar segments; -- said of an insect or myriapod.
Divided into many chambers by partitions, as the pith of the pokeweed.
Arranged in many rows, or series, as the scales of a pine cone, or the leaves of the houseleek.
Having many pods or seed vessels.
Having many sounds, or sounding much.
Having numerous spiral coils round a center or nucleus; -- said of the opercula of certain shells.
Having many streaks.
Having many furrows.
A word of many syllables; a polysyllable.
Having many titles.
Having many tubes; as, a multitubular boiler.
A great number of persons collected together; a numerous collection of persons; a crowd; an assembly.
A great number of persons or things, regarded collectively; as, the book will be read by a multitude of people; the multitude of stars; a multitude of cares.
The state of being many; numerousness.
Multitudinous.
Consisting of a multitude; manifold in number or condition; as, multitudinous waves.
Of or pertaining to a multitude.
Alt. of Multivagous
Wandering much.
Quality, state, or degree, of a multivalent element, atom, or radical.
Having a valence greater than one, as silicon.
Having more than one degree of valence, as sulphur.
Any mollusk which has a shell composed of more than two pieces.
Alt. of Multivalvular
Having many valves.
Many-valved; having more than two valves; -- said of certain shells, as the chitons.
Turning into many shapes; assuming many forms; protean.
Having many ways or roads; by many ways.
Signifying many different things; of manifold meaning; equivocal.
A multivocal word.
Having many eyes, or more than two.
An extract of quassia licorice, fraudulently used by brewers in order to economize malt and hops.
Having many hoofs.
The toll for grinding grain.
A grist or grinding; the grain ground.
Silent; not speaking.
Be silent! Hush!
Silence.
A sort of strong beer, originally made in Brunswick, Germany.
of Mumble
of Mumble
To speak with the lips partly closed, so as to render the sounds inarticulate and imperfect; to utter words in a grumbling indistinct manner, indicating discontent or displeasure; to mutter.
To chew something gently with closed lips.
To utter with a low, inarticulate voice.
To chew or bite gently, as one without teeth.
To suppress, or utter imperfectly.
A talebearer.
One who mumbles.
Low; indistinct; inarticulate.
An object of superstitious homage and fear.
A game of hazard played with cards in silence.
A silent, stupid person.
Silent and idle.
of Mumm
of Mumm
To sport or make diversion in a mask or disguise; to mask.
One who mumms, or makes diversion in disguise; a masker; a buffon.
of Mummery
Masking; frolic in disguise; buffoonery.
Farcical show; hypocritical disguise and parade or ceremonies.
Any one of several species of small American cyprinodont fishes of the genus Fundulus, and of allied genera; the killifishes; -- called also minnow.
The act of making a mummy.
Converted into a mummy or a mummylike substance; having the appearance of a mummy; withered.
Having some resemblance to a mummy; -- in zoology, said of the pupae of certain insects.
of Mummify
of Mummify
To embalm and dry as a mummy; to make into, or like, a mummy.
of Mummy
A dead body embalmed and dried after the manner of the ancient Egyptians; also, a body preserved, by any means, in a dry state, from the process of putrefaction.
Dried flesh of a mummy.
A gummy liquor that exudes from embalmed flesh when heated; -- formerly supposed to have magical and medicinal properties.
A brown color obtained from bitumen. See Mummy brown (below).
A sort of wax used in grafting, etc.
One whose affections and energies are withered.
of Mummy
of Mummy
To embalm; to mummify.
See Mummichog.
To move the lips with the mouth closed; to mumble, as in sulkiness.
To talk imperfectly, brokenly, or feebly; to chatter unintelligibly.
To cheat; to deceive; to play the beggar.
To be sullen or sulky.
of Mump
of Mump
To utter imperfectly, brokenly, or feebly.
To work over with the mouth; to mumble; as, to mump food.
To deprive of (something) by cheating; to impose upon.
A beggar; a begging impostor.
Sullen, sulky.
Sullenness; silent displeasure; the sulks.
A specific infectious febrile disorder characterized by a nonsuppurative inflammation of the parotid glands; epidemic or infectious parotitis.
The mouth.
of Munch
of Munch
To chew with a grinding, crunching sound, as a beast chews provender; to chew deliberately or in large mouthfuls.
An extravagant fiction embodying an account of some marvelous exploit or adventure.
One who munches.
See Mun.
Of or pertaining to the world; worldly; earthly; terrestrial; as, the mundane sphere.
Worldliness.
The act of cleansing.
Cleansing; having power to cleanse.
Iron pyrites, or arsenical pyrites; -- so called by the Cornish miners.
Serving to cleanse and heal.
A mundificant ointment or plaster.
The act or operation of cleansing.
Cleansing.
A detergent medicine or preparation.
To cleanse.
A turban ornamented with an imitation of gold or silver embroidery.
Wandering over the world.
A stinking tobacco.
Having the nature of a gift.
To remunerate.
Remuneration.
Green gram, a kind of pulse (Phaseolus Mungo), grown for food in British India.
See Bonnet monkey, under Bonnet.
Same as Mangcorn.
A fibrous material obtained by deviling rags or the remnants of woolen goods.
Alt. of Mungoos
See Mongoose.
See Mongrel.
Of or pertaining to a city or a corporation having the right of administering local government; as, municipal rights; municipal officers.
Of or pertaining to a state, kingdom, or nation.
Municipal condition.
of Municipality
A municipal district; a borough, city, or incorporated town or village.
In a municipal relation or condition.
Munificent; liberal.
To enrich.
Means of defense; fortification.
The quality or state of being munificent; a giving or bestowing with extraordinary liberality; generous bounty; lavish generosity.
Very liberal in giving or bestowing; lavish; as, a munificent benefactor.
To prepare for defense; to fortify.
The act of supporting or defending.
That which supports or defends; stronghold; place or means of defense; munition; assistance.
A record; the evidences or writings whereby a man is enabled to defend the title to his estate; title deeds and papers.
To fortify; to strengthen.
Fortification; stronghold.
Whatever materials are used in war for defense or for annoying an enemy; ammunition; also, stores and provisions; military stores of all kinds.
Freedom; security; immunity.
See Indian madder, under Madder.
An orange-red coloring substance resembling alizarin, found in the root of an East Indian species of madder (Rubia munjista).
See Mullion.
Alt. of Munting
Same as Mullion; -- especially used in joiner's work.
Any one of several species of small Asiatic deer of the genus Cervulus, esp. C. muntjac, which occurs both in India and on the East Indian Islands.
See under Metal.
A genus of large eels of the family Miraenidae. They differ from the common eel in lacking pectoral fins and in having the dorsal and anal fins continuous. The murry (Muraena Helenae) of Southern Europe was the muraena of the Romans. It is highly valued as a food fish.
Alt. of Murenoid
Like or pertaining to the genus Muraena, or family Muraenidae.
A tax or toll paid for building or repairing the walls of a fortified town.
Of or pertaining to a wall; being on, or in, a wall; growing on, or against, a wall; as, a mural quadrant.
Resembling a wall; perpendicular or steep; as, a mural precipice.
The offense of killing a human being with malice prepense or aforethought, express or implied; intentional and unlawful homicide.
of Murder
of Murder
To kill with premediated malice; to kill (a human being) willfully, deliberately, and unlawfully. See Murder, n.
To destroy; to put an end to.
To mutilate, spoil, or deform, as if with malice or cruelty; to mangle; as, to murder the king's English.
One guilty of murder; a person who, in possession of his reason, unlawfully kills a human being with premeditated malice.
A small cannon, formerly used for clearing a ship's decks of boarders; -- called also murdering piece.
A woman who commits murder.
Murder.
Of or pertaining to murder; characterized by, or causing, murder or bloodshed; having the purpose or quality of murder; bloody; sanguinary; as, the murderous king; murderous rapine; murderous intent; a murderous assault.
A battlement in ancient fortifications with interstices for firing through.
A wall.
of Mure
To inclose in walls; to wall; to immure; to shut up.
One who had charge of the wall of a town, or its repairs.
of Murex
A genus of marine gastropods, having rough, and frequently spinose, shells, which are often highly colored inside; the rock shells. They abound in tropical seas.
A complex nitrogenous substance obtained from murexide, alloxantin, and other ureids, as a white, or yellowish, crystalline which turns red on exposure to the air; -- called also uramil, dialuramide, and formerly purpuric acid.
A crystalline nitrogenous substance having a splendid dichroism, being green by reflected light and garnet-red by transmitted light. It was formerly used in dyeing calico, and was obtained in a large quantities from guano. Formerly called also ammonium purpurate.
A complex nitrogenous compound obtained as a scarlet crystalline substance, and regarded as related to murexide.
A salt of muriatic hydrochloric acid; a chloride; as, muriate of ammonia.
Put in brine.
Combined or impregnated with muriatic or hydrochloric acid.
Prepared with chloride of silver through the agency of common salt.
Of, pertaining to, or obtained from, sea salt, or from chlorine, one of the constituents of sea salt; hydrochloric.
Producing muriatic substances or salt.
Alt. of Muricated
Formed with sharp points; full of sharp points or of pickles; covered, or roughened, as a surface, with sharp points or excrescences.
Like, or pertaining to, the genus Murex, or family Muricidae.
Minutely muricate.
Bromine; -- formerly so called from its being obtained from sea water.
Resembling courses of bricks or stones in squareness and regular arrangement; as, a muriform variety of cellular tissue.
Pertaining to a family of rodents (Muridae), of which the mouse is the type.
One of a tribe of rodents, of which the mouse is the type.
See Murenger.
Dark; murky.
Darkness; mirk.
The refuse of fruit, after the juice has been expressed; marc.
Darkly; gloomily.
The state of being murky.
Dark; obscure; gloomy.
A seaweed. See Baddrelocks.
A low, confused, and indistinct sound, like that of running water.
A complaint half suppressed, or uttered in a low, muttering voice.
of Murmur
of Murmur
To make a low continued noise, like the hum of bees, a stream of water, distant waves, or the wind in a forest.
To utter complaints in a low, half-articulated voice; to feel or express dissatisfaction or discontent; to grumble; -- often with at or against.
To utter or give forth in low or indistinct words or sounds; as, to murmur tales.
The act of murmuring; a murmur.
One who murmurs.
Uttering murmurs; making low sounds; complaining.
Attended with murmurs; exciting murmurs or complaint; murmuring.
In the game of gleek, four cards of the same value, as four aces or four kings; hence, four of anything.
A potato.
A catarrh.
An infectious and fatal disease among cattle.
Having, or afflicted with, murrain.
A glucoside found in the flowers of a plant (Murraya exotica) of South Asia, and extracted as a white amorphous slightly bitter substance.
Any one of several species of sea birds of the genus Uria, or Catarractes; a guillemot.
One of several species of sea birds of the genera Synthliboramphus and Brachyramphus, inhabiting the North Pacific. They are closely related to the murres.
A dark red color.
Of a dark red color.
Made of the stone or material called by the Romans murrha; -- applied to certain costly vases of great beauty and delicacy used by the luxurious in Rome as wine cups; as, murrhine vases, cups, vessels.
Infected with or killed by murrain.
A morion. See Morion.
See Muraena.
Plenty; abundance.
Murder, n. & v.
A murderer.
One of the hereditary nobility among the Tatars, esp. one of the second class.
of Mus
A genus of small rodents, including the common mouse and rat.
of Musa
A genus of perennial, herbaceous, endogenous plants of great size, including the banana (Musa sapientum), the plantain (M. paradisiaca of Linnaeus, but probably not a distinct species), the Abyssinian (M. Ensete), the Philippine Island (M. textilis, which yields Manila hemp), and about eighteen other species. See Illust. of Banana and Plantain.
Of, pertaining to, or resembling, plants of the genus Musa.
Of or pertaining to the Muses, or to Poetry.
A small animal of Java (Paradoxirus fasciatus), allied to the civets. It swallows, but does not digest, large quantities of ripe coffee berries, thus serving to disseminate the coffee plant; hence it is called also coffee rat.
An itinerant player on the musette, an instrument formerly common in Europe.
A dreamer; an absent-minded person.
of Musca
A genus of dipterous insects, including the common house fly, and numerous allied species.
A small constellation situated between the Southern Cross and the Pole.
See Muscatel, n.
A name given to several very different kinds of grapes, but in America used chiefly for the scuppernong, or southern fox grape, which is said to be the parent stock of the Catawba. See Grapevine.
A fragrant and delicious pear.
See Muscardin.
An old name for mosses in the widest sense, including the true mosses and also hepaticae and sphagna.
See Muskellunge.
The common European dormouse; -- so named from its odor.
A disease which is very destructive to silkworms, and which sometimes extends to other insects. It is attended by the development of a fungus (provisionally called Botrytis bassiana). Also, the fungus itself.
Having the form of a brush.
A solid crystalline substance, C5H13NO2, found in the toadstool (Agaricus muscarius), and in putrid fish. It is a typical ptomaine, and a violent poison.
A name given to several varieties of Old World grapes, differing in color, size, etc., but all having a somewhat musky flavor. The muscat of Alexandria is a large oval grape of a pale amber color.
Of, pertaining to, or designating, or derived from, a muscat grapes or similar grapes; a muscatel grapes; muscatel wine, etc.
A common name for several varieties of rich sweet wine, made in Italy, Spain, and France.
Finest raisins, dried on the vine; "sun raisins."
A kind of shell limestone, whose strata form the middle one of the three divisions of the Triassic formation in Germany. See Chart, under Geology.
An order or subclass of cryptogamous plants; the mosses. See Moss, and Cryptogamia.
Of or pertaining to the Muscicapidae, a family of birds that includes the true flycatchers.
Any fly of the genus Musca, or family Muscidae.
Having the form or structure of flies of the genus Musca, or family Muscidae.
Having the appearance or form of a moss.
An organ which, by its contraction, produces motion.
The contractile tissue of which muscles are largely made up.
Muscular strength or development; as, to show one's muscle by lifting a heavy weight.
See Mussel.
Furnished with muscles; having muscles; as, things well muscled.
Exhibition or representation of the muscles.
See Muskogees.
Mosslike; resembling moss.
A term formerly applied to any mosslike flowerless plant, with a distinct stem, and often with leaves, but without any vascular system.
Bryology.
Mossiness.
Pertaining to, or of the nature of, unrefined or raw sugar, obtained from the juice of the sugar cane by evaporating and draining off the molasses. Muscovado sugar contains impurities which render it dark colored and moist.
Unrefined or raw sugar.
A native or inhabitant of Muscovy or ancient Russia; hence, a Russian.
Common potash mica. See Mica.
A duck (Cairina moschata), larger than the common duck, often raised in poultry yards. Called also musk duck. It is native of tropical America, from Mexico to Southern Brazil.
Mica; muscovite. See Mica.
Of or pertaining to a muscle, or to a system of muscles; consisting of, or constituting, a muscle or muscles; as, muscular fiber.
Performed by, or dependent on, a muscle or the muscles.
Well furnished with muscles; having well-developed muscles; brawny; hence, strong; powerful; vigorous; as, a muscular body or arm.
The state or quality of being muscular.
To make muscular.
In a muscular manner.
The muscular system of an animal, or of any of its parts.
Musculation.
A long movable shed used by besiegers in ancient times in attacking the walls of a fortified town.
See Syntonin.
Pertaining both to muscles and skin; as, the musculocutaneous nerve.
Pertaining to the muscles and the diaphragm; as, the musculophrenic artery.
The quality or state of being musculous; muscularity.
Of or pertaining to the muscles, and taking a spiral course; -- applied esp. to a large nerve of the arm.
Muscular.
A gap or hole in a hedge, hence, wall, or the like, through which a wild animal is accustomed to pass; a muset.
One of the nine goddesses who presided over song and the different kinds of poetry, and also the arts and sciences; -- often used in the plural.
A particular power and practice of poetry.
A poet; a bard.
of Muse
of Muse
To think closely; to study in silence; to meditate.
To be absent in mind; to be so occupied in study or contemplation as not to observe passing scenes or things present; to be in a brown study.
To wonder.
To think on; to meditate on.
To wonder at.
Contemplation which abstracts the mind from passing scenes; absorbing thought; hence, absence of mind; a brown study.
Wonder, or admiration.
Meditative; thoughtfully silent.
Unregardful of the Muses; disregarding the power of poetry; unpoetical.
One who muses.
A small hole or gap through which a wild animal passes; a muse.
A small bagpipe formerly in use, having a soft and sweet tone.
An air adapted to this instrument; also, a kind of rustic dance.
A repository or a collection of natural, scientific, or literary curiosities, or of works of art.
Meal (esp. Indian meal) boiled in water; hasty pudding; supawn.
To notch, cut, or indent, as cloth, with a stamp.
An edible fungus (Agaricus campestris), having a white stalk which bears a convex or oven flattish expanded portion called the pileus. This is whitish and silky or somewhat scaly above, and bears on the under side radiating gills which are at first flesh-colored, but gradually become brown. The plant grows in rich pastures and is proverbial for rapidity of growth and shortness of duration. It has a pleasant smell, and is largely used as food. It is also cultivated from spawn.
Any large fungus, especially one of the genus Agaricus; a toadstool. Several species are edible; but many are very poisonous.
One who rises suddenly from a low condition in life; an upstart.
Of or pertaining to mushrooms; as, mushroom catchup.
Resembling mushrooms in rapidity of growth and shortness of duration; short-lived; ephemerial; as, mushroom cities.
Having a cylindrical body with a convex head of larger diameter; having a head like that of a mushroom.
Soft like mush; figuratively, good-naturedly weak and effusive; weakly sentimental.
The science and the art of tones, or musical sounds, i. e., sounds of higher or lower pitch, begotten of uniform and synchronous vibrations, as of a string at various degrees of tension; the science of harmonical tones which treats of the principles of harmony, or the properties, dependences, and relations of tones to each other; the art of combining tones in a manner to please the ear.
Melody; a rhythmical and otherwise agreeable succession of tones.
Harmony; an accordant combination of simultaneous tones.
The written and printed notation of a musical composition; the score.
Love of music; capacity of enjoying music.
A more or less musical sound made by many of the lower animals. See Stridulation.
Of or pertaining to music; having the qualities of music; or the power of producing music; devoted to music; melodious; harmonious; as, musical proportion; a musical voice; musical instruments; a musical sentence; musical persons.
Music.
A social entertainment of which music is the leading feature; a musical party.
A social musical party.
In a musical manner.
The quality of being musical.
One skilled in the art or science of music; esp., a skilled singer, or performer on a musical instrument.
A kind of monomania in which the passion for music becomes so strong as to derange the intellectual faculties.
See Mouflon.
In a musing manner.
See Muset.
A substance of a reddish brown color, and when fresh of the consistence of honey, obtained from a bag being behind the navel of the male musk deer. It has a slightly bitter taste, but is specially remarkable for its powerful and enduring odor. It is used in medicine as a stimulant antispasmodic. The term is also applied to secretions of various other animals, having a similar odor.
The musk deer. See Musk deer (below).
The perfume emitted by musk, or any perfume somewhat similar.
The musk plant (Mimulus moschatus).
A plant of the genus Erodium (E. moschatum); -- called also musky heron's-bill.
A plant of the genus Muscari; grape hyacinth.
To perfume with musk.
See Muscadel.
See Muscat.
A large American pike (Esox nobilitor) found in the Great Lakes, and other Northern lakes, and in the St. Lawrence River. It is valued as a food fish.
The male of the sparrow hawk.
A species of firearm formerly carried by the infantry of an army. It was originally fired by means of a match, or matchlock, for which several mechanical appliances (including the flintlock, and finally the percussion lock) were successively substituted. This arm has been generally superseded by the rifle.
A soldier armed with a musket.
See Mosquito.
A short musket.
One who is armed with such a musket.
Muskets, collectively.
The fire of muskets.
The quality or state of being musky; the scent of musk.
The fruit of a cucubritaceous plant (Cicumis Melo), having a peculiar aromatic flavor, and cultivated in many varieties, the principal sorts being the cantaloupe, of oval form and yellowish flesh, and the smaller nutmeg melon with greenish flesh.  See Illust. of Melon.
A powerful tribe of North American Indians that formerly occupied the region of Georgia, Florida, and Alabama. They constituted a large part of the Creek confederacy.
A North American aquatic fur-bearing rodent (Fiber zibethicus). It resembles a rat in color and having a long scaly tail, but the tail is compressed, the bind feet are webbed, and the ears are concealed in the fur. It has scent glands which secrete a substance having a strong odor of musk. Called also musquash, musk beaver, and ondatra.
The musk shrew.
The desman.
The wood of a West Indian tree of the Mahogany family (Moschoxylum Swartzii).
The wood of an Australian tree (Eurybia argophylla).
Having an odor of musk, or somewhat the like.
See Moslem.
A thin cotton, white, dyed, or printed. The name is also applied to coarser and heavier cotton goods; as, shirting and sheeting muslins.
A sort of coarse or light cotton cloth.
See Mouflon.
See Musicomania.
See Muskrat.
The American black bear. See Bear.
See Musket.
See Mosquito.
Alt. of Musrol
The nose band of a horse's bridle.
A scramble, as when small objects are thrown down, to be taken by those who can seize them; a confused struggle.
A state of confusion or disorder; -- prob. variant of mess, but influenced by muss, a scramble.
of Muss
of Muss
To disarrange, as clothing; to rumple.
A term of endearment.
Any one of many species of marine bivalve shells of the genus Mytilus, and related genera, of the family Mytidae. The common mussel (Mytilus edulis; see Illust. under Byssus), and the larger, or horse, mussel (Modiola modiolus), inhabiting the shores both of Europe and America, are edible. The former is extensively used as food in Europe.
Any one of numerous species of Unio, and related fresh-water genera; -- called also river mussel. See Naiad, and Unio.
A speaking in a low tone; mumbling.
A variety of pyroxene, from the Mussa Alp in Piedmont; diopside.
of Mussulman
A Mohammedan; a Moslem.
Of, pertaining to, or like, the Mussulmans, or their customs: Mohammedan.
Mohammedan.
Mohammedanism.
In the manner of Moslems.
Disarranged; rumpled.
To be obliged; to be necessitated; -- expressing either physical or moral necessity; as, a man must eat for nourishment; we must submit to the laws.
To be morally required; to be necessary or essential to a certain quality, character, end, or result; as, he must reconsider the matter; he must have been insane.
The expressed juice of the grape, or other fruit, before fermentation.
Mustiness.
To make musty; to become musty.
A small tufted monkey.
of Mustache
That part of the beard which grows on the upper lip; hair left growing above the mouth.
A West African monkey (Cercopithecus cephus). It has yellow whiskers, and a triangular blue mark on the nose.
Any conspicuous stripe of color on the side of the head, beneath the eye of a bird.
of Mustacho
A mustache.
Having mustachios.
A close-grained, neavy wood of a brownish color, brought from Brazil, and used in turning, for making the handles of tools, and the like.
The half-wild horse of the plains in Mexico, California, etc. It is small, hardy, and easily sustained.
The name of several cruciferous plants of the genus Brassica (formerly Sinapis), as white mustard (B. alba), black mustard (B. Nigra), wild mustard or charlock (B. Sinapistrum).
A powder or a paste made from the seeds of black or white mustard, used as a condiment and a rubefacient. Taken internally it is stimulant and diuretic, and in large doses is emetic.
See Mestee.
Like or pertaining to the family Mustelidae, or the weasels and martens.
Something shown for imitation; a pattern.
A show; a display.
An assembling or review of troops, as for parade, verification of numbers, inspection, exercise, or introduction into service.
The sum total of an army when assembled for review and inspection; the whole number of effective men in an army.
Any assemblage or display; a gathering.
of Muster
of Muster
To collect and display; to assemble, as troops for parade, inspection, exercise, or the like.
Hence: To summon together; to enroll in service; to get together.
To be gathered together for parade, inspection, exercise, or the like; to come together as parts of a force or body; as, his supporters mustered in force.
In a musty state.
The quality or state of being musty.
Having the rank, pungent, offencive odor and taste which substances of organic origin acquire during warm, moist weather; foul or sour and fetid; moldy; as, musty corn; musty books.
Spoiled by age; rank; stale.
Dull; heavy; spiritless.
The quality of being mutable, or subject to change or alteration, either in form, state, or essential character; susceptibility of change; changeableness; inconstancy; variation.
Capable of alteration; subject to change; changeable in form, qualities, or nature.
Changeable; inconstant; unsettled; unstable; fickle.
The quality of being mutable.
Changeably.
See Mytacism.
A process for checking the fermentation of the must of grapes.
of Mutandum
A thing which is to be changed; something which must be altered; -- used chiefly in the plural.
Change; alteration, either in form or qualities.
The close linen or muslin cap of an old woman.
A liquid measure equal to four gills, or an imperial pint.
To cast off; to molt.
To eject the contents of the bowels; -- said of birds.
The dung of birds.
Not speaking; uttering no sound; silent.
Incapable of speaking; dumb.
Not uttered; unpronounced; silent; also, produced by complete closure of the mouth organs which interrupt the passage of breath; -- said of certain letters. See 5th Mute, 2.
Not giving a ringing sound when struck; -- said of a metal.
One who does not speak, whether from physical inability, unwillingness, or other cause.
One who, from deafness, either congenital or from early life, is unable to use articulate language; a deaf-mute.
A person employed by undertakers at a funeral.
A person whose part in a play does not require him to speak.
Among the Turks, an officer or attendant who is selected for his place because he can not speak.
A letter which represents no sound; a silent letter; also, a close articulation; an element of speech formed by a position of the mouth organs which stops the passage of the breath; as, p, b, d, k, t.
A little utensil made of brass, ivory, or other material, so formed that it can be fixed in an erect position on the bridge of a violin, or similar instrument, in order to deaden or soften the tone.
See Moot-hill.
Without uttering words or sounds; in a mute manner; silently.
The quality or state of being mute; speechlessness.
Alt. of Muticous
Without a point or pointed process; blunt.
Deprived of, or having lost, an important part; mutilated.
Having finlike appendages or flukes instead of legs, as a cetacean.
A cetacean, or a sirenian.
of Mutilate
of Mutilate
To cut off or remove a limb or essential part of; to maim; to cripple; to hack; as, to mutilate the body, a statue, etc.
To destroy or remove a material part of, so as to render imperfect; as, to mutilate the orations of Cicero.
The act of mutilating, or the state of being mutilated; deprivation of a limb or of an essential part.
One who mutilates.
Mutilated; defective; imperfect.
A mutineer.
To mutiny.
One guilty of mutiny.
Dung of birds.
Disposed to mutiny; in a state of mutiny; characterized by mutiny; seditious; insubordinate.
of Mutiny
Insurrection against constituted authority, particularly military or naval authority; concerted revolt against the rules of discipline or the lawful commands of a superior officer; hence, generally, forcible resistance to rightful authority; insubordination.
Violent commotion; tumult; strife.
of Mutiny
of Mutiny
To rise against, or refuse to obey, lawful authority in military or naval service; to excite, or to be guilty of, mutiny or mutinous conduct; to revolt against one's superior officer, or any rightful authority.
To fall into strife; to quarrel.
The condition, state, or habit of being mute, or without speech.
of Mutter
of Mutter
To utter words indistinctly or with a low voice and lips partly closed; esp., to utter indistinct complaints or angry expressions; to grumble; to growl.
To sound with a low, rumbling noise.
To utter with imperfect articulations, or with a low voice; as, to mutter threats.
Repressed or obscure utterance.
One who mutters.
With a low voice and indistinct articulation; in a muttering manner.
A sheep.
The flesh of a sheep.
A loose woman; a prostitute.
Like mutton; having a flavor of mutton.
Reciprocally acting or related; reciprocally receiving and giving; reciprocally given and received; reciprocal; interchanged; as, a mutual love, advantage, assistance, aversion, etc.
Possessed, experienced, or done by two or more persons or things at the same time; common; joint; as, mutual happiness; a mutual effort.
The doctrine of mutual dependence as the condition of individual and social welfare.
The quality of correlation; reciprocation; interchange; interaction; interdependence.
Reciprocity of consideration.
In a mutual manner.
One who borrows personal chattels which are to be consumed by him, and which he is to return or repay in kind.
The act of borrowing or exchanging.
A projecting block worked under the corona of the Doric corice, in the same situation as the modillion of the Corinthian and Composite orders. See Illust. of Gutta.
Dirt; filth; muck.
To mix in an unitidy and offensive way; to make a mess of.
Soft; sticky, and dirty.
One of a denomination of Christians formerly living under the government of the Moors in Spain, and having a liturgy and ritual of their own.
Of or pertaining to Muzarabs; as, the Muzarabic liturgy.
The state or quality of being muzzy.
The projecting mouth and nose of a quadruped, as of a horse; a snout.
The mouth of a thing; the end for entrance or discharge; as, the muzzle of a gun.
A fastening or covering (as a band or cage) for the mouth of an animal, to prevent eating or vicious biting.
of Muzzle
of Muzzle
To bind the mouth of; to fasten the mouth of, so as to prevent biting or eating; hence, figuratively, to bind; to sheathe; to restrain from speech or action.
To fondle with the closed mouth.
To bring the mouth or muzzle near.
A firearm which receives its charge through the muzzle, as distinguished from one which is loaded at the breech.
Receiving its charge through the muzzle; as, a muzzle-loading rifle.
Absent-minded; dazed; muddled; stupid.
Of or belonging to me; -- used always attributively; as, my body; my book; -- mine is used in the predicate; as, the book is mine. See Mine.
A genus of bivalve mollusks, including the common long, or soft-shelled, clam.
Pain in the muscles; muscular rheumatism or neuralgia.
A durable, fragrant, and dark-colored Australian wood, used by the natives for spears. It is obtained from the small tree Acacia homolophylla.
A division of bivalve mollusks of which the common clam (Mya) is the type.
The white threads or filamentous growth from which a mushroom or fungus is developed; the so-called mushroom spawn.
Resembling mycelium.
A genus of South American monkeys, including the howlers. See Howler, 2, and Illust.
Resembling a fungus.
One of the forms in which bacteria group themselves; a more or less thick layer of motionless but living bacteria, formed by the bacteria uniting on the surface of the fluid in which they are developed. This production differs from the zooloea stage of bacteria by not having the intermediary mucous substance.
A genus of microorganisms of which the acetic ferment (Mycoderma aceti), which converts alcoholic fluids into vinegar, is a representative.  Cf. Mother.
Alt. of Mycological
Of or relating to mycology, or the fungi.
One who is versed in, or who studies, mycology.
That branch of botanical science which relates to the musgrooms and other fungi.
Pertaining to, or designating, a complex nitrogenous acid of the alloxan group, obtained as a honey-yellow powder. Its solutions have a gelatinous consistency.
The protoplasmic matter of which bacteria are composed.
A variety of sugar, isomeric with sucrose and obtained from certain lichens and fungi. Called also trehalose.
The chain of micrococci formed by the division of the micrococci in multiplication.
A toxic alkaloid (ptomaine) obtained from putrid flesh and from herring brines. As a poison it is said to execute profuse diarrhoea, vomiting, and intestinal inflammation.
A poisonous amido acid, C6H13NO2, separated by Brieger from decaying horseflesh. In physiological action, it is similar to curare.
The teledu.
A long-continued or excessive dilatation of the pupil of the eye.
Causing dilatation of the pupil.
A mydriatic medicine or agent, as belladonna.
Same as Vertebrata.
Of or pertaining to the myelencephalon; cerebro-spinal.
The brain and spinal cord; the cerebro-spinal axis; the neuron. Sometimes abbreviated to myelencephal.
The metencephalon.
Of or pertaining to the Myelencephala.
A soft white substance constituting the medullary sheats of nerve fibers, and composed mainly of cholesterin, lecithin, cerebrin, albumin, and some fat.
One of a group of phosphorized principles occurring in nerve tissue, both in the brain and nerve fibers.
Inflammation of the spinal marrow or its membranes.
The central canal of the spinal cord.
Derived from, or pertaining to, the bone marrow.
Resembling marrow in appearance or consistency; as, a myeloid tumor.
A substance, present in the protoplasm of the retinal epithelium cells, and resembling, if not identical with, the substance (myelin) forming the medullary sheaths of nerve fibers.
The spinal cord. (Sometimes abbrev. to myel.)
Of or pertaining to the myelon; as, the myelonal, or spinal, nerves.
The Vertebrata.
of Myeloplax
of Myeloplax
One of the huge multinucleated cells found in the marrow of bone and occasionally in other parts; a giant cell. See Osteoclast.
A genus of very large hairy spiders having four lungs and only four spinnerets. They do not spin webs, but usually construct tubes in the earth, which are often furnished with a trapdoor. The South American bird spider (Mygale avicularia), and the crab spider, or matoutou (M. cancerides) are among the largest species. Some of the species are erroneously called tarantulas, as the Texas tarantula (M. Hentzii).
An extinct genus of large slothlike American edentates, allied to Megatherium.
Pertaining to, or in the region of, the lower jaw and the hyoid apparatus; as, the mylohyoid nerve.
Any one of numerous species of Asiatic starlings of the genera Acridotheres, Sturnopastor, Sturnia, Gracula, and allied genera. In habits they resemble the European starlings, and like them are often caged and taught to talk. See Hill myna, under Hill, and Mino bird.
A nun.
A nunnery; -- a term still applied to the ruins of certain nunneries in England.
The Dutch equivalent of Mr. or Sir; hence, a Dutchman.
A combining form of Gr. /, /, a muscle; as, myograph, myochrome.
Inflammation of the myocardium.
The main substance of the muscular wall of the heart inclosed between the epicardium and endocardium.
A colored albuminous substance in the serum from red-colored muscles. It is identical with hemoglobin.
of Myocomma
of Myocomma
A myotome.
The department of physiology which deals with the principles of muscular contraction; the exercise of muscular force or contraction.
A myodynamometer.
An instrument for measuring the muscular strength of man or of other animals; a dynamometer.
Derived from epithelial cells and destined to become a part of the muscular system; -- applied to structural elements in certain embryonic forms.
Having the characteristics of both muscle and epithelium; as, the myoepithelial cells of the hydra.
One of the Myogalodae, a family of Insectivora, including the desman, and allied species.
See Muscle curve, under Muscle.
An instrument for determining and recording the different phases, as the intensity, velocity, etc., of a muscular contraction.
Alt. of Myographical
Of or pertaining to myography.
The description of muscles, including the study of muscular contraction by the aid of registering apparatus, as by some form of myograph; myology.
A red-colored respiratory pigment found associated with hemoglobin in the muscle tissue of a large number of animals, both vertebrate and invertebrate.
Composed of, or resembling, muscular fiber.
Sarcolemma.
The essential material of muscle fibers.
Alt. of Myological
Of or pertaining to myology.
One skilled in myology.
That part of anatomy which treats of muscles.
A tumor consisting of muscular tissue.
Divination by the movements of mice.
One of the Myomorpha.
An extensive group of rodents which includes the rats, mice, jerboas, and many allied forms.
Any affection of the muscles or muscular system.
Of or pertaining to myopathia.
Same as Myopathia.
A person having myopy; a myops.
A contractile striated layer found in the bodies and stems of certain Infusoria.
Nearsightedness; shortsightedness; a condition of the eye in which the rays from distant object are brought to a focus before they reach the retina, and hence form an indistinct image; while the rays from very near objects are normally converged so as to produce a distinct image. It is corrected by the use of a concave lens.
Pertaining to, or affected with, or characterized by, myopia; nearsighted.
See Myope.
The appearance of muscae volitantes. See Muscae volitantes, under Musca.
Myopia.
An albuminous body present in dead muscle, being formed in the process of coagulation which takes place in rigor mortis; the clot formed in the coagulation of muscle plasma. See Muscle plasma, under Plasma.
Long-continued contraction of the pupil of the eye.
Myotic.
Inflammation of the muscles.
A genus of plants. See Mouse-ear.
Producing myosis, or contraction of the pupil of the eye, as opium, calabar bean, etc.
A myotic agent.
A muscular segment; one of the zones into which the muscles of the trunk, especially in fishes, are divided; a myocomma.
One of the embryonic muscular segments arising from the protovertebrae; also, one of the protovertebrae themselves.
The muscular system of one metamere of an articulate.
Of or pertaining to a myotome or myotomes.
The dissection, or that part of anatomy which treats of the dissection, of muscles.
A large genus of tropical American trees and shrubs, nearly related to the true myrtles (Myrtus), from which they differ in having very few seeds in each berry.
A prefix, esp. in the metric system, indicating ten thousand, ten thousand times; as, myriameter.
Having numerous spines, as certain fishes.
The number of ten thousand; ten thousand persons or things.
An immense number; a very great many; an indefinitely large number.
Consisting of a very great, but indefinite, number; as, myriad stars.
Alt. of Myriagramme
A metric weight, consisting of ten thousand grams or ten kilograms. It is equal to 22.046 lbs. avoirdupois.
Alt. of Myrialitre
A metric measure of capacity, containing ten thousand liters. It is equal to 2641.7 wine gallons.
Alt. of Myriametre
A metric measure of length, containing ten thousand meters. It is equal to 6.2137 miles.
One of the Myriapoda.
A class, or subclass, of arthropods, related to the hexapod insects, from which they differ in having the body made up of numerous similar segments, nearly all of which bear true jointed legs. They have one pair of antennae, three pairs of mouth organs, and numerous trachaae, similar to those of true insects. The larvae, when first hatched, often have but three pairs of legs. See Centiped, Galleyworm, Milliped.
A captain or commander of ten thousand men.
A measure of surface in the metric system containing ten thousand ares, or one million square meters. It is equal to about 247.1 acres.
A widely dispersed genus of shrubs and trees, usually with aromatic foliage. It includes the bayberry or wax myrtle, the sweet gale, and the North American sweet fern, so called.
A silky, crystalline, waxy substance, forming the less soluble part of beeswax, and regarded as a palmitate of a higher alcohol of the paraffin series; -- called also myricyl alcohol.
A hypothetical radical regarded as the essential residue of myricin; -- called also melissyl.
Of or relating to a myriologue.
One who composes or sings a myriologue.
An extemporaneous funeral song, composed and sung by a woman on the death of a friend.
Having an indefinitely great or countless number of leaves.
See Myriapoda.
A picture made up of several smaller pictures, drawn upon separate pieces in such a manner as to admit of combination in many different ways, thus producing a great variety of scenes or landscapes.
A form of kaleidoscope.
A salt of myristic acid.
Pertaining to, or derived from, the nutmeg (Myristica). Specifically, designating an acid found in nutmeg oil and otoba fat, and extracted as a white crystalline waxy substance.
The myristate of glycerin, -- found as a vegetable fat in nutmeg butter, etc.
The ketone of myristic acid, obtained as a white crystalline substance.
Of or pertaining to Myrmica, a genus of ants including the small house ant (M. molesta), and many others.
One of a fierce tribe or troop who accompained Achilles, their king, to the Trojan war.
A soldier or a subordinate civil officer who executes cruel orders of a superior without protest or pity; -- sometimes applied to bailiffs, constables, etc.
Consisting of, or like, myrmidons.
Feeding upon ants; -- said of certain birds.
Alt. of Myrobolan
A dried astringent fruit much resembling a prune. It contains tannin, and was formerly used in medicine, but is now chiefly used in tanning and dyeing. Myrobolans are produced by various species of Terminalia of the East Indies, and of Spondias of South America.
Pertaining to, or obtained from, mustard; -- used specifically to designate a glucoside called myronic acid, found in mustard seed.
One who sells unguents or perfumery.
A ferment, resembling diastase, found in mustard seeds.
A genus of leguminous trees of tropical America, the different species of which yield balsamic products, among which are balsam of Peru, and balsam of Tolu. The species were formerly referred to Myrospermum.
A gum resin, usually of a yellowish brown or amber color, of an aromatic odor, and a bitter, slightly pungent taste. It is valued for its odor and for its medicinal properties. It exudes from the bark of a shrub of Abyssinia and Arabia, the Balsamodendron Myrrha. The myrrh of the Bible is supposed to have been partly the gum above named, and partly the exudation of species of Cistus, or rockrose.
Of, pertaining to, or obtained from, myrrh.
Murrhine.
Of, pertaining to, or resembling, a large and important natural order of trees and shrubs (Myrtaceae), of which the myrtle is the type. It includes the genera Eucalyptus, Pimenta, Lechythis, and about seventy more.
Resembling myrtle or myrtle berries; having the form of a myrtle leaf.
A species of the genus Myrtus, especially Myrtus communis. The common myrtle has a shrubby, upright stem, eight or ten feet high. Its branches form a close, full head, thickly covered with ovate or lanceolate evergreen leaves. It has solitary axillary white or rosy flowers, followed by black several-seeded berries. The ancients considered it sacred to Venus. The flowers, leaves, and berries are used variously in perfumery and as a condiment, and the beautifully mottled wood is used in turning.
of Myself
I or me in person; -- used for emphasis, my own self or person; as I myself will do it; I have done it myself; -- used also instead of me, as the object of the first person of a reflexive verb, without emphasis; as, I will defend myself.
Myself.
A genus of small schizopod shrimps found both in fresh and salt water; the opossum shrimps. One species inhabits the Great Lakes of North America, and is largely eaten by the whitefish. The marine species form part of the food of right whales.
Of or pertaining to the upper lip, or mustache.
Alt. of Mystagogical
Of or pertaining to interpretation of mysteries or to mystagogue; of the nature of mystagogy.
interprets mysteries, especially of a religious kind.
One who keeps and shows church relics.
The doctrines, principles, or practice of a mystagogue; interpretation of mysteries.
Mysterious.
One presiding over mysteries.
Of or pertaining to mystery; containing a mystery; difficult or impossible to understand; obscure not revealed or explained; enigmatical; incomprehensible.
In a mysterious manner.
The state or quality of being mysterious.
Something mysterious; a mystery.
of Mysterize
of Mysterize
To make mysterious; to make a mystery of.
of Mystery
A profound secret; something wholly unknown, or something kept cautiously concealed, and therefore exciting curiosity or wonder; something which has not been or can not be explained; hence, specifically, that which is beyond human comprehension.
A kind of secret religious celebration, to which none were admitted except those who had been initiated by certain preparatory ceremonies; -- usually plural; as, the Eleusinian mysteries.
The consecrated elements in the eucharist.
Anything artfully made difficult; an enigma.
of Mystery
A trade; a handicraft; hence, any business with which one is usually occupied.
A dramatic representation of a Scriptural subject, often some event in the life of Christ; a dramatic composition of this character; as, the Chester Mysteries, consisting of dramas acted by various craft associations in that city in the early part of the 14th century.
Alt. of Mystical
Remote from or beyond human comprehension; baffling human understanding; unknowable; obscure; mysterious.
Importing or implying mysticism; involving some secret meaning; allegorical; emblematical; as, a mystic dance; mystic Babylon.
One given to mysticism; one who holds mystical views, interpretations, etc.; especially, in ecclesiastical history, one who professed mysticism. See Mysticism.
Any right whale, or whalebone whale. See Cetacea.
Obscurity of doctrine.
The doctrine of the Mystics, who professed a pure, sublime, and wholly disinterested devotion, and maintained that they had direct intercourse with the divine Spirit, and aquired a knowledge of God and of spiritual things unattainable by the natural intellect, and such as can not be analyzed or explained.
The doctrine that the ultimate elements or principles of knowledge or belief are gained by an act or process akin to feeling or faith.
The act of mystifying, or the state of being mystied; also, something designed to, or that does, mystify.
One who mystifies.
of Mystify
of Mystify
To involve in mystery; to make obscure or difficult to understand; as, to mystify a passage of Scripture.
To perplex the mind of; to puzzle; to impose upon the credulity of ; as, to mystify an opponent.
Too frequent use of the letter m, or of the sound represented by it.
A story of great but unknown age which originally embodied a belief regarding some fact or phenomenon of experience, and in which often the forces of nature and of the soul are personified; an ancient legend of a god, a hero, the origin of a race, etc.; a wonder story of prehistoric origin; a popular fable which is, or has been, received as historical.
A person or thing existing only in imagination, or whose actual existence is not verifiable.
See Myth.
Alt. of Mythical
Of or relating to myths; described in a myth; of the nature of a myth; fabulous; imaginary; fanciful.
A composer of fables.
A mythologist.
A mythologist.
Alt. of Mythological
Of or pertaining to mythology or to myths; mythical; fabulous.
One versed in, or who writes on, mythology or myths.
To relate, classify, and explain, or attempt to explain, myths; to write upon myths.
To construct and propagate myths.
One who, or that which, mythologizes.
A fabulous narrative; a myth.
of Mythology
The science which treats of myths; a treatise on myths.
A body of myths; esp., the collective myths which describe the gods of a heathen people; as, the mythology of the Greeks.
A narration of mere fable.
Making or producing myths; giving rise to mythical narratives.
Making or producing myths or mythical tales.
Like, or pertaining to, the genus Mytilus, or family Mytilidae.
A poisonous base (leucomaine) found in the common mussel. It either causes paralysis of the muscles, or gives rise to convulsions, including death by an accumulation of carbonic acid in the blood.
A genus of marine bivalve shells, including the common mussel. See Illust. under Byssus.
The distal end of the mandibles of a bird.
A genus of marsipobranchs, including the hagfish. See Hag, 4.
Like, or pertaining to, the genus Myxine.
A hagfish.
A division of Infusoria including the Noctiluca. See Noctiluca.
of Myxoma
A tumor made up of a gelatinous tissue resembling that found in the umbilical cord.
A rhizopod or moneran. Also used adjectively; as, a myxopod state.
The Marsipobranchiata.
An order of curious parasitic worms found on crinoids. The body is short and disklike, with four pairs of suckers and five pairs of hook-bearing parapodia on the under side.
